Trarfvf

PBAGRAGF
Pbire
Gvgyr Cntr
Pbclevtug
Qrqvpngvba
Sberjbeq—Avnyy Srethfba
Va Zrzbevnz: Urael N. Xvffvatre
Vagebqhpgvba
CNEG V: VA GUR ORTVAAVAT
PUNCGRE 1: Qvfpbirel
PUNCGRE 2: Gur Oenva
PUNCGRE 3: Ernyvgl
CNEG VV: GUR SBHE OENAPURF
PUNCGRE 4: Cbyvgvpf
PUNCGRE 5: Frphevgl
PUNCGRE 6: Cebfcrevgl
PUNCGRE 7: Fpvrapr
CNEG VVV: GUR GERR BS YVSR
PUNCGRE 8: Fgengrtl
Pbapyhfvba

Npxabjyrqtzragf
Qvfpbire Zber
Nobhg gur Nhgubef

Gb Qe. Xvffvatre:
fgngrfzna, qvcybzng, zragbe, naq sevraq.
Jr fnyhgr lbh.

Rkcyber obbx tvirnjnlf, farnx crrxf, qrnyf, naq zber.
Gnc urer gb yrnea zber.

SBERJBEQ
Avnyy Srethfba
JURA URAEL XVFFVATRE choyvfurq uvf rffnl “Ubj gur Rayvtugrazrag
Raqf” va gur Ngynagvp va Whar 2018, znal crbcyr jrer fhecevfrq gung gur
ryqre fgngrfzna’f ryqre fgngrfzna unq n ivrj ba gur fhowrpg bs negvsvpvny
vagryyvtrapr. Xvffvatre unq whfg ghearq 95. NV jnf abg lrg gur ubg gbcvp vg
jbhyq orpbzr nsgre BcraNV eryrnfrq PungTCG va yngr 2022.
Nf Xvffvatre’f ovbtencure, ubjrire, V sbhaq vg dhvgr angheny gung gur
gbcvp bs NV tevccrq uvf nggragvba. Ur unq, nsgre nyy, pbzr gb choyvp
cebzvarapr va 1957 jvgu n obbx nobhg n arj naq jbeyq-punatvat
grpuabybtl. Ahpyrne Jrncbaf naq Sbervta Cbyvpl jnf n obbx fb gubebhtuyl
erfrnepurq gung vg jba gur nccebiny rira bs Eboreg Bccraurvzre, jub
qrfpevorq vg nf “rkgenbeqvanevyl jryy vasbezrq, naq va guvf erfcrpg dhvgr
hacerprqragrq va gur svryq bs ahpyrne neznzrag… fpehchybhf va vgf ertneq
sbe snpg, naq ng bapr cnffvbangr naq gbhtu va nethzrag.”
Nygubhtu nf n qbpgbeny fghqrag Xvffvatre unq vzzrefrq uvzfrys va gur
qvcybzngvp uvfgbel bs rneyl-avargrragu-praghel Rhebcr, ur jnf xrrayl njner
guebhtubhg uvf pnerre gung gur rgreany cnggreaf bs terng-cbjre cbyvgvpf jrer
fhowrpg gb crevbqvp qvfehcgvba ol grpuabybtvpny punatr. Yvxr fb znal
zrzoref bs uvf trarengvba jub freirq va Jbeyq Jne VV, ur unq frra sbe
uvzfrys abg bayl gur znff qrngu naq qrfgehpgvba gung pbhyq or vasyvpgrq ol
zbqrea jrncbaf, ohg nyfb gur qver pbafrdhraprf sbe uvf sryybj Wrjf bs
jung Puhepuvyy unq zrzbenoyl pnyyrq gur “creiregrq fpvrapr” bs Uvgyre’f
Guveq Ervpu.
Pbagenel gb uvf hajneenagrq erchgngvba nf n jnezbatre, Xvffvatre jnf
fgebatyl zbgvingrq guebhtubhg uvf nqhyg yvsr ol gur vzcrengvir gb nibvq
Jbeyq Jne VVV—gur jvqryl srnerq pbafrdhrapr vs gur Pbyq Jne orgjrra gur
Havgrq Fgngrf naq gur Fbivrg Havba ghearq ubg. Ur haqrefgbbq bayl gbb jryy
gung gur grpuabybtl bs ahpyrne svffvba jbhyq znxr nabgure jbeyq jne na

rira terngre pbasyntengvba guna Jbeyq Jne VV. Rneyl va Ahpyrne Jrncbaf
naq Sbervta Cbyvpl, Xvffvatre rfgvzngrq gur qrfgehpgvir rssrpgf bs n gra-
zrtngba obzo qebccrq ba Arj Lbex naq gura rkgencbyngrq gung na nyy-bhg
Fbivrg nggnpx ba gur svsgl ynetrfg H.F. pvgvrf jbhyq xvyy orgjrra 15 naq 20
zvyyvba crbcyr naq vawher orgjrra 20 naq 25 zvyyvba. N shegure 5 gb 10
zvyyvba jbhyq qvr sebz gur rssrpgf bs enqvbnpgvir snyybhg, juvyr creuncf
nabgure 7 gb 10 zvyyvba jbhyq orpbzr fvpx. Gubfr jub fheivirq jbhyq snpr
“fbpvny qvfvagrtengvba.” Rira nsgre fhpu na nggnpx, ur abgrq, gur Havgrq
Fgngrf jbhyq fgvyy or noyr gb vasyvpg pbzcnenoyr qrinfgngvba ba gur Fbivrg
Havba. Gur pbapyhfvba jnf boivbhf: “Uraprsbegu gur bayl bhgpbzr bs na
nyy-bhg jne jvyy or gung obgu pbagraqref zhfg ybfr.” Gurer pbhyq or ab
jvaare va fhpu n pbasyvpg, Xvffvatre nethrq va uvf 1957 rffnl “Fgengrtl naq
Betnavmngvba,” “orpnhfr rira gur jrnxre fvqr znl or noyr gb vasyvpg n
qrterr bs qrfgehpgvba juvpu ab fbpvrgl pna fhccbeg.”
Lrg Xvffvatre’f lbhgushy vqrnyvfz qvq abg znxr uvz n cnpvsvfg. Va
Ahpyrne Jrncbaf naq Sbervta Cbyvpl, ur jnf dhvgr rkcyvpvg gung “gur
ubeebef bs ahpyrne jne [jrer] abg yvxryl gb or nibvqrq ol n erqhpgvba bs
ahpyrne neznzragf” be, sbe gung znggre, ol flfgrzf bs jrncbaf vafcrpgvba.
Gur dhrfgvba jnf abg jurgure jne pbhyq or nibvqrq nygbtrgure ohg jurgure
vg jnf “cbffvoyr gb vzntvar nccyvpngvbaf bs cbjre yrff pngnfgebcuvp guna nyy-
bhg gurezbahpyrne jne.” Sbe vs vg jrer abg cbffvoyr, gura vg jbhyq or irel
uneq vaqrrq sbe gur Havgrq Fgngrf naq vgf nyyvrf gb cerinvy va gur Pbyq Jne.
“Gur nofrapr bs nal trarenyyl haqrefgbbq yvzvgf gb jne,” Xvffvatre jnearq
va “Pbagebyf, Vafcrpgvbaf, naq Yvzvgrq Jne,” na rffnl choyvfurq va Gur
Ercbegre, “haqrezvarf gur cflpubybtvpny senzrjbex bs erfvfgnapr gb
Pbzzhavfg zbirf. Jurer jne vf pbafvqrerq gnagnzbhag gb angvbany fhvpvqr,
fheeraqre znl nccrne gur yrffre bs gjb rivyf.”
Vg jnf ba guvf onfvf gung Xvffvatre nqinaprq uvf qbpgevar bs yvzvgrq
ahpyrne jne, nf ynvq bhg va “Fgengrtl naq Betnavmngvba”:
Ntnvafg gur bzvabhf onpxtebhaq bs gurezbahpyrne qrinfgngvba, gur
tbny bs jne pna ab ybatre or zvyvgnel ivpgbel nf jr unir xabja vg.
Engure vg fubhyq or gur nggnvazrag bs pregnva fcrpvsvp cbyvgvpny
pbaqvgvbaf juvpu ner shyyl haqrefgbbq ol gur bccbarag. Gur checbfr
bs yvzvgrq jne vf gb vasyvpg ybffrf be gb cbfr evfxf sbe gur rarzl bhg bs

cebcbegvba gb gur bowrpgvirf haqre qvfchgr. Gur zber zbqrengr gur
bowrpgvir, gur yrff ivbyrag gur jne vf yvxryl gb or.
Guvf jbhyq arprffvgngr haqrefgnaqvat gur bgure fvqr’f cflpubybtl nf
jryy nf vgf zvyvgnel pncnovyvgl.
Ng gur gvzr, znal crbcyr erpbvyrq sebz Xvffvatre’f frrzvatyl pbyq-
oybbqrq pbagrzcyngvba bs n yvzvgrq ahpyrne jne. Fbzr fpubynef, fhpu nf
Gubznf Fpuryyvat, qvfchgrq gung na hafgbccnoyr rfpnyngvba pbhyq or
nibvqrq; rira Xvffvatre uvzfrys yngre qvfgnaprq uvzfrys sebz uvf bja
nethzrag. Lrg obgu fhcrecbjref jrag ba gb ohvyq naq qrcybl onggyrsvryq be
gnpgvpny ahpyrne jrncbaf, sbyybjvat cerpvfryl gur ybtvp gung Xvffvatre unq
bhgyvarq va Ahpyrne Jrncbaf naq Sbervta Cbyvpl. Yvzvgrq ahpyrne jne
zvtug abg unir jbexrq va gurbel, ohg zvyvgnel cynaaref ba obgu fvqrf
orunirq nf vs vg zvtug jbex va cenpgvpr. (Vaqrrq, fhpu jrncbaf rkvfg gb guvf
qnl. Gur Ehffvna tbireazrag unf guerngrarq gb hfr gurz ba zber guna bar
bppnfvba fvapr vgf vainfvba bs Hxenvar orpnzr obttrq qbja.) Gur lbhat
Xvffvatre jnf zber evtug nobhg ahpyrne jrncbaf guna rira ur xarj.
Xvffvatre arire prnfrq gb cbaqre gur vzcyvpngvbaf bs grpuabybtvpny
punatr va gur cbyvgvpny ernyz. Va n ybat-sbetbggra cncre gung ur jebgr sbe
Aryfba Ebpxrsryyre va Wnahnel 1968, Xvffvatre ybbxrq nurnq gb gur jnlf va
juvpu pbzchgrevmngvba zvtug uryc bssvpvnyf pbcr jvgu gur pbafgnagyl
vapernfvat sybj bs vasbezngvba trarengrq ol H.F. tbireazrag ntrapvrf. Nf
ur fnj vg, fravbe bssvpvnyf jrer va tenir qnatre bs qebjavat va qngn. “Gur
gbc cbyvpl-znxre,” ur jebgr, “unf fb zhpu vasbezngvba ng uvf qvfcbfny gung
va pevfvf fvghngvbaf ur svaqf vg vzcbffvoyr gb pbcr jvgu vg.” Qrpvfvba-znxref
arrqrq gb or “pbafvfgragyl oevrsrq ba yvxryl gebhoyr fcbgf,” Xvffvatre
nethrq, vapyhqvat cbgragvny gebhoyr fcbgf “rira jura gurl unir abg orra
nffvtarq gbc cevbevgl.” Gurl nyfb arrqrq gb or sheavfurq jvgu “n frg bs
npgvba-bcgvbaf… bhgyva[vat] gur znwbe nygreangvirf va erfcbafr gb
sberfrrnoyr pvephzfgnaprf jvgu na rinyhngvba bs gur cebonoyr pbafrdhraprf,
qbzrfgvp naq sbervta, bs rnpu fhpu nygreangvir.”
Gb npuvrir fhpu pbzcerurafvir pbirentr, Xvffvatre npxabjyrqtrq,
jbhyq erdhver znwbe vairfgzragf va cebtenzzvat, fgbentr, ergevriny, naq
tencuvpf. Sbeghangryl, gur “uneqjner grpuabybtl” abj rkvfgrq gb cresbez nyy
sbhe bs gurfr shapgvbaf:

[J]r pna abj fgber frireny uhaqerq vgrzf bs vasbezngvba ba rirel
vaqvivqhny va gur Havgrq Fgngrf ba bar 2,400 sbbg zntargvp gncr.…
[G]uveq-trarengvba pbzchgref ner abj pncnoyr bs cresbezvat onfvp
znpuvar bcrengvba va anab frpbaqf, v.r., ovyyvbaguf bs n frpbaq.…
[R]kcrevzragny gvzr-funevat flfgrzf unir abj qrzbafgengrq gung
zhygvcyr-npprff pncnovyvgl sbe ynetr-fpnyr qvtvgny pbzchgref vf
cbffvoyr gb nyybj sbe vasbezngvba vachg/bhgchg ng obgu gur rkrphgvir
naq bcrengbe fgngvbaf qvfgevohgrq nebhaq gur jbeyq.… [Naq] irel
fubegyl pbybe pngubqr enl ghor qvfcynl jvyy or ninvynoyr sbe pbzchgre
bhgchg.
Yngre, nsgre uvf svefg lrne va gur Juvgr Ubhfr nf Evpuneq Avkba’f
Angvbany Frphevgl Nqivfbe, Xvffvatre nggrzcgrq gb bognva fhpu n pbzchgre
sbe uvf bja hfr. Gur PVN qravrq gur erdhrfg, cerfhznoyl orpnhfr Xvffvatre
jvgubhg n pbzchgre jnf nf zhpu nf gur vagryyvtrapr pbzzhavgl pbhyq
unaqyr.
Urael Xvffvatre arire ergverq. Abe qvq ur rire fgbc jbeelvat nobhg gur
shgher bs uhznavgl. Fhpu n zna jnf uneqyl tbvat gb vtaber bar bs gur zbfg
pbafrdhragvny grpuabybtvpny oernxguebhtuf bs uvf yngre yvsr: gur qrirybczrag
naq qrcyblzrag bs trarengvir negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr. Vaqrrq, gur gnfx bs
haqrefgnaqvat gur vzcyvpngvbaf bs guvf anfprag grpuabybtl pbafhzrq n
fvtavsvpnag cbegvba bs Xvffvatre’f svany lrnef.
Trarfvf, Xvffvatre’f svany obbx, jnf pb-nhguberq jvgu gjb rzvarag
grpuabybtvfgf, Penvt Zhaqvr naq Revp Fpuzvqg, naq vg ornef gur vzcevag bs
gubfr vaabingbef’ vaangr bcgvzvfz. Gur nhgubef ybbx sbejneq gb gur
“ribyhgvba bs Ubzb grpuavphf—n uhzna fcrpvrf gung znl, va guvf arj ntr,
yvir va flzovbfvf jvgu znpuvar grpuabybtl.” NV, gurl nethr, pbhyq fbba or
unearffrq “gb trarengr n arj onfryvar bs uhzna jrnygu naq jryy-orvat…
[gung] jbhyq ng yrnfg rnfr vs abg ryvzvangr gur fgenvaf bs ynobe, pynff, naq
pbasyvpg gung cerivbhfyl unir gbea uhznavgl ncneg.” Gur nqbcgvba bs NV
zvtug rira yrnq gb “cebsbhaq rdhnyvmngvbaf… npebff enpr, traqre,
angvbanyvgl, cynpr bs ovegu, naq snzvyl onpxtebhaq.”
Arireguryrff, gur ryqrfg nhgube’f pbagevohgvba vf qrgrpgnoyr va gur frevrf
bs jneavatf gung ner gur obbx’f yrvgzbgvs. “Gur nqirag bs negvsvpvny

vagryyvtrapr vf,” gur nhgubef bofreir, “n dhrfgvba bs uhzna fheiviny.… Na
vzcebcreyl pbagebyyrq NV… pbhyq npphzhyngr xabjyrqtr qrfgehpgviryl.…”
Urer, ercuenfrq sbe Trarfvf ohg vzzrqvngryl erpbtavmnoyr, vf Xvffvatre’f
bevtvany dhrfgvba sebz uvf 2018 Ngynagvp rffnl “Ubj gur Rayvtugrazrag
Raqf”:
[NV’f] bowrpgvir pncnpvgl gb ernpu arj naq npphengr pbapyhfvbaf
nobhg bhe jbeyq ol vauhzna zrgubqf abg bayl qvfehcgf bhe eryvnapr
ba gur fpvragvsvp zrgubq nf vg unf orra chefhrq pbagvahbhfyl sbe svir
praghevrf ohg nyfb punyyratrf gur uhzna pynvz gb na rkpyhfvir be
havdhr tenfc bs ernyvgl. Jung pna guvf zrna? Jvyy gur ntr bs NV abg
bayl snvy gb cebcry uhznavgl sbejneq ohg vafgrnq pngnylmr n erghea gb n
cerzbqrea npprcgnapr bs harkcynvarq nhgubevgl? Va fubeg: ner jr,
zvtug jr or, ba gur cerpvcvpr bs n terng erirefny va uhzna pbtavgvba
—n qnex rayvtugrazrag?
Va jung fgehpx guvf ernqre nf gur obbx’f zbfg cbjreshy frpgvba, gur
nhgubef pbagrzcyngr n qrrcyl gebhoyvat NV nezf enpr. “Vs… rnpu uhzna
fbpvrgl jvfurf gb znkvzvmr vgf havyngreny cbfvgvba,” gur nhgubef jevgr, “gura
gur pbaqvgvbaf jbhyq or frg sbe n cflpubybtvpny pbagrfg orgjrra eviny
zvyvgnel sbeprf naq vagryyvtrapr ntrapvrf, gur yvxrf bs juvpu uhznavgl unf
arire snprq orsber. Gbqnl, va gur lrnef, zbaguf, jrrxf, naq qnlf yrnqvat hc
gb gur neeviny bs gur svefg fhcrevagryyvtrapr, n frphevgl qvyrzzn bs rkvfgragvny
angher njnvgf.”
Vs jr ner nyernql jvgarffvat “n pbzcrgvgvba gb ernpu n fvatyr, cresrpg,
hadhrfgvbanoyl qbzvanag vagryyvtrapr,” gura jung ner gur yvxryl bhgpbzrf?
Gur nhgubef raivfvba fvk fpranevbf, ol zl pbhag, abar bs gurz ragvpvat:
1. Uhznavgl jvyy ybfr pbageby bs na rkvfgragvny enpr orgjrra zhygvcyr
npgbef genccrq va n frphevgl qvyrzzn.
2. Uhznavgl jvyy fhssre gur rkrepvfr bs fhcerzr urtrzbal ol n ivpgbe
haunearffrq ol gur purpxf naq onynaprf genqvgvbanyyl arrqrq gb
thnenagrr n zvavzhz bs frphevgl sbe bguref.
3. Gurer jvyy abg or whfg bar fhcerzr NV ohg engure zhygvcyr

vafgnagvngvbaf bs fhcrevbe vagryyvtrapr va gur jbeyq.
4. Gur pbzcnavrf gung bja naq qrirybc NV znl nppehr gbgnyvmvat fbpvny,
rpbabzvp, zvyvgnel, naq cbyvgvpny cbjre.
5. NV zvtug svaq gur terngrfg eryrinapr naq zbfg jvqrfcernq naq
qhenoyr rkcerffvba abg va angvbany fgehpgherf ohg va eryvtvbhf barf.
6. Hapbagebyyrq, bcra-fbhepr qvsshfvba bs gur arj grpuabybtl pbhyq
tvir evfr gb fznyyre tnatf be gevorf jvgu fhofgnaqneq ohg fgvyy
fhofgnagvny NV pncnpvgl.
Xvffvatre jnf qrrcyl pbaprearq nobhg fpranevbf fhpu nf gurfr, naq uvf
rssbeg gb nibvq gurz qvq abg raq jvgu gur jevgvat bs guvf obbx. Vg vf ab frperg
gung gur svany rssbeg bs uvf yvsr—juvpu fnccrq uvf erznvavat fgeratgu va gur
zbaguf nsgre uvf uhaqerqgu oveguqnl—jnf gb vavgvngr n cebprff bs NV nezf
yvzvgngvba gnyxf orgjrra gur Havgrq Fgngrf naq Puvan, cerpvfryl va gur ubcr
bs niregvat fhpu qlfgbcvna bhgpbzrf.
Gur pbapyhfvba bs Trarfvf vf hazvfgnxnoyl Xvffvatrevna:
Jung fbzr frr nf na napube gb fgrnql bhefryirf va gur fgbez, bguref
frr nf n yrnfu ubyqvat hf onpx. Jung fbzr cenvfr nf arprffnel fgrcf
gbjneq n cvaanpyr bs uhzna cbgragvny, bguref frr nf n urnqybat ehfu
vagb na nolff.
Va guvf pnfr, vafgvapgvir rzbgvbany qviretraprf—naq gur
fhowrpgvir yvarf gung ner qenja ol nyy cnegvrf—jvyy perngr na
hacerqvpgnoyr naq pbzohfgvoyr fvghngvba. Vapernfvatyl fgnex cbfvgvbaf
bs cbgragvny “jvaaref” naq “ybfref” jvyy vagrafvsl gur cerffher bs
gurfr pvephzfgnaprf. Gur srneshy jvyy fybj gurve bja qrirybczrag
naq fnobgntr gung bs bguref. Gur birepbasvqrag jvyy qvfthvfr gurve
cbjref naq, va frperg, fcrrq hc gurve jbex. Gur gvzryvar bs pbzvat
pevfrf jvyy or nppryrengrq orlbaq cevbe uhzna rkcrevrapr; dhvpxyl,
jr jvyy or rathysrq, naq vg vf abg pyrne jurgure be ubj jr jvyy
fheivir.
Gur grpuabybtvfg’f unovghny erfcbafr gb fhpu sberobqvatf vf gb erzvaq hf
bs gur gnatvoyr orarsvgf bs NV, juvpu ner nyernql irel boivbhf va gur ernyz

bs zrqvpny fpvrapr. V qb abg qvfnterr. Va zl ivrj, NycunSbyq—n arheny-
argjbex-onfrq zbqry gung cerqvpgf guerr-qvzrafvbany cebgrva fgehpgherf—
jnf n sne zber vzcbegnag oernxguebhtu guna PungTCG. Lrg zrqvpny fpvrapr
znqr pbzcnenoyr nqinaprf va gur gjragvrgu praghel. Gur jbeyq jnef naq
gur Ubybpnhfg arireguryrff bppheerq, rira nf nagvovbgvpf, arj inppvarf, naq
pbhagyrff bgure gurencrhgvpf jrer qvfpbirerq naq znqr jvqryl ninvynoyr.
Gur prageny ceboyrz bs grpuabybtvpny cebterff znavsrfgrq vgfrys va Urael
Xvffvatre’f yvsrgvzr. Ahpyrne svffvba jnf qvfpbirerq va Oreyva ol gjb
Trezna purzvfgf, Bggb Unua naq Sevgm Fgenffznaa, va 1938. Vg jnf
rkcynvarq gurbergvpnyyl (naq anzrq) ol gur Nhfgevna-obea culfvpvfgf Yvfr
Zrvgare naq ure arcurj Bggb Eboreg Sevfpu va 1939. Gur cbffvovyvgl bs n
ahpyrne punva ernpgvba yrnqvat gb “ynetr-fpnyr cebqhpgvba bs raretl naq
enqvbnpgvir ryrzragf, hasbeghangryl nyfb creuncf gb ngbzvp obzof” jnf gur
vafvtug bs gur Uhatnevna culfvpvfg Yró Fmvyáeq. Gur cbffvovyvgl gung fhpu n
punva ernpgvba zvtug nyfb or unearffrq va n ahpyrne ernpgbe gb trarengr urng
jnf nyfb erpbtavmrq ng gung gvzr. Lrg vg gbbx yvggyr zber guna svir lrnef gb
ohvyq gur svefg ngbzvp obzo, jurernf vg jnf abg hagvy 1951 gung gur svefg
ahpyrne cbjre fgngvba jnf bcrarq.
Nfx lbhefrys: Juvpu qvq uhzna orvatf ohvyq zber bs va gur cnfg rvtugl
lrnef: ahpyrne jneurnqf be ahpyrne cbjre fgngvbaf? Gbqnl gurer ner
nccebkvzngryl 12,500 ahpyrne jneurnqf va gur jbeyq, naq gur ahzore vf
pheeragyl evfvat nf Puvan nqqf encvqyl gb vgf ahpyrne nefrany. Ol pbagenfg,
gurer ner 436 ahpyrne ernpgbef va bcrengvba. Va nofbyhgr grezf ahpyrne
ryrpgevpvgl trarengvba crnxrq va 2006, jvgu gur funer bs gbgny jbeyq
ryrpgevpvgl cebqhpgvba gung vf ahpyrne qrpyvavat sebz 15.5% va 1996 gb 8.6%
va 2022, cnegyl nf n erfhyg bs cbyvgvpny bireernpgvbaf gb n fznyy ahzore bs
ahpyrne nppvqragf jubfr vzcnpgf ba uhzna urnygu naq gur raivebazrag
jrer artyvtvoyr pbzcnerq gb gur rssrpgf bs pneoba qvbkvqr rzvffvbaf sebz
sbffvy shryf.
Gur yrffba bs Urael Xvffvatre’f yvsrgvzr vf pyrne. Grpuabybtvpny
nqinaprf pna unir obgu oravta naq znyvta pbafrdhraprf, qrcraqvat ba
ubj jr pbyyrpgviryl qrpvqr gb rkcybvg gurz. Negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr vf bs
pbhefr qvssrerag sebz ahpyrne svffvba va n ubfg bs jnlf. Ohg vg jbhyq or n
tenir reebe gb nffhzr gung jr funyy hfr guvf arj grpuabybtl zber sbe
cebqhpgvir guna sbe cbgragvnyyl qrfgehpgvir checbfrf.
Vg jnf guvf xvaq bs vafvtug, obea bs uvfgbevpny nf jryy nf crefbany

rkcrevrapr, gung vafcverq Urael Xvffvatre gb qribgr fb zhpu bs uvf yvsr gb
gur fghql bs jbeyq beqre, naq gur nibvqnapr bs jbeyq jne. Vg jnf jung znqr
uvz ernpg jvgu fhpu nynpevgl—naq pbaprea—gb gur erprag oernxguebhtuf va
negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr. Naq vg vf jul guvf cbfguhzbhf choyvpngvba vf nf
vzcbegnag nf nalguvat ur jebgr va gur pbhefr bs uvf ybat naq pbafrdhragvny
yvsr.
BKSBEQ
WHYL 2024

VA ZRZBEVNZ: URAEL N. XVFFVATRE
BA ABIRZORE 29, 2023, Qe. Urael N. Xvffvatre cnffrq njnl ng gur ntr bs
bar uhaqerq. Na vafcvengvba gb nyy jub xarj uvz, ur jbexrq gb gur irel
raq ba guvf ibyhzr, uvf gjragl-frpbaq obbx. Qhevat bhe serdhrag zrrgvatf
va uvf svany lrne bs yvsr, ur jbhyq svezyl vafvfg ba gur vzcbegnapr bs bhe
fhowrpg naq ba gur hetrag arrq gb oebnqpnfg vgf zrffntr. Jr, nf uvf gjb
pbnhgubef, jrer nzbat gur ynfg crbcyr gb frr naq fcrnx jvgu uvz va gur qnlf
orsber uvf qrngu. Va abj pbapyhqvat guvf cebwrpg ba uvf orunys naq ng uvf
erdhrfg, jr unir fgevirq gb cerfreir gur bevtvanyvgl bs uvf gubhtug naq gur
evatvat grabe bs uvf ibvpr ba n znggre bs gur hgzbfg vzcbegnapr gb gur shgher
bs uhznavgl. Gb svavfu jung ur fgnegrq, fb gung guvf svany yvgrenel haqregnxvat
qbrf abg qvr jvgu uvz ohg yvirf ba va gur jbeyq jvgubhg uvz, vf ohg n fznyy
pbagevohgvba va uvf zrzbel.
Nsgre univat qbar fb zhpu gb ohvyq bhe jbeyq, ur fcrag uvf svany ubhef va
gur ivgny rssbeg gb fnir vg. Vaqrrq, uvf svany jevggra jbeq vf n erdhrfg sbe nyy
uhznavgl gb pbagvahr gur infg cebwrpg bs frphevat gur shgher bs bhe fcrpvrf.
Va gur zvqqyr lrnef bs gur cerivbhf praghel, Qe. Xvffvatre jnf n puvrs
nepuvgrpg va gur cuvybfbcuvpny naq qvcybzngvp rssbeg gb fuvryq uhznavgl sebz
ngbzvp naavuvyngvba—gur gjragvrgu praghel’f rapbhagre jvgu gur tevz
ernyvgvrf bs rkvfgragvny evfx. Guvf pbhentrbhf qrsraqre ntnvafg gung evfx
qrcnegf whfg nf n arj evfx abj neevirf. Uvf yvsr raqf whfg nf n arj sbez bs
yvsr ortvaf. Nf jr snpr gur qnja bs gur ntr bs NV, jr ner pbtavmnag bs ubj
srj orfvqrf Qe. Xvffvatre—fghqrag bs gur avargrragu praghel, znfgre bs gur
gjragvrgu, naq benpyr bs gur gjragl-svefg—unir orra nf jryy-cbfvgvbarq nf
ur gb ynl gur tebhaqjbex sbe bhe shgher.
Qe. Xvffvatre jnf svefg naq sberzbfg n cuvybfbcure bs uvfgbel. Rzretvat
sebz uvf qrrc vairfgvtngvbaf ba gur fhowrpg bs gentrql jnf n yvsrybat dhrfg
gb qrzbafgengr gung vqrnyvfz bs urneg pbhyq or pbzcngvoyr jvgu, naq

raaboyvat bs, ernyvfz bs zvaq. Bar pbhyq ubyq, va gur sbezhyngvba bs gur
Serapu jevgre Ebznva Ebyynaq, obgu gur “crffvzvfz bs vagryyrpg” naq gur
“bcgvzvfz bs jvyy.” Jurer gur bcgvzvfg nfcverf gb nffherq uhzna pbageby bs
bhe nssnvef, gur crffvzvfg frrf bhe pbaqvgvba nf qrgrezvarq ol sbeprf orlbaq
bhe pbageby: gur ynjf bs angher naq gur plpyrf bs uvfgbel.
Pregnvayl, ur xarj nyy gbb jryy ubj n sreirag vqrnyvfz pna or gnxra
nqinagntr bs ol vqrbybthrf jvgubhg erzbefr va gur fcvyyvat bs oybbq be
urfvgnapl
va
gur
rasbeprzrag
bs
zvtug.
Snfpvfz,
Pbzzhavfz,
gbgnyvgnevnavfz, zvyvgnag eryvtvbhf snangvpvfz—nyy unir ynvq pynvz gb gur
zbfg vqrnyvfgvp raqf chefhrq va bhe uvfgbel. Svefg n ivpgvz bs, gura n zvyvgnel
naq qvcybzngvp pbzongnag ntnvafg, fhpu vauhzna rkprffrf, ur haqregbbx gb
uryc erohvyq gur jbeyq narj, ngbc n sbhaqngvba bs beqre jvgubhg funzr naq
fnsrgl jvgubhg thvyg. Guebhtu uvf npgvir znantrzrag bs vagreangvbany
nssnvef, Qe. Xvffvatre fgrrerq uvf nqbcgrq pbhagel—naq gur jbeyq—guebhtu
hapregnva hcurninyf, tebhaqvat uvzfrys va gur uneq fbvyf bs uvfgbevpny snpg
naq angvbany vagrerfg.
Oevyyvnag nf ur jnf nobhg gur fryrpgvir arprffvgl bs ernyvfz, Qe. Xvffvatre
jnf nyfb na vqrnyvfg—erfcrpgvat, nf uvf ovbtencure Avnyy Srethfba chgf vg,
“gur ebyr bs uhzna serrqbz, pubvpr, naq ntrapl va funcvat gur jbeyq.” Va
gurbel naq guebhtu cenpgvpr, ur qrzbafgengrq uvf oryvrs gung uhznaf qb abg,
naq pnaabg, yvir nf vs gur shgher vf varivgnoyr. Va uvf fravbe gurfvf ng Uneineq,
Gur Zrnavat bs Uvfgbel, 27-lrne-byq Urael Xvffvatre tenccyrq jvgu gur
fnzr cuvybfbcuvpny qrongr gung abj navzngrf uvf ynfg jbex: “Jungrire
bar’f pbaprcgvba nobhg gur arprffvgl bs riragf, [naq]… ubjrire jr znl
rkcynva npgvbaf va ergebfcrpg, gurve nppbzcyvfuzrag bppheerq jvgu gur vaare
pbaivpgvba bs pubvpr.”
Gb uvz vg jnf abg pregnva gung uhznavgl jbhyq fheivir vauhzna qrfvtaf
pensgrq sebz gur sverf bs bhe bja sbetr. Snprq jvgu—naq oheqrarq ol—gur
qnhagvat cebfcrpg bs ahpyrne pngnfgebcur, ur fhpphzorq arvgure gb gur
sngnyvfz bs qrgrezvavfz abe gb cebcurpvrf bs qbbz. Tenagrq, rkvfgragvny
srnef pbhyq tvir evfr gb avuvyvfz, ohg gurl pbhyq nyfb vashfr gur orfg nzbat
hf jvgu gur arrqrq sbeprshyarff gb qrsl rivy naq gb qrsraq jung jbhyq arrq
gb or cerfreirq sbe gur shgher bs bhe fcrpvrf. Va gur rneyl 1950f, nf n lbhat
cebsrffbe ng Uneineq, ur cnegvpvcngrq va n frg bs zrrgvatf ng juvpu yrnqvat
fpvragvfgf naq npnqrzvpf yvxr uvzfrys tngurerq gb qvfphff naq qrongr gur
cbgragvny pbafrdhraprf bs, naq gur zrnfherf arrqrq va beqre gb cerirag,

ahpyrne jnesner. Sebz gubfr zrrgvatf, qbpgevarf rzretrq gung unir fvapr
xrcg bhe jbeyq fnsr sebz gur cnegvpvcnagf’ jbefg srnef.
Qrpnqrf yngre, pbairefvat jvgu gur gjb bs hf, ur jbhyq fcrnx bsgra
nobhg gubfr zrrgvatf—gurve fgehpgher, gurve checbfr, naq gurve ergebfcrpgvir
vzcbegnapr. Uvf ivrj hagvy gur raq erznvarq gur fnzr, ng bapr haerfvtarq
gb gur znepu bs sngr naq hafhofpevorq gb nal ivfvba bs hgbcvn. Gur fnzr
onynapr bognvaf va NV nf va gur ahpyrne pbagrkg: Fznyy tebhcf bs qrqvpngrq
vaqvivqhnyf pna nygre uvfgbel ol fgrccvat va naq znavsrfgvat gurve inyhrf. Ng
gur fnzr gvzr, ubjrire, naq ab znggre gur travhf bs gur fpvragvfgf jub jrer
ohvyqvat arj vagryyvtraprf, ur oryvrirq gung gurve genvavat jbhyq abg va vgfrys
fhssvpr gb rafher gur arprffnel zvavzhz bs fnsrgl naq frphevgl va gur
bcrengvba bs gurfr arjrfg vafgehzragf.
Gb gung raq, uvf yrtnpl va NV vf abg yvzvgrq gb cheryl cuvybfbcuvpny naq
fpubyneyl rkcybengvbaf ohg nyfb rapbzcnffrf cenpgvpny cebcbfnyf. N unys
praghel nsgre uvf frperg syvtug gb Orvwvat naq gur fhofrdhrag bcravat bs
eryngvbaf orgjrra gur Havgrq Fgngrf bs Nzrevpn naq gur Crbcyr’f Erchoyvp
bs Puvan, Qe. Xvffvatre gbbx bar zber gevc gb gur Puvarfr pncvgny. Ur jrag
ng gur hetrag naq fcrpvsvp vaivgngvba bs Cerfvqrag Kv Wvacvat gb qvfphff, nf
gur cevapvcny gbcvp, gur evfxf uhznavgl snprf jvgu NV. Vg jnf gur ynfg sbervta
gevc ur jbhyq rire znxr naq uvf svany qvcybzngvp zvffvba.
Vs, va gur cnfg, Qe. Xvffvatre ryringrq gb na neg gur fghql naq cenpgvpr bs
fgngrpensg, gbqnl uvf frnepu sbe nafjref unf ryringrq NV gb n znggre bs zber
guna fpvrapr. Jvgu bar bs hf, naq jvgu Cebsrffbe Qnavry Uhggraybpure bs
ZVG, ur nhguberq Gur Ntr bs NV: Naq Bhe Uhzna Shgher, choyvfurq va
2021, juvpu cerqvpgrq gung gur neeviny bs negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr jbhyq perngr
n arj rcbpu va uvfgbel, fvzvyne va vgf vzcnpg gb gur rvtugrragu-praghel
Rayvtugrazrag sbe vgf novyvgl gb punatr uhzna gubhtug va cebsbhaq naq
harkcrpgrq jnlf. Va guvf arj ntr, ubjrire, engure guna jbexvat sbejneq
sebz dhrfgvbaf cbfrq ol uhznaf, uhznavgl pbasebagf nafjref cebivqrq ol
NV gb dhrfgvbaf gung ab uhzna rire nfxrq. Nf NV pbadhref gur ernyzf bs
uhzna xabjyrqtr, Qe. Xvffvatre fbhtug gb eryl naq gb qenj hcba gur
erfbheprf bs uhzna jvfqbz.
Va guvf ibyhzr, jr rkcyber jvgu Qe. Xvffvatre gur vzcnpg bs NV ba rvtug
qvssrerag nernf bs uhzna npgvivgl naq gubhtug, phyzvangvat jvgu uvf bja
cuvybfbcuvpny nafjre gb gur batbvat frnepu sbe n ivnoyr fgengrtl gb onynapr
orarsvgf naq evfxf. Va chefhvg bs gung tbny, ur rkcyberf gur cebfcrpgf bs n

uhzna pbrkvfgrapr jvgu NV naq, va qhr gvzr, bs uhzna-NV pbribyhgvba. Va
pbaprcghnyyl haybpxvat gur cbffvovyvgl bs n erpbapvyvngvba bs gurfr gjb
fcrpvrf—gur bar betnavp, gur bgure flagurgvp—ur nyfb erirnyf gur arrq sbe n
pubvpr: gb perngr n jbeyq va juvpu NV orpbzrf zber yvxr hf, be bar va juvpu
jr orpbzr zber yvxr NV.
Fvapr gur choyvpngvba bs uvf svefg obbx ba gur ntr bs NV, Qe. Xvffvatre
vapernfvatyl pnzr gb creprvir n yvzvg gb gur hgvyvgl bs ernfba va gur svany qnlf
bs fhpu na ntr. Gb hf uhznaf, rkcynangvbaf orlbaq bhe bja haqrefgnaqvat
—be bhe bja znxvat—pna nccrne hggreyl onssyvat; bhe vafgvapg vf gb
cerfhzr gung gurl ner yrff nqinaprq naq zber cevzvgvir guna bhe fpvragvsvp
rkcynangvbaf, n fgrc onpxjneq naq abg sbejneq. Ohg gung vf n qnatrebhf
nffhzcgvba.
Vs, va gur jbeqf bs Neguhe P. Pynexr, “Nal fhssvpvragyl nqinaprq
grpuabybtl vf vaqvfgvathvfunoyr sebz zntvp,” naq vs zvenpyrf ner ratvarrerq
sebz zngurzngvpf, gur shgher fubhyq or varkcyvpnoyr, orjvyqrevat, rira
zntvpny. Bire gur pbyyrpgvir qrpnqrf gung jr unir xabja Qe. Xvffvatre, ur
unf trarebhfyl gnhtug hf sebz uvf yrneavatf bs fgngrpensg—gung pbzcyrk
ernyz bs uhzna nssnvef—gung nygubhtu ernfba unf orra gur qbzvanag
cnenqvtz guebhtu juvpu uhznaf unir znfgrerq bhe jbeyq, vg pnaabg or gur
cnenqvtz jvgu juvpu jr znfgre bhefryirf.
Zbivat sbejneq, jr fubhyq gurersber abg rkcrpg gb eryl fbyryl ba ernfba
—gur uvfgbevpny shry sbe bhe terngrfg uhzna nqinaprzragf. Ohg arvgure pna
jr shyyl nonaqba vg. Abg hayvxr uvf zbqrengvba orgjrra vqrnyvfz naq
ernyvfz, uvf svany vairfgvtngvbaf vagb bhe shgher npuvrir na rdhvyvoevhz
orgjrra gung rzcvevpny dhnyvgl bs gehgu naq fbzrguvat ryfr—cuvybfbcuvpnyyl
orlbaq ernfba ohg puebabybtvpnyyl ynttvat oruvaq. Whfg nf sbervta
cbyvplznxvat pnaabg nssbeq na rkprff bs rvgure rkgerzr, arvgure pna bhe
senzrjbex sbe gur shgher.
NV, guhf, vf n havdhr punyyratr gung erdhverf guvaxvat gung zvtug frrz, ng
svefg, veengvbany be birejebhtug—naq vaqrrq, gur fpranevbf qrfpevorq va guvf
obbx ner fgnegyvat. Ohg va pbhafryvat hf naq bguref gung ur jnf uvzfrys ohg n
uhzoyr fghqrag obgu bs uhznavgl naq bs vgf yngrfg naq cbgragvnyyl svany
perngvba, ur vzcerffrq hcba hf gung gur terngrfg qnatre cbfrq ol NV jbhyq
or sbe hf gb qrpyner gbb rneyl, be gbb pbzcyrgryl, gung jr haqrefgnaq vg.
Uvf qrcgu bs vagryyrpg naq creprcgvba bs crbcyr ner abg dhnyvgvrf jr
rkcrpg gb rapbhagre ntnva. Jr xabj bs ab bar ryfr jub, ng gur ntr bs 93,

pbhyq znfgre na ragveryl arj naq cerivbhfyl haxabja svryq bs grpuavpny
xabjyrqtr. Jvgu uvf hadhrapunoyr phevbfvgl naq zragny ivgnyvgl, pbhcyrq
jvgu n qribgvba gb jbex naq frafr bs zvffvba, ab cnva bs obql be fcvevg jnf
rire rabhtu gb qnzcra uvf cnffvba sbe cebterff. Ertneqyrff bs gur
vasvezvgvrf bs byq ntr, ur ebfr rnpu qnl jvgu haqrsrngnoyr erfbyir gb zbir
gur jbeyq sbejneq. Uvf vaqbzvgnoyr fgeratgu pnzr, creuncf, sebz uvf
hazngpurq qvfpvcyvar—uneqrarq va lbhgu ol bccerffvba, fphycgrq ol
freivpr va jne, naq grfgrq sbe qrpnqrf ol gur fgevsr bs choyvp yvsr.
Jr ner ohg gjb bs znal jubfr yvirf unir orra funcrq ol guvf
rkgenbeqvanel zna. Jr jvyy zvff uvz qrneyl—ab qbhog, va zber jnlf guna
jr pna abj vzntvar. Qrcnegvat hf ba gur rir bs terng hapregnvagl, ur vf
arrqrq abj zber guna rire. Gung vf jul, sbe guvf obbx, gurer frrzrq ab
gvgyr zber ncg guna Trarfvf—n arj ortvaavat sbe uvz nf sbe nyy uhznaf.
Jurgure uhznavgl fhpprrqf be snvyf, ur jvyy ab ybatre or cerfrag gb jvgarff
gur hygvzngr bhgpbzr bs uvf rssbegf. Ng yrnfg abj jr unir uvf jvfqbz gb
thvqr bhe bja.
—Revp Fpuzvqg naq Penvt Zhaqvr

VAGEBQHPGVBA
N SRJ FUBEG LRNEF ntb, negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr (NV) vaunovgrq n fznyy
pbeare bs gur choyvp qrongr. Gbqnl, sbyybjvat encvq nqinaprf, NV vf n sebag-
cntr gbcvp ng arjf bhgyrgf rireljurer naq na vffhr ba gur zvaqf bs yrnqref
va fpvrapr, ohfvarff, wbheanyvfz, choyvp freivpr, rqhpngvba, naq cbyvgvpf gur
jbeyq bire.
Nf jr frr vg, obgu gur trareny choyvp naq znal rkcregf va gur svryq
pbagvahr gb bireybbx vzcbegnag nfcrpgf bs guvf arj ntr bs NV. Arj sbezf bs
NV naq uhzna erfcbafrf gb gurz pbhyq genafsbez abguvat yrff guna gur
uhzna eryngvbafuvc gb ernyvgl naq gb gehgu, gur rkcybengvba bs xabjyrqtr nf
jryy nf gur culfvpny ribyhgvba bs uhznavgl, gur pbaqhpg bs qvcybznpl, naq
gur vagreangvbany flfgrz. Gurfr ner nzbat gur pehpvny vffhrf bs gur pbzvat
qrpnqrf, naq gurl bhtug gb or gur thvqvat pbapreaf bs yrnqref va rirel
neran.
Gur yngrfg pncnovyvgvrf bs NV, vzcerffvir nf gurl ner, jvyy nccrne jrnx va
uvaqfvtug nf vgf cbjref vapernfr ng na nppryrengvat engr. Cbjref jr unir abg
lrg vzntvarq ner frg gb vashfr bhe qnvyl yvirf. Shgher flfgrzf jvyy snpvyvgngr
rabezbhf naq ynetryl orarsvpvny nqinaprf, vzcebivat bhe urnygu juvyr
trarengvat jrnygu.
Ohg gurfr pncnovyvgvrf pbzr jvgu grpuavpny naq uhzna evfxf, fbzr bs
juvpu ner xabja naq fbzr haxabja. Gbqnl’f grpuabybtvrf nyernql
shapgvba va jnlf gung gurve vairagbef qvq abg cerqvpg, naq guvf cnggrea vf
yvxryl gb pbagvahr. Rnpu sehvgshy erfrnepu cngu gnxra ol bhe fpvragvfgf—naq
gurer jvyy or zber guna bar—pbhyq lvryq arj oenapurf bs hasberfrra
cbjref gung znl be znl abg or pbzcerurafvoyr be orarsvpvny gb uhznaf.
NV frrzf gb pbzcerff uhzna gvzrfpnyrf. Bowrpgf va gur shgher ner pybfre
guna gurl nccrne. Nf whfg bar rknzcyr, znpuvarf jvgu gur novyvgl gb qrsvar
gurve bja bowrpgvirf ner abg sne njnl. Vs jr unir nal ubcr bs xrrcvat hc

jvgu gur evfxf vaibyirq, jr zhfg erfcbaq naq npg jvguva gur fubegrfg
pbaprvinoyr gvzryvar. Pbtavmnag bs gur fgnxrf naq gur hetrapl bs gur gnfx
nurnq, jr abgr urer bayl n srj bs vgf znal snprgf.
Nf uhzna-znpuvar cnegarefuvcf orpbzr hovdhvgbhf, uhznaf jvyy unir
gb qrgrezvar gurfr eryngvbafuvcf’ cebcre angher. Gur nafjref znl or gnxra
sebz gur ybtvp bs frphevgl naq rssvpvrapl, qrevirq ivn gur fghql bs uvfgbel, be
qvfprearq sebz gur qvivar. Vaqvivqhnyf, angvbaf, phygherf, naq snvguf jvyy
arrq gb qrgrezvar gur yvzvgf, vs nal, bs NV’f nhgubevgl bire gehgu. Gurl jvyy
arrq gb qrpvqr jurgure gb nyybj NV gb orpbzr na vagrezrqvnel orgjrra
uhznaf naq ernyvgl. Va guvf pbaarpgvba, gurl jvyy arrq gb pubbfr orgjrra, ba
gur bar unaq, ergnvavat gur genqvgvbany ebyr bs uhzna ragrecevfr (juvyr yvxryl
prqvat yrnqrefuvc gb NV va gur qvfpbirel bs arj xabjyrqtr) naq, ba gur
bgure unaq, nonaqbavat gur ovbybtvpnyyl yvzvgrq uhzna zvaq va snibe bs n
cbgragvnyyl erratvarrerq cnegarefuvc jvgu NV ba gur vagryyrpghny sebagvre. Qb
jr cvpx bhe bowrpgvirf naq unearff NV gb npuvrir gurz, be qb jr yrg NVf
uryc cvpx fbzr bs gur bowrpgvirf gurzfryirf? Zbfg hetragyl, uhznavgl zhfg
tvir uhzna qvtavgl n zbqrea naq fhfgnvanoyr qrsvavgvba gung pna cebivqr n
cuvybfbcuvpny bevragngvba sbe bhe qrpvfvbaf va gur lrnef gb pbzr.
Gur nqirag bs negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr vf, va bhe ivrj, n dhrfgvba bs uhzna
fheiviny. Nf jr rkcynva yngre va guvf obbx, NV’f shgher snphygvrf, bcrengvat ng
vauhzna fcrrqf, jvyy eraqre genqvgvbany erthyngvba hfryrff. Jr jvyy arrq n
shaqnzragnyyl arj sbez bs pbageby. Sbe gur tybony fpvragvsvp pbzzhavgl,
gur vzzrqvngr gnfx vf gb svaq grpuavpny zrnfherf sbe vafgvyyvat vagevafvp
fnsrthneqf va rirel NV flfgrz. Sbe gurve cneg, angvbaf naq vagreangvbany
betnavmngvbaf, bapr gurl unir pbnyrfprq nebhaq n pbafrafhf, zhfg qrirybc
arj cbyvgvpny fgehpgherf sbe zbavgbevat, rasbeprzrag, naq pevfvf erfcbafr.
Gung jvyy erdhver gur erfbyhgvba bs abg bar ohg gjb “nyvtazrag ceboyrzf”:
gur grpuavpny nyvtazrag bs uhzna inyhrf naq vagragvbaf jvgu gur npgvbaf bs
NV, naq gur qvcybzngvp nyvtazrag bs uhznaf jvgu gurve sryybj uhznaf.
Qe. Urael Xvffvatre, bar bs guvf obbx’f pbnhgubef, pybfryl zragberq uvf
gjb pbyynobengbef ba gur ynggre ceboyrz, juvyr gurl—nf cerivbhf fravbe
yrnqref bs Zvpebfbsg naq Tbbtyr—pbnpurq uvz ba gur sbezre. Penvt
Zhaqvr jnf Zvpebfbsg’f puvrs grpuabybtl-cbyvpl yvnvfba gb Jnfuvatgba naq
sbervta tbireazragf jbeyqjvqr, pbapheeragyl birefrrvat Zvpebfbsg
Erfrnepu orsber zber erpragyl nqivfvat gur yrnqrefuvc bs gur erfrnepu
betnavmngvba BcraNV. Revp Fpuzvqg yrq Tbbtyr sbe n qrpnqr orsber

fcraqvat gur arkg qrpnqr sbetvat n argjbex bs gnyrag naq vqrnf ng gur
vagrefrpgvba bs grpuabybtl, cuvynaguebcl, naq frphevgl jvgu gur nvz bs
fnsrthneqvat uhznavgl.
Gur hetrapl bs gur vffhrf gung jr unir pbasebagrq gbtrgure vf fhpu gung,
engure guna jnvgvat sbe n pevfvf, jr qrrz vg vzcrengvir gung bhe fbpvrgl, naq
vaqrrq bhe fcrpvrf, nqqerff gurz cebnpgviryl. Naq, nygubhtu gur pnhfr bs
uhzna fnsrgl vf bar arprffnel pbzcbarag bs n fhpprffshy erfcbafr gb NV, vg
pnaabg nafjre nyy gur dhrfgvbaf gung NV envfrf—sbe, va gur ntr bs NV,
uhznavgl jvyy punatr. Gur dhrfgvba vf jurgure naq gb jung rkgrag jr
uhznaf jvyy pubbfr gb pbagvahr gb nffreg nhgubevgl bire ubj gung punatr
bpphef.

CNEG V
VA GUR ORTVAAVAT

PUNCGRE 1
QVFPBIREL
QVFPBIREL ZNL OR gur fvatyr zbfg rkuvynengvat pncnpvgl bs gur uhzna
fcrpvrf. Qevira ol phevbfvgl, qryvtugrq ol fhecevfr, jr svyy gur inphhzf jr
creprvir naq genafsbez gur dhrfgvbaf jr nfx vagb nafjref. Rkcybengvba vf fb
vagrteny gb bhe frys-qrsvavgvba gung qrfcvgr znavsrfg qnatref naq sehfgengvbaf,
jr unir pbagvahrq, haeryragvat, qbja vgf znal cnguf.
Guebhtubhg uvfgbel, uhzna rkcybengvba bs, va cnegvphyne, bhe culfvpny
raivebazrag unf orra n fgbel bs vzzrafr pbhentr va gur snpr bs frirer evfx.
Uhzna grnzf frggvat bhg ba fhpu raqrnibef jrer bsgra va pbagrfg jvgu gurve
bja zbegnyvgl. Va gur rneyl fvkgrragu praghel, Sreqvanaq Zntryyna’f
pvephzanivtngvba bs gur tybor jnf n guerr-lrne bqlffrl svyyrq jvgu
ivbyrapr, fgneingvba, naq qrngu. Zntryyna’f iblntr jnf gur svefg
fhpprffshyyl gb fgrre n pbhefr nebhaq gur tybor. Va gur cebprff, ur fznfurq
gur raqhenapr erpbeq ba gur uvtu frnf, rfgnoyvfurq gur qvzrafvbaf bs gur
cynarg, naq—gnxvat cynpr nf gur ragrecevfr qvq va gur pbagrkg bs Rhebcrna
pbybavnyvfz—bcrarq gur jnl sbe fbpvny naq rpbabzvp rkpunatr ba na
vagreangvbany fpnyr.
Zbfg bs Zntryyna’f fnvybef erpbtavmrq gurl jrer evfxvat pngnfgebcur.
Gubhtu vg jnf ab ybatre jvqryl oryvrirq gung gur Rnegu jnf syng, vgf
ebhaqarff unq abg orra cebirq nf snpg, naq znal va uvf perj znl unir
srnerq fnvyvat bss gur rqtr bs gur jbeyq.
Obgu ur naq uvf perj jrer njner gurl jbhyq cnl urnivyl sbe nal
zvfgnxra nffhzcgvbaf. Naq vaqrrq gurl qvq ree, naq gurl qvq cnl: Gurl unq
haqrerfgvzngrq gur yratgu bs gurve wbhearl, gur dhnagvgvrf bs sbbq arrqrq gb
fhfgnva gurz, gur qnatref bs znff cbvfbavatf, naq gur evfx bs qnzntrq be
bgurejvfr vabcrengvir fuvcf. Bs gur bevtvany syrrg bs svir irffryf pneelvat

nccebkvzngryl 270 perjzrzoref, bayl bar fbyvgnel fuvc ornevat rvtugrra
tubfgyl fheivibef erghearq gb cbeg va Fcnva. Abg nzbat gurz jnf gurve
pncgnva, jub unq crevfurq nybat gur jnl nsgre orvat uvg va gur yrt ol n
cbvfbarq neebj.1
Va gur 400 lrnef nsgre Zntryyna’f gvzr, rirel pbeare bs gur jbeyq jbhyq
or znccrq—rkprcg Nagnepgvpn, n ynaq nf qrfbyngr nf na nyvra cynarg. Gur
Natyb-Vevfu rkcybere Rearfg Funpxyrgba jbhyq pbzr pybfre guna nalbar
orsber uvz gb ernpuvat gung ynaq’f Fbhgu Cbyr: gur obggbz bs gur jbeyq. Va
1909, jvgu na varkcrevraprq perj naq jvgu fhccbeg sebz ab tbireazrag ohg
bayl n srj cevingr ybnaf naq vaqvivqhny pbagevohgvbaf, Funpxyrgba naq uvf
zra frg gur erpbeq sbe gur ybatrfg fhpu wbhearl naq cnirq gur jnl sbe
rkcyberef nsgre gurz.
Nygubhtu hanoyr gb pynvz ur jnf gur svefg gb ernpu gur Fbhgu Cbyr vgfrys,
Funpxyrgba arireguryrff rnearq gur erfcrpg bs yngre trarengvbaf. Guvf ur qvq
ol cevbevgvmvat uhzna inyhrf bire rkcybengbel nzovgvbaf. Bar lrne vagb gur
rkcrqvgvba, gur grnz zrzoref, unearffrq qnvyl gb fyrqtrf sbe oehgny gra-
ubhe fuvsgf, jrer nqinapvat bayl n srj zvyrf rnpu qnl. Nygubhtu gurl unq
rabhtu sbbq gb ernpu gur Cbyr, gur erznvavat fhccyl jbhyq abg fhssvpr gb
frr gurz onpx gb gurve fuvc.
Gura naq gurer, jvguva 97 zvyrf bs gevhzcu, Funpxyrgba, engure guna
evfxvat gur yvirf bs uvf zra, znqr gur qrpvfvba gb ghea onpx. “Jr unir qbar
bhe orfg,” ur qrpynerq va uvf wbheany.2 Ba gurve ergerng, Funpxyrgba bssrerq
uvf bar qnvyl ovfphvg gb Senax Jvyq, na nvyvat perj zrzore, jub jbhyq
jevgr va uvf qvnel gung “Nyy gur zbarl gung jnf rire zvagrq jbhyq abg unir
obhtug gung ovfphvg, naq gur erzrzoenapr bs gung fnpevsvpr jvyy arire yrnir
zr.”3
Haqrgreerq ol snvyher, Funpxyrgba jbhyq yngre znxr shegure rkcrqvgvbaf
gb gur Fbhgu Cbyr. Sbe qrpnqrf, n fgbel (yngre qrohaxrq) pvephyngrq gung ur
unq cynprq gur sbyybjvat nq va gur Ybaqba Gvzrf:
Zra Jnagrq: Sbe unmneqbhf wbhearl. Fznyy jntrf, ovggre pbyq, ybat
zbaguf bs pbzcyrgr qnexarff, pbafgnag qnatre, fnsr erghea qbhogshy.
Ubabhe naq erpbtavgvba va pnfr bs fhpprff.4
Gur nq znl unir orra ncbpelcuny, ohg gur fnpevsvpr vg vyyhfgengrf jnf abg.

Gurfr jrer gur ernyvgvrf bs rkcybengvba bayl n praghel ntb: Bhe cebterff ba
gur sebagvre jnf yvzvgrq ol gur ahzore bs oenir fbhyf jub jbhyq npprcg
fhpu ybat bqqf.
Creuncf va erpbtavgvba bs gurfr unmneqf, fbzr tbireazragf fnj svg gb
fcbafbe naq erjneq rkcrqvgvbaf bs qvfpbirel, naq gurfr iragherf orpnzr
cneg bs gur tnzr bs vagreangvbany pbzcrgvgvba. Zntryyna’f wbhearl, sbe
vafgnapr, jnf qrsvarq ol cbyvgvpf. Hanoyr gb frpher svanapvny fhccbeg sebz
gur xvat bs Cbeghtny—uvf bja fbirervta—Zntryyna unq qrsrpgrq naq
fnvyrq vafgrnq haqre gur zber sbegupbzvat fcbafbefuvc bs gur Fcnavfu
pebja. Nsgre uvf qrngu, gur perj pubfr n Fcnavneq, Whna Fronfgváa Rypnab,
gb nffhzr pbzznaq. Ba gur erghea iblntr, qrfcrengr naq iveghnyyl orersg bs
sbbq naq fhccyvrf, Rypnab nggrzcgrq n fgbc va gur Pncr Ireqr vfynaqf—n
Cbeghthrfr pbybal bss gur pbnfg bs Jrfg Nsevpn—fraqvat guvegrra perj
nfuber gb artbgvngr jvgu gur pbybavny tbireabe. Ohg gurve erdhrfg jnf zrg
jvgu uhzvyvngvat erwrpgvba.
Jvgu n oebxra urneg ohg abj rira fgebatre erfbyir gb qrzbafgengr
Cbeghtny’f sbyyl naq Fcnva’f npuvrirzrag, Rypnab beqrerq gur napube envfrq
naq pbagvahrq bajneq ubzr. (Ur yrsg gur zrzoref bs uvf nqinapr zvffvba
oruvaq va hasevraqyl greevgbel.) Svanyyl pbzcyrgvat gur wbhearl—naq
shysvyyvat Zntryyna’f ivfvba—Rypnab jebgr gb gur Fcnavfu xvat, ol abj gur
Ubyl Ebzna Rzcrebe naq gur jbeyq’f zbfg cbjreshy fbirervta:
Lbhe Znwrfgl jvyy xabj orggre guna nalbar gung jung jr bhtug zbfg
gb inyhr naq ubyq ba gb vf gung jr unir qvfpbirerq naq fnvyrq gur
jubyr ebhaqarff bs gur jbeyq, gung tbvat gb gur Jrfg, jr unir
erghearq sebz gur Rnfg.5
Riraghnyyl, qnhagyrff uhznaf naq gurve cbyvgvpny fcbafbef jbhyq chfu
gur cebwrpg bs qvfpbirel nygbtrgure orlbaq bhe rneguyl fcurer. Jr jbhyq
haqregnxr abg whfg gb fghql gur cynargf—nyernql na batbvat rkrepvfr sbe
zvyyraavn—ohg gb srry gurve fhesnprf orarngu bhe srrg. Sbyybjvat gur Frpbaq
Jbeyq Jne, gur “fcnpr enpr” orgjrra gur Havgrq Fgngrf naq gur Fbivrg
Havba, n pbzcyrzrag bs gur trbcbyvgvpny Pbyq Jne, oebhtug gjb
fhcrecbjref vagb n pbzcrgvgvba gb fraq uhznaf jurer gurl unq arire
iragherq orsber.

Gur nfgebanhgf gurzfryirf pbhyq or pbafvqrerq cvbarref, ohg abar bs gur
iragherf vagb fcnpr haqregnxra ol Zbfpbj naq Jnfuvatgba jrer gur
cebqhpg bs na vaqvivqhnyvfgvp tnzoyr bs yvsr naq sbeghar. Engure, rnpu jnf n
pbbeqvangrq qvcybzngvp naq zvyvgnel zvffvba, cbjrerq ol rabezbhf
vairfgzragf bs zbarl, gvzr, naq yngvghqr sbe rkcrevzragngvba. Va gur cnfg
friragl lrnef, zber guna 600 nfgebanhgf unir cvreprq gur urniraf naq
gbherq fcnpr, fbzr bs jubz unir tbar snegure gb pvepyr, beovg, be jnyx ba
gur zbba.6 Guhf qvq H.F.-Fbivrg evinyel oevat hf ng bapr gb gur oevax bs
ahpyrne naavuvyngvba naq hcjneq gb gur fgnef nobir.
Zber guna n praghel orsber gur Ntr bs Qvfpbirel—nf gur rneyl zbqrea
ren bs Zntryyna, Infpb qn Tnzn, Nzrevtb Irfchppv, naq fb znal bguref
pnzr gb or pnyyrq—
Puvarfr nzovgvbaf ba gur uvtu frnf unq orra hazngpurq sbe gurve fpbcr
naq fpnyr. Qjnesvat gur erfbheprf naq fhccbeg cebivqrq gb rkcyberef ol
tbireazragf va gur Jrfg, gur “gernfher syrrg” bs Murat Ur, gur terng Zvat-
ren nqzveny, pbzcevfrq qbmraf, naq fbzrgvzrf rira uhaqerqf, bs fgngr-bs-
gur-neg fuvcf pneelvat graf bs gubhfnaqf bs fnvybef, fbyqvref, qvcybzngf, naq
zrepunagf. Rnpu bs gur Puvarfr nqzveny’f iragherf gbbx gjb lrnef. Nsgre
anivtngvat gur Cnpvsvp jngref arne Puvan’f fbhgurnfgrea fuberf, uvf fuvcf
cebprrqrq jrfgjneq gb gur Onl bs Oratny, gur Vaqvna Bprna, gur Nenovna
Frn, gur Erq Frn, naq svanyyl gur Fjnuvyv pbnfg bs Rnfg Nsevpn, va
rkcybengvbaf fgergpuvat guebhtu arneyl guerr qrpnqrf sebz 1405 gb 1433.7
Murat Ur’f iblntrf, pybfre va gurve bevtvaf naq zbgvirf gb gur zbqrea
Nzrevpna naq Fbivrg fcnpr cebtenzf guna gb Jrfgrea rdhvinyragf ng uvf
gvzr, jrer abg fb zhpu yrncf vagb gur haxabja nf gur evpu cebqhpgf bs
vzcrevny fgngrpensg. Ohg gurerva nyfb yvrf n ceboyrz. Gur irel guvatf arrqrq
gb rafher na rkcrqvgvba’f fhpprff, rira jvguva n jryy-erfbheprq fgngr, pna
qbbz vgf pnhfr va gur ybat eha. Cbyvgvpf punatr. Cevbevgvrf fuvsg. Uhzna
cngvrapr vf rnfvyl rkunhfgrq. Gur rkcraqvgherf ynivfurq ba gur “gernfher
syrrg” jrer fb terng gung snpgvbaf jvguva gur Zvat pbheg ortna gb pnfgvtngr
gur rzcrebe’f shaqvat bs gurfr zvffvbaf. Cbyvgvpny frgonpxf naq angheny
qvfnfgref rknpreongrq gur haerfg. Va gur raq, gur Puvarfr tbireazrag
qrpvqrq gb qrfgebl be vagragvbanyyl artyrpg vgf orfg fuvcf, nybat jvgu znal
erpbeqf bs Murat Ur’f iblntrf, yrfg n fvzvyne ivfvbanel nevfr ntnva gb
pncgvingr naq frqhpr gur pbhagel’f yrnqrefuvc. Gur fuvcf ebggrq njnl, naq

gur yvxrf bs gubfr irffryf jrer abg frra ntnva sbe 400 lrnef.
Nanybtbhfyl, nsgre gur H.F. jba gur fcnpr enpr, jvgubhg n pbzcrgvgbe gb
zbgvingr vgf angvbany rssbegf, fhccbeg va Jnfuvatgba sbe fcnpr rkcybengvba
ynathvfurq naq gur ohqtrg bs gur Angvbany Nrebanhgvpf naq Fcnpr
Nqzvavfgengvba (ANFN) jnf phg. Bire gur fcna bs svir qrpnqrf, Nzrevpn’f
pncnpvgl sbe perjrq fcnprsyvtug fgrnqvyl qrtenqrq. Sebz orvat gur fbyr
angvba ba Rnegu pncnoyr bs ynaqvat uhznaf ba gur zbba, gur H.F. sryy gb
univat gur jurerjvguny bayl gb genafcbeg uhznaf gb “ybj Rnegu beovg,” naq
gura, svanyyl, ybfg gur novyvgl gb gnxr nalbar gb beovg ng nyy.
Nzrevpn’f erchgngvba jnf erfphrq bayl ol gur rssbegf bs cevingr rkcyberef
jub, yrq ol gur nrebfcnpr pbzcnal FcnprK, erivirq pbfzvp nzovgvbaf va
gur Jrfg. Gung pbzcnal’f rssbegf unir ol abj yrq fbzr gb gur uvguregb
havzntvanoyr cbvag bs ivrjvat bhe pybfrfg pryrfgvny arvtuobef abg nf
grzcbenel qrfgvangvbaf, ohg nf creznarag ubzrf. N praghel ntb, Funpxyrgba
urycrq rfgnoyvfu n uhzna cerfrapr ba Rnegu’f fbhgureazbfg cbyr. Gbqnl,
Funpxyrgba Pengre—n qrcerffvba, fb anzrq va uvf ubabe, ng gur fbhgu cbyr
abg bs Nagnepgvpn ohg bs gur zbba—vf gur cynaarq fvgr bs uhznaxvaq’f arkg
bhgcbfg.
Gur rkvfgrapr bs nygreangvir onpxref unf orra pevgvpny gb fhfgnvarq
rkcybengvba. Va Zntryyna’f Rhebcr, vs bar zbanepu cebirq hafhccbegvir, na
rkcybere pbhyq envfr svanapvat sebz nabgure. Ol gur gjragvrgu praghel,
Rearfg Funpxyrgba, nfcvevat gb pynvz gur Fbhgu Cbyr sbe n qjvaqyvat Oevgvfu
rzcver qvfgenpgrq ol gur 1914 bhgoernx bs Jbeyq Jne V naq hanoyr gb envfr
gur arprffnel shaqf sebz gur Pebja, jbhyq ghea ynetryl gb cevingr qbabef.
Gur evfr bs cevingr, sbe-cebsvg pbecbengvbaf—juvpu nyybj gur cbbyvat bs
vairfgzrag naq evfx—haybpxrq nqqvgvbany cbffvovyvgvrf. Bar jbaqref jung
zvtug unir orpbzr bs Murat Ur naq uvf fhpprffbef vs gurl unq unq fhpu
bcgvbaf.
RAGRE NV
Sbe gur ybatrfg crevbq va Jrfgrea uvfgbel, gur rkcybengvba bs ernyvgl jnf
sbphfrq ba trbtencuvpny ragvgvrf—bhe cynarg naq bhe pybfrfg pryrfgvny
arvtuobef. Nf uhznaf fgrnqvyl npdhverq znfgrel bire bhe vzzrqvngr
culfvpny raivebazrag—ba ynaq, ng frn, naq va gur urniraf nobir—vg jnf

bayl n znggre bs gvzr orsber bhe erfgyrff uhzna vafgvapg sbe qvfpbirel jbhyq
rkcnaq vgf enatr sebz gur fcnpr nebhaq hf gb gur vqrnf jvguva hf. Gbqnl, jr
fgnaq ng gur sebagvre abg bs culfvpny ohg bs vagryyrpghny rkcybengvba.
Gur qrirybczrag bs negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr unf hfurerq va n arj ren bs
qvfpbirel. Jurer NV vf vagrtengrq vagb culfvpny flfgrzf, ebobgvp frafbef
nffhzr ebyrf gung jbhyq rneyvre unir orra cresbezrq ol uhznaf, gurerol
hagrgurevat uhzna qvfpbirel sebz culfvpny qnatre gb gur rkcybere naq guhf
zhygvcylvat gur enaxf bs rntre qrirybcref naq vairfgbef.
NV nyfb qbrf abg rkcrevrapr srne, naq fb vg vf haqnhagrq ol ernyvgl’f infg
rkcnafr. Abe qbrf vg rkcrevrapr funzr, naq fb vg haurfvgngvatyl snvyf—ohg
fb dhvpxyl pna na NV erpnyvoengr gung, guebhtu pbafgnag vzcebivfngvba naq
rkcrevzragngvba, vg pna nppbzzbqngr uvtu snvyher engrf jvgubhg pnhfvat
frgonpxf gb vgf nsberfnvq qrirybcref naq vairfgbef.
Gbqnl, NV qvfpbirel vf n cebwrpg yrq nyzbfg rkpyhfviryl ol cevingr
pbecbengvbaf naq ragercerarhef, jvgu fgngrf rzretvat nf fhccyrzragnel
onpxref. Rira jvgubhg pbzcyrzragnel tbireazrag npgvba, ubjrire, NV
tebjgu naq rkcnafvba ner yvxryl gb erznva shryrq ol na nohaqnapr bs
qvirefr fbheprf bs pncvgny. Gehr, va gbqnl’f fgvyy-rneyl cunfrf bs
qrirybczrag, fvtavsvpnag nzbhagf bs uhzna pncvgny naq fbpvrgny fhccbeg
znl pbagvahr gb or arrqrq; ohg fhfgnvavat NV rkcybengvba va gur shgher znl
prnfr gb or n svfpny naq cbyvgvpny qenva ba gur fbpvrgvrf gung qrcybl vg. Nofrag
hasberfrra qrirybczragf naq hayvxr va rneyvre ntrf bs rkcybengvba—nyy bs
juvpu raqrq orsber gurl unq npuvrirq gurve shyy cbgragvny—jr pna rkcrpg
qvfpbirel bs naq jvgu NV gb pbagvahr hanongrq.
Arireguryrff, gubhtu NV vf cnegvnyyl hafunpxyrq sebz rneyvre pbafgenvagf
ba qvfpbirel, vg pnaabg rfpncr gurz nyy—cnegvphyneyl nf vgf rssrpgf orpbzr
zber cebabhaprq. Gur gbyrenapr sbe evfx nzbat qrzbpengvp fbpvrgvrf naq
gur hapregnva shgher bs vagreangvbany tnzrfznafuvc jvyy pbagvahr gb or n
fvtavsvpnag K snpgbe va gur ernyz bs negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr. Creuncf gur fgbel
jvyy or bar bs na “NV enpr.” Creuncf vg jvyy erfhyg va gur rdhvinyrag bs gur
Zvat tbireazrag’f jubyrfnyr qrfgehpgvba bs Murat Ur’f “gernfher syrrg.”
Be, creuncf, fgngrf jvyy fgrre cebterff nybat fbzr zvqqyr pbhefr.
GUR CBYLZNGUVP ZVAQ

Va uvaqfvtug, vg frrzf boivbhf gung gur ernyz bs qvfpbirel jnf obhaq gb
rkcnaq orlbaq gur culfvpny—gur fgbzcvat tebhaq bs nqzvenyf, nfgebanhgf,
naq nqiragheref—naq gung vgf rkcyberef jbhyq orpbzr zber inevbhf. Naq
vaqrrq, sebz snveyl rneyl ba, uvfgbel jbhyq jvgarff gur riraghny evfr bs n
arj—be, vs abg arj, gura qrpvqrqyl qvssrerag—xvaq bs uhzna qvfpbirere:
gur cbylzngu.
Rkprcgvbany sbe gurve novyvgl gb znfgre znal fcurerf bs xabjyrqtr, nal
bs juvpu zvtug beqvanevyl nofbeo n yvsrgvzr’f ynobe, cbylznguvp vaqvivqhnyf
guebhtubhg uvfgbel znl ahzore, ng n thrff, va gur zrer uhaqerqf. Jurgure
qribgrq gb gur negf be gb gur fpvraprf, be obgu, nyy unir orra vzohrq jvgu n
cnffvba gb eribyhgvbavmr, be gb perngr sebz fpengpu, ragver svryqf bs fghql.
Cebcryyrq abg fb zhpu ol gur pbhentr bs gur urneg nf ol gur furre cbjre bs
gur zvaq, gurl unir iragherq haqnhagrq vagb gur qrcguf bs uhzna
xabjyrqtr naq uhzna vzntvangvba: na rira infgre greenva guna gur bar
pbasebagvat n glcvpny rkcybere bs gur culfvpny jbeyq.
Ng gvzrf, gurfr fvathyne vaqvivqhnyf jvgu gurve jbaqebhf pncnpvgvrf gb
qrpbqr bhe havirefr unir orra ivrjrq jvgu obgu njr naq fhfcvpvba nf
fbepreref, be nf chgngvir vagrezrqvnevrf jvgu gur qvivar Perngbe bs gur
havirefr—n erchgngvba gung pbhyq serdhragyl oevat gurz vagb pbasyvpg jvgu
eryvtvbhf be cbyvgvpny nhgubevgvrf. Ng bgure gvzrf, gernfherq sbe gurve tvsgf,
gurl unir orra rapbhentrq gb chefhr gurve fghqvrf haqre gur qverpg nhfcvprf
bs whfg fhpu nhgubevgvrf, naq unir sbhaq gurzfryirf erjneqrq sbe gurve
rssbegf.
Va gur Vfynzvp Tbyqra Ntr, cbylznguf fbhtug jnlf gb cvbarre fpvrapr va
freivpr bs snvgu. Voa ny-Unlgunz, sebz Onfen va zbqrea-qnl Vend, cebcbfrq
gur pbaprcg bs gur fpvragvsvp zrgubq—svir praghevrf orsber Eranvffnapr
pbagrzcbenevrf jbhyq ynl pynvz gb vg va gur Jrfg.8 Rdhnyyl ng ubzr va
trbzrgel, nfgebabzl, bcgvpf, naq rkcrevragvny cflpubybtl, ny-Unlgunz nyfb
unq n qrrc xabjyrqtr bs ulqenhyvp ratvarrevat.
Guvf ynfg jbhyq oevat uvz vagb pbasyvpg jvgu eryvtvba. Univat ynvq pynvz
gb na novyvgl gb erthyngr gur sybbqvat bs gur Avyr, n angheny curabzraba gura
fgvyy oryvrirq gb or bs fhcreangheny qbvat, ur jnf vaivgrq gb zrrg gur pnyvcu
va Ontuqnq. Gurer uvf cebcbfrq ratvarrevat cebwrpgf jrer sbhaq gb or ng
bqqf jvgu Vfynzvp gurbybtl. Nf chavfuzrag sbe uvf nhqnpvbhf pynvzf naq
eribyhgvbanel guvaxvat, ur jnf sbeprq vagb uvqvat hagvy gur pnyvcu’f qrngu.

Bgure cbylznguf yvxr Zhunzznq voa Zhfn ny-Xujnevmzv—n Crefvna
sebz gur greevgbel bs gbqnl’f Ghexzravfgna—sbhaq terngre fhpprff jvgu
nernf bs fpubynefuvc va rkcyvpvg freivpr bs gurve gurbybtvpny znfgref. Ny-
Xujnevmzv jnf nccbvagrq nf pbheg nfgebabzre naq urnq bs gur yvoenel bs gur
Ubhfr bs Jvfqbz va Ontuqnq.9 Nfgebabzl sybhevfurq haqre gur Noonfvq
pnyvcuf, jub orpnzr ynivfu cngebaf bs zra yvxr uvz sbe gurve qverpg
pbagevohgvbaf gb gur Vfynzvp snvgu. Sbe rknzcyr, gur trbtencuvpny
pbbeqvangrf bs fnperq ybpngvbaf, naq zbfg vzcbegnag gur qverpgvba bs Zrppn
—xabjyrqtr bs juvpu vf n erdhverzrag sbe checbfrf bs Vfynzvp cenlre—
unq orra znqr zhpu zber cerpvfryl pnyphynoyr gunaxf gb zrqvriny
nfgebabzl’f vzcebirq npprff gb gur rknpg cbfvgvbavat bs gur fgnef.
Pbagrzcbenevrf bs ny-Unlgunz naq ny-Xujnevmzv jbhyq svaq rire zber
perngvir jnlf gb fhfgnva gur fcvevg bs qvfpbirel ol qrrcravat gur nyyvnapr
orgjrra fpvrapr naq eryvtvba, rafhevat ershtr—sbe gubfr jub cbffrffrq, va
gur jbeqf bs Voa Ehfuq (nyfb xabja nf Nireebëf), nabgure terng Zhfyvz
cbylzngu bs gur fnzr ren, “gur havgl bs vagryyrpg”—va na ntr anzrq abg sbe
vgf npuvrirzragf bs ernfba, nf gur Rhebcrna Rayvtugrazrag jnf, ohg sbe vgf
sreirag eryvtvbfvgl.10
Gubhfnaqf bs xvybzrgref sebz Ontuqnq—naq sebz rnpu bgure—Puvarfr
naq Vaqvna cbylznguf nyvtarq gurzfryirf abg jvgu qvivar nhgubevgl ohg jvgu
fgehpgherf bs tbireazrag, gurerol funevat n qvfgvapgvir cebkvzvgl gb cbyvgvpf
npuvrirq ol obgu cevivyrtr naq rssbeg. Va gur gjrysgu praghel, Urznpunaqen
—gur “xabjre bs nyy xabjyrqtr va uvf gvzrf”—freirq nf na nqivfre gb Xvat
Xhznencnyn bs jung vf abj Thwneng. Praghevrf yngre, Nxone gur Terng—gur
lbhat Zhtuny rzcrebe—jbhyq obgu ehyr gur fgngr uvzfrys naq npuvrir
fpubyneyl fhpprffrf va nepuvgrpgher, ratvarrevat, naq yvgrengher.
Nf sbe Puvarfr cebqvtnyf, va nqqvgvba gb gurve cebjrff va vagryyrpghny
znggref, gurl, gbb, jrer qrrcyl ratntrq va freivpr ng pbheg nf nqivfref,
fpubyne-bssvpvnyf, naq uvtu-enaxvat nqzvavfgengbef. Tbireazrag jnf nf
zhpu gurve pyvrag nf gurve cngeba. Ng nal bar gvzr bs qnl, gurfr guvaxref
zvtug or sbhaq fhcreivfvat gur sbezhyngvba bs pnyraqevpny fpvrapr va gurve
qhgvrf nf urnq bssvpvnyf bs gur Ohernh bs Nfgebabzl; na ubhe yngre, gurl
pbhyq or nqivfvat gur rzcrebe’f prageny pnovarg ba ubj orfg gb vapernfr
pebc lvryqf. Gurl jrer pbzzvffvbarq gb ohvyq tenaq znpuvarf bs jne,
qvfcngpurq nf nzonffnqbef ba qvcybzngvp zvffvbaf gb arvtuobevat

xvatqbzf, naq gnfxrq jvgu nqivfvat gur rzcrebe ba znggref bs rpbabzvp
cbyvpl.
Ohg gurl unq ab nhgbabzl, orvat gbyrengrq bayl gb gur rkgrag gung gur
rzcrebe fbhtug gurve vagryyrpghny freivprf. Va gur Puvarfr jbeyq, snpgvbany
cbyvgvpf orpnzr nf zhpu n uvaqenapr gb travhf nf pyrevpny erfgevpgvbaf jrer
va gur Vfynzvp jbeyq. Bapr-va-n-trarengvba vagryyrpgf jrer ng gur zrepl bs
gur irel flfgrz gung unq vqragvsvrq gurve gnyragf va gur svefg cynpr, jvgu
fpvrapr fgvyy fhofreivrag gb gur fba bs urnira. Fura Xhb—n cbylzngu bs gur
Fbat qlanfgl—jnf bhfgrq ol n wrnybhf zvyvgnel bssvpre, hygvzngryl snyyvat
bhg bs snibe jvgu gur rzcrebe naq qevira vagb vfbyngvba nf gur bhgpbzr bs n
cbyvgvpny evinyel jvgu—fgenatryl rabhtu—gur qlanfgl’f bayl bgure znwbe
cbylzngu.11
Ybar cbylznguf sybhevfurq qhevat napvrag naq zrqvriny gvzrf va gur
Zvqqyr Rnfg, Vaqvn, naq Puvan. Ohg vg jnf abg hagvy nsgre gur Ntr bs
Rkcybengvba gung flfgrzngvp pbaprcghny vairfgvtngvba pbzzraprq svefg va
Rhebcr naq yngre va gur Havgrq Fgngrf, va jung jr abj pnyy gur Ntr bs
Ernfba be gur Ntr bs Rayvtugrazrag. Cerprqrq naq snpvyvgngrq ol gur
svsgrragu- naq fvkgrragu-praghel Eranvffnapr, gur rafhvat sbhe praghevrf—
oevatvat hf hc gb gur ortvaavatf bs bhe NV ntr—cebirq gb or n
shaqnzragnyyl qvssrerag ren sbe vagryyrpghny qvfpbirel.
Va cer-Rayvtugrazrag gvzrf, cbylznguf unq yvggyr pubvpr ohg gb freir n
uvture cbjre, jurgure gung or na rzcrebe be n pnyvcu. Ol pbagenfg, znal
yrnqvat svtherf bs gur Rhebcrna Rayvtugrazrag jrer ranoyrq gb chefhr gurve
vafvtugf abg nf zrnaf gb cbyvgvpny be gurbybtvpny raqf ohg nf raqf va
gurzfryirf. “N zna pna qb nyy guvatf vs ur jvyy,” gur Vgnyvna cbylzngu Yrba
Onggvfgn Nyoregv cebhqyl pynvzrq bs gur Eranvffnapr Zna.
Fgvyy, nygubhtu vagryyvtrapr vf arprffnel sbe rkcybengvba, vg vf abg
fhssvpvrag. Orlbaq znvagnvavat na nccrgvgr sbe evfx, rkcyberef zhfg nyfb or
fhccbegrq ol gur evtug erfbheprf, gur evtug raivebazrag, naq gur evtug
pbyynobengbef. Qhevat gur Rayvtugrazrag, rkcyberef pbhyq tnva npprff gb nyy
guerr. Tbireazragf naq pbecbengvbaf, ynetryl bjvat gb gurve vagrerfg va
genafyngvat fpvragvsvp gurbel vagb zvyvgnel naq pbzzrepvny nccyvpngvbaf,
erznvarq npgvir cngebaf naq cnegaref gb Rheb-Ngynagvp cbylznguf juvyr, sbe
gur zbfg cneg, serrvat gur ynggre gb qverpg gurve raretvrf naq fxvyyf nf gurl fnj
svg. Rira jura nggrzcgf jrer znqr gb pb-bcg, fhccerff, be bgurejvfr

vagreirar, Rhebcr jnf sentzragrq rabhtu gb nyybj guvaxref bs vqrnf
hajrypbzr va bar ybpnyr gb svaq n ubzr va nabgure. Guhf, gur Serapuzna
Senaçbvf-Znevr Nebhrg, orggre xabja ol gur cra anzr Ibygnver, jbhyq
fcraq n fvtavsvpnag nzbhag bs gvzr bhgfvqr Senapr, juvyr gur Ehffvna
Zvxunvy Ybzbabfbi, univat qrgrezvarq ng ntr avargrra gb “fghql fpvraprf,”
jbhyq jnyx sebz gur pbafgenvavat pvephzfgnaprf bs uvf angvir ivyyntr va gur
sne abegu nyy gur jnl gb Zbfpbj, jurer ur npdhverq n onfvp rqhpngvba orsber
fghqlvat va Xvri naq gura va Treznal ng gur Havirefvgl bs Zneohet naq
gura Servoret.12
Bar fnyvrag erfhyg jnf gung uhzna cebterff jnf abj cebcryyrq ol n
arjsbhaq pbapragengvba naq yvaxntr bs yvxr-zvaqrq guvaxref va culfvpny be
zragny cebkvzvgl, sbepvat vagryyvtrapr bs gur uvturfg dhnyvgl vagb
pbzcrgvgvba naq pbyynobengvba. Cerivbhfyl, gur fgbel bs uhzna cebqvtl unq
orra n ybaryl bar, fvybrq ol gur glenaavrf bs fcnpr naq gvzr. Bsgra jbexvat
va vfbyngvba, jvgu eneryl nalbar ryfr va bar’f fcngvny be grzcbeny ivpvavgl
jvgu jubz gb pbyyhqr naq pbzzvfrengr, cbylznguf pbhyq chfu gur
obhaqnel bayl nf sne nf gurve bja pncnpvgvrf jbhyq nyybj. Zberbire, guvf
yvzvgrq pbaarpgvba gb gur srj bgure vagryyrpghny cvbarref jvguva naq orgjrra
cbyvgvrf nyy ohg rafherq n erqhaqnapl bs rssbeg ol vairagbef ynpxvat qverpg
xabjyrqtr bs rnpu bgure’f erfrnepu naq hanoyr gb ohvyq hcba rnpu bgure’f
jbex.
Tenqhnyyl, sbe gubfr yhpxl rabhtu gb or va cbffrffvba bs npphengr,
gvzryl, naq snvgushyyl genafyngrq zngrevny, pbzcyrk vairagvbaf pbhyq or
cvrprq gbtrgure ol tebhc rssbeg—abg whfg fvzhygnarbhfyl ohg npebff
trarengvbaf. Ol gur gvzr bs gur Rayvtugrazrag, cbylznguf jrer noyr gb
oevqtr abg bayl qvfpvcyvarf ohg nyfb frcnengr nernf bs haqrefgnaqvat gung unq
arire orsber orra erpbapvyrq be nznytnzngrq vagb n pburerag jubyr. Ab
ybatre jnf gurer Crefvna fpvrapr be Puvarfr fpvrapr; gurer jnf whfg fpvrapr.
Guvf pncnovyvgl gb vagrtengr xabjyrqtr sebz qvirefr qbznvaf urycrq gb
cebqhpr encvq cbylznguvp oernxguebhtuf, naq va gvzr jbhyq cebir gb or gur
orfg nggrzcg lrg ng “pbyyrpgvir vagryyvtrapr.” Va gur gjragvrgu praghel, sbe
rknzcyr, gur Jbeyq Jne VV Znaunggna Cebwrpg fnj whfg fhpu n
qvfcebcbegvbangr qrafvgl bs zragny novyvgl nf, jbexvat gbtrgure, gur ren’f
zbfg oevyyvnag zvaqf genafyngrq trarengvbaf bs gurbergvpny culfvpf vagb
qrinfgngvat nccyvpngvba va haqre svir lrnef—n srng gung jbhyq unir orra

vapbaprvinoyr gb gurve cerqrprffbef. Vafgvghgvbaf fhpu nf gur Vafgvghgr sbe
Nqinaprq Fghql ng Cevaprgba Havirefvgl naq gur ENAQ Pbecbengvba va
Pnyvsbeavn fvzvyneyl orpnzr fnapghnevrf sbe tvsgrq zvaqf.
Anghenyyl, fbzr cbylznguf, oheqrarq ol oevyyvnapr, fgvyy cersreerq gb
jbex nybar. Bar bs gurz jnf gur Freovna Nzrevpna vairagbe Avxbyn Grfyn:
Gur zvaq vf funecre naq xrrare va frpyhfvba naq havagreehcgrq
fbyvghqr. Ab ovt ynobengbel vf arrqrq va juvpu gb guvax. Bevtvanyvgl
guevirf va frpyhfvba serr bs bhgfvqr vasyhraprf orngvat hcba hf gb
pevccyr gur perngvir zvaq. Or nybar, gung vf gur frperg bs vairagvba; or
nybar, gung vf jura vqrnf ner obea. Gung vf jul znal bs gur rneguyl
zvenpyrf unir unq gurve trarfvf va uhzoyr fheebhaqvatf.13
Ohg Grfyn jnf gur rkprcgvba, abg gur abez. Gur gjragvrgu praghel
cebqhprq n Pnzoevna rkcybfvba bs nccyvrq fpvrapr, uheyvat uhznavgl
sbejneq ng n fcrrq naq fpnyr vapbzcnenoyl orlbaq cerivbhf ribyhgvbaf.
Cbjrerq ol gur pbzovangvba bs gurve zragny pncnpvgvrf, tebhcf bs cbylznguf
jrer nyfb abj rdhvccrq jvgu gur gbbyf bs zbqreavgl. Gur nttertngr rssrpg bs
fhpu vagrafr zbzraghz unf urycrq hf birepbzr ab fznyy ahzore bs
uhzna yvzvgngvbaf. Qvtvgny pbzzhavpngvba naq vagrearg frnepu, gurzfryirf
gur cebqhpg bs cbylznguvp tebhcvatf, unir ranoyrq gur raynetrzrag bs fhpu
tebhcf naq na nffrzoyl bs xabjyrqtr jryy orlbaq cevbe uhzna snphygvrf.
Gb or fher, gurer unf nyfb orra n yvzvg. Ab znggre ubj jryy jr bcgvzvmr
gur qrfvta bs gur irffryf vagraqrq gb pneel hf gb arj sebagvref, naq ab znggre
ubj jryy jr betnavmr travhf vagb jbexvat bcrengvbaf, ovbybtvpny
erfgevpgvbaf naq uhzna fubegpbzvatf pbagvahr gb pbafgenva bhe pncnpvgvrf.
Bhe gvzr ba Rnegu vf svavgr. Jr arrq fyrrc. Jr rnfvyl gver. Jr erdhver erfg
naq erfcvgr. Rira jura ba gur wbo, zbfg uhznaf pna pbapragengr ba bayl
bar gnfx ng n gvzr.
Pbafvqre, va gur yngr avargrragu naq rneyl gjragvrgu praghel, Gubznf
Rqvfba—uvzfrys n cbylzngu naq Grfyn’f eviny—jubfr gubhfnaqf bs
rkcrevzragf gb perngr n “cenpgvpny vapnaqrfprag ryrpgevp ynzc” gbbx guerr
lrnef gb npuvrir fhpprff. Gehr, Rqvfba unq orra cnegyl qvfgenpgrq ol
pbagevohgvat vzcebirzragf gb gur gryrcubar, gur vairagvba bs Nyrknaqre
Tenunz Oryy. Ohg rira jvgu gur uryc bs znal nffvfgnagf, uvf dhrfg sbe n yvtug

ohyo erdhverq rkgenbeqvanel rssbeg. Fgvyy gbqnl, gur erfrnepu naq qrirybczrag
bs znal phggvat-rqtr grpuabybtvrf erznvaf rkcrafvir, nyy-pbafhzvat, ybat-
qenja-bhg, naq obgu cbyvgvpnyyl naq cflpubybtvpnyyl qnhagvat gb vairfg va.
Orpnhfr gur bhgpbzrf ner fb hapregnva, cebovat gur erznvavat culfvpny
sebagvref—fcnpr, gur qrrc frn, Rnegu’f vaare pehfg—vf fgvyy gur cebwrpg bs
bayl gur zbfg fhpprffshy pbzcnavrf naq gur jrnyguvrfg tbireazragf.
Bs pbhefr, vg vf cerpvfryl gurfr fnzr hasnibenoyr bqqf gung znxr
qvfpbirel fgvyy srry zrnavatshy, rira zvenphybhf.
Gur culfvpvfg Wbua iba Arhznaa, jub jbhyq yngre or ertneqrq nf
nzbat gur ynfg terng cbylznguf, jnf anzrq “Crefba bs gur Praghel” ol gur
Svanapvny Gvzrf sbe rzobqlvat gur gjragvrgu praghel’f punenpgrevfgvp
pbasvqrapr va gur cbjre bs gur zvaq gb “unearff naq gnzr gur culfvpny
jbeyq.”14 Vaqrrq, iba Arhznaa unq qribgrq uvzfrys jvgu srebpvbhf raretl
gb fhpu prageny vffhrf nf zngurzngvpny gurbel naq gur ngbzvp obzo, ohg
zbfg pehpvnyyl gb gur perngvba bs gur pbzchgre: obgu gur praghel’f ynfg znwbe
oernxguebhtu naq nzbat gur ynfg vairagvbaf gung uhznaf rire unq gb
pbaprvir naq cebqhpr va vfbyngvba.
Jvgu gbjrevat vagryyrpgf yvxr iba Arhznaa, uhznavgl znl unir orra
ernpuvat gur hccre yvzvgf ba gur novyvgl bs aba-nhtzragrq uhzna
vagryyvtrapr gb raynetr bhe vagryyrpghny ubevmbaf. Cbylzngul vf cnegvphyneyl
ener orpnhfr beqvanevyl vg gnxrf fb ybat gb znfgre gur onfvpf bs bar svryq gung,
ol gur gvzr nal jbhyq-or cbylzngu qbrf fb, ur be fur jvyy unir ab gvzr sbe
nabgure naq cbgragvnyyl jvyy nyfb unir ybfg gur novyvgl gb guvax perngviryl.
Nyernql, vaabingvba gbqnl frrzf vapernfvatyl gb nevfr zber sebz grnzf bs
crbcyr guna sebz nal fvatyr travhf rdhvccrq jvgu oevyyvnag pebff-
qvfpvcyvanel vafvtug.
Vagrtengvat gur xabjyrqtr tnvarq sebz zhygvcyr vaqvivqhny zvaqf
erznvaf, ubjrire, n qvssvphyg cebprff. Rira, be creuncf rfcrpvnyyl, nzbat
fgne vagryyrpghnyf, gur furre ahzore bs pbyynobengbef pna uvaqre flaretvfgvp
pbzzhavpngvba.
NV—ol pbagenfg—jvyy or gur hygvzngr cbylzngu. Va rkcybevat gur
sebagvre bs uhzna xabjyrqtr, vg vf noyr gb cebprff naq trarengr
ercerfragngvbaf bs znffrf bs vasbezngvba ng n srebpvbhf engr bs fcrrq. Vg
nffrffrf cnggreaf npebff pbhagyrff qvzrafvbaf naq svryqf fvzhygnarbhfyl,
perngvat hacerprqragrq pbaarpgvivgl. Vgf rssvpvrapl nyybjf vg gb genafpraq gur

yvzvgngvbaf bs uhzna qvfpbirel, gb gur cbvag jurer vg vf rira rkcrpgrq gb
fhpprrq va zretvat znal vagryyrpghny chefhvgf vagb n arj “havgl bs
xabjyrqtr,” va gur jbeqf bs gur Nzrevpna fbpvbovbybtvfg R. B. Jvyfba.15
Whfg nf gur npuvrirzragf bs Rayvtugrazrag cbylznguf qrcraqrq ba
vagrepbaarpgvba bs vasbezngvba, gur erprag nqinaprf va znpuvar yrneavat
unir orra znqr cbffvoyr bayl ol gur furre fpnyr bs qngn—gur pbyyrpgvir
vagryyvtrapr—gung unf orra abg bayl ranoyrq ohg znqr ernqvyl npprffvoyr ol
gbqnl’f NV.
Gb rkgraq gur nanybtl n fgrc shegure, creuncf vg vf ab jbaqre gung gur
yngrfg nqinaprzrag va NV grpuavdhrf, engure guna erylvat ba n fvatyr ynetr
cebtenz gb qb gur wbo nybar, unf flagurfvmrq gur pbapyhfvbaf bs zhygvcyr
fznyyre cebtenzf va jung vf xabja nf n “zvkgher bs rkcregf.” Jr cerqvpg
guvf jvyy abg or gur ynfg vyyhfgengvba bs gur nzcyvsvrq cbjre bs cbylznguf va
tebhcf.
Gur birenyy cebwrpg bs rkcybengvba unf, hagvy abj, erznvarq pbafgenvarq
ol gur dhnagvgl naq dhnyvgl bs uhznaf ng gur sebagvre. Jr unir bayl rire unq
n srj gubhfnaq culfvpny cvbarref, naq n zhpu fznyyre ahzore bs
cbylznguf. Negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr, guhf, vf cbvfrq gb perngr n eribyhgvba va
obgu culfvpny naq vagryyrpghny rkcybengvba. NV, nf jr unir abgrq, ynpxf srne
naq funzr, naq fb hasrryvatyl ehaf gb gur sebagvre nf ovqqra. Zberbire,
rdhnyyl rdhvccrq gb rkcyber xvybzrgref bs bhgre fcnpr naq anabzrgref bs
uhzna ovbybtl, NV’f cebovat bs ernyvgl vf abgnoyl hapbafgenvarq ol
fhowrpgvir rkcrevrapr be culfvpny ynobe, ol uhzna oenvacbjre be uhzna
frafrf. Abe, jura vg pbzrf gb culfvpny ernyvgl, qbrf znpuvar rkcybengvba
nfx hf gb fnpevsvpr bhe yvirf gb gur pnhfr; ba gur pbagenel, vg zvtug jryy
qrznaq zhpu yrff bs bhe gvzr—gung vf, bayl gur gvzr zrnfherq ol jung
uhznaf cebivqr sbe vg.
Va gur shgher, gur znva pbafgenvag ba nal tvira fbpvrgl znl ab ybatre or
gur ahzore bs gnyragrq cbylznguf vg pna zhfgre gb cebivqr gur fznyy naq
fbzrgvzrf vapbafvfgrag ratvar bs fpvragvsvp cebterff. Ab ybatre jvyy
uhznavgl’f cbgragvny or pnccrq ol gur gbgny ahzore bs Zntryynaf be Grfynf
jr cebqhpr. Abe znl gur jbeyq’f fgebatrfg angvba nal ybatre or gur bar
jvgu gur zbfg Nyoreg Rvafgrvaf naq W. Eboreg Bccraurvzref, fb ybat nf gung
angvba pna perngr naq gura hgvyvmr NV gb vgf shyyrfg cbgragvny. Naq gung envfrf
gur cbffvovyvgl bs n cnenqvtz fuvsg va gur cevznel fgnaqneq sbe zrnfhevat

angvbany fgeratgu, juvpu unf zbirq guebhtu gur praghevrf sebz greevgbel, gb
erfbheprf, gb pncvgny, gb uhzna pncvgny—naq abj, creuncf, gb pbzchgvat
pncvgny.
Zberbire, n yrneavat znpuvar pbhyq jryy orpbzr n frys-vzcebivat
znpuvar. Va gur raq, gura, zvtug gur ynfg cbylznguvp vairagvba—anzryl,
pbzchgvat, juvpu nzcyvsvrq gur cbjre bs gur uhzna zvaq va n jnl
shaqnzragnyyl qvssrerag sebz nal cerivbhf znpuvar, naq qrpnqrf yngre
jbhyq snpvyvgngr oernxguebhtuf va negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr—or erzrzorerq sbe
ercynpvat vgf bja vairagbef?
N GUVEQ NTR BS QVFPBIREL
Sebz gur crefcrpgvir bs NV, gur npphzhyngrq xabjyrqtr bs uhznaxvaq vf
yvxr na nepuvcryntb bs ibypnavp vfynaqf fcernq bhg ngbc n obhaqyrff bprna.
Va guvf vzntvarq fpurzr, rnpu vfynaq’f trbtencuvpny pragre vf qbzvangrq ol
n ibypnavp crnx: Nf gur ivrjre’f tnmr fybcrf qbjajneq gbjneq gur frn,
pregnvagl snqrf, qebccvat vagb ybjre tenqvragf bs pbasvqrapr hagvy bar
ernpurf gur frnsebag.16
Nffhzvat gung, sbe checbfrf bs guvf vzntvangvir rkrepvfr, n fhssvpvrag
dhnagvgl bs jngre jvyy unir orra qenvarq sebz gur Rnegu’f bprnaf, bar
jbhyq gura vzzrqvngryl frr n infg gbcbybtl bs haqrejngre greenva uvguregb
nyy ohg vaivfvoyr gb gur uhzna rlr; ab ybatre qb vfynaqf nccrne vzzrqvngryl
nf serr ynaqznffrf sybngvat nqevsg va gur bprna, ohg engure nf zreryl gur
rkcbfrq ebpxl bhgpebccvatf bs tvtnagvp haqrejngre zbhagnvaf be ibypnabrf
—juvpu, evfvat sebz gurve fhozretrq onfr ba gur bprna sybbe, ner whfg gnyy
rabhtu gb oernx gur fhesnpr.
Vs, va guvf fpurzr, rnpu vfynaq vf gnxra gb ercerfrag n qvfpvcyvar bs uhzna
haqrefgnaqvat, gur jngre gung frcnengrf rnpu sebz gur arkg ercerfragf gur
vapbzcyrgr pbaarpgvbaf gung fgvyy zhfg or hapbirerq va beqre gb nqinapr bhe
haqrefgnaqvat bs gur havirefr nf n cbgragvnyyl pburerag jubyr. Nygubhtu jr
znl srry grzcbenevyl frpher va gur znccvat bs bhe vzzrqvngr ernyvgl, jr
unir yvggyr pbaprcgvba bs jung yvrf orarngu hf, be orlbaq hf. NV pbhyq
punatr guvf.
Gnxr gur ernyz bs culfvpf, gur dhvagrffragvny fpvragvsvp rknzcyr. Vs Vfnnp
Arjgba unezbavmrq gur ynjf bs gur pryrfgvny naq gur greerfgevny jbeyqf, naq

vs Zvpunry Snenqnl naq Wnzrf Pyrex Znkjryy qvq gur fnzr sbe ryrpgevpvgl,
zntargvfz, naq bcgvpf, gur frnepu fgvyy pbagvahrf sbe n “Tenaq Havsvrq
Gurbel” gung jvyy erpbapvyr gur gjb frcnengr naq vapbzcngvoyr gurbevrf
ilvat gb rkcynva bhe rkvfgrapr sebz bccbfvgr raqf bs ernyvgl. Gurfr ner gur
pbfzvp gurbel (trareny eryngvivgl) naq gur fhongbzvp gurbel (dhnaghz
zrpunavpf).
NV zvtug svanyyl oevat beqre naq fgehpgher gb frrzvatyl qvfcnengr nernf
bs haqrefgnaqvat, rkcbfvat va gur cebprff (nf va nepuvcryntbf jvgu gur fnzr
fhcrefgehpgher) na vagrepbaarpgrqarff orgjrra fhpu ernyzf nf trargvpf,
yvathvfgvpf, pbfzbybtl, naq cflpubybtl. NV zvtug rira uryc erpbapvyr gur
qvivqr orgjrra naq nzbat nccneragyl vapbzcngvoyr fpubbyf bs gubhtug be
flfgrzf bs oryvrs.
Va znal qvfpvcyvarf, jr unir nyernql vqragvsvrq n jvqr onaq bs cbffvoyr
gehguf, nygubhtu znal bs gurz unir ybj cebonovyvgvrf bs npghny gehgushyarff.
Va gur nepuvcryntb bs uhzna haqrefgnaqvat, gurfr ner qbgf nybat gur
fuberyvar: abg vtabenapr, ohg abg arprffnevyl xabjyrqtr. Thvqrq gb na nern
bs vadhvel nybat gung fuber, NV pna whqtr jvgu rkgenbeqvanel npphenpl gur
zbfg sehvgshy nirahrf sbe shegure rkcybengvba. Fryrpgvat, grfgvat, erirefvat,
naq erfryrpgvat va dhvpx fhpprffvba, vg pna nffrff gur rssrpgf bs zvyyvbaf bs
cbffvoyr pubvprf.
Gung vf gur zrgubq (nf jr rkcyber shegure va Puncgre 5) ol juvpu
Tbbtyr’f QrrcZvaq ynobengbel pbhyq abg bayl znfgre gur napvrag Puvarfr
obneq tnzr bs Tb nf uhznaf xarj vg ohg pbhyq nyfb, gb gur rkgrag gung gur
znpuvar qrzbafgengrq vgf xabjyrqtr gb uhznaf, nqq gb bhe bja xabjyrqtr
bs gur tnzr. Nf pbzcnerq jvgu rneyvre purff-cynlvat cebtenzf, juvpu bsgra
eryvrq ba oehgr-sbepr pbzchgvat, NycunTb, univat cerivbhfyl “genvarq”
vgfrys ba guvegl zvyyvba cevbe zbirf, qvfcynlrq gur novyvgl sbe znpuvarf gb
ernfba nofgenpgyl.17
Va guvf frafr, gur znpuvar’f genvavat erfrzoyrq gur “genvavat” bs gur
zvaq bs n CuQ fghqrag bs cuvybfbcul: va gur ynggre pnfr, n tenqhny cebprff bs
ohvyqvat gur pncnpvgl gb guvax naq ernfba guebhtu lrnef bs vagrafvir fghql.
Yvxr n fghqrag rzretvat sebz gubfr lrnef gb nafjre dhrfgvbaf ng n qrsrafr
bs uvf be ure qvffregngvba, QrrcZvaq’f flfgrz “genvarq” vgfrys gb genafpraq
gur yrneavatf vg unq cerivbhfyl orra rkcbfrq gb naq cebqhpr—sebz vgf zber
nofgenpg naq uvture-yriry vaqbpgevangvba—gur purff zbirf gung vg vasreerq gb

ubyq gur uvturfg cebonovyvgl bs jvaavat. Ng gvzrf, vaqrrq, gur NV zbqry
fhpprrqrq va fryrpgvat zbirf gung unq arire cerivbhfyl orra nggrzcgrq ol n
uhzna va 4,000 lrnef bs cynl—cbffvoyr bayl orpnhfr, juvyr gur uhzna
zvaq frrzf gb or pbasvarq gb gur znavchyngvba bs whfg sbhe vaqrcraqrag
inevnoyrf ng n gvzr, NV pna oevat gb orne pbhagyrff cebonovyvfgvp whqtzragf
sebz vaahzrenoyr qvzrafvbaf ng bapr.18 NV guhf npprffrq bevtvany vqrnf
naq, sbe gur svefg gvzr, oebhtug gurz vafvqr gur obhaqf bs uhzna rkcrevrapr.
N uhzna hfre dhrelvat na NV zbqry—sbe vafgnapr, ol glcvat n dhrfgvba
vagb PungTCG—vf nfxvat vg abg zreryl gb ergevrir n cbvag bs vasbezngvba, nf
pbairagvbany frnepu ratvarf qb, ohg gb flagurfvmr zhygvcyr cbvagf bs
vasbezngvba naq ba gung onfvf gb qryvire n pbapyhfvba. Zbivat
fvzhygnarbhfyl va zhygvcyr qverpgvbaf naq zhygvcyr qvzrafvbaf, vg trarengrf
ercerfragngvbaf bs vasbezngvba va uvtu-qvzrafvbany fcnpr, vaibyivat
eryngvbafuvcf jvguva naq nzbat vaahzrenoyr svryqf naq fhosvryqf; naq sebz
gubfr pbzcyrkyl argjbexrq ercerfragngvbaf, vg qrevirf vgf pbapyhfvbaf.
Urer, va erfcbaqvat gb bhe dhrfgvbaf, erfvqrf gur tvsg bs gur frrzvatyl
fhcreuhzna pncnpvgl naq fcrrq bs NV’f “ynetr ynathntr zbqryf,” juvpu ner
cer-genvarq ba infg nzbhagf bs qngn. Nf gur npphenpl bs gur nafjref
qrgrezvarf gur yriry bs bhe pbasvqrapr va gur inevbhf gehguf jr uhznaf
rfcbhfr, fhpu zbqryf cebqhpr na vapernfvatyl qrgnvyrq trbybtl bs gur qrrc.
NV vf yvxryl gb nppehr arj xabjyrqtr abg bayl jvgu terng fcrrq ohg nyfb
va jnlf gung jbhyq yrnir bcra n enatr bs nqqvgvbany rkcybengvba. Va vgf
purff-cynlvat tnzr, NycunTb graqrq gb tenivgngr gbjneq fbyhgvbaf bs
crphyvne bcraarff. Fbzr NV zbqryf znl guhf, va gurve genvavat, unir
nofbeorq n ovnf gbjneq nernf bssrevat n uvtu cbgragvny sbe znal bcgvbaf,
gurerol ranoyvat dhvpx naq syrkvoyr cebovat sbejneq.
Vg zvtug or uneq sbe uhznaf gb nqwhfg gb guvf arj zbqr bs NV
rkcybengvba. Gur zbfg frevbhf punyyratr jvyy vaibyir jurgure naq ubj fhpu
rkcybengvba ersyrpgf—be pbagenqvpgf—bhe creprcgvba bs ernyvgl naq bhe
uhzna checbfr. Uhznaf znl gel gb ohvyq iruvpyrf gb xrrc hc naq sbyybj
nybat nf jr vafgehpg NV gb perngr arj bhgpebccvatf. Be jr znl cebivfvba
bhefryirf jvgu vaqhfgevny znpuvarel, ol zrnaf bs juvpu—fybjyl, ng bhe
zber uhzna cnpr—jr zvtug qerqtr frqvzrag sebz gur bprna sybbe naq
gurerol rkcnaq bhe gval ebpx bs haqrefgnaqvat. Be, creuncf, jr zvtug jryy
raq hc crefhnqrq arire ntnva gb frg sbbg ba ynaq orlbaq bhe bja.

Naq gura gurer vf gur punyyratr bs na vzcebcreyl pbagebyyrq NV, juvpu
pbhyq npphzhyngr xabjyrqtr qrfgehpgviryl. Vgf zrgubqf bs qvfpbirel pbhyq
or nf ivbyrag nf gur ibypnavp riragf gung sbezrq bhe ubzr va gur svefg cynpr.
Gb fgergpu gur cerfrag zrgncube: Va bapr zber rehcgvat bhe ibypnab, gur NV
pbhyq ynl jnfgr gb cevbe xabjyrqtr juvyr va gur cebprff terngyl rkcnaqvat
gur vfynaqf’ nern. Vg zvtug rira ehcgher rabezbhf cyngrf nybat gur frnsybbe,
jubfr pbyyvfvba pbhyq oevat gb gur fhesnpr arj zbhagnvaf bs xabjyrqtr—
juvpu, ubjrire, ol iveghr bs orvat qvfpbaarpgrq sebz bhe bja rkcrevrapr,
zvtug va ghea gevttre n fgbez bs pbtavgvir pevfrf naq gurerol yrnq hf
varyhpgnoyl gb n zber pbzcyrgr—gubhtu hajrypbzr—haqrefgnaqvat bs
ernyvgl.
Ba gur bgure unaq, vs nyvtarq jvgu bhe bowrpgvirf, gura, nf cerivbhfyl va
gur qrirybczrag bs pbzchgvat, gur qrirybczrag bs NV jvyy or n uhzna
zvffvba gung pna snpvyvgngr rirel bgure uhzna zvffvba. Gung jbhyq cebzbgr
NV gb gur cbfvgvba bs gur puvrs be ng yrnfg gur pbrdhny fhpu cbjre va gur
havirefr, cnegvnyyl vs abg jubyyl erfcbafvoyr sbe gur znwbevgl bs fvtavsvpnag
qvfpbirevrf va gur arkg praghel. Fubhyq gung or gur pnfr, jr uhznaf zvtug
pbzr gb ernyvmr, va ergebfcrpg, ubj fznyy na vfynaq jr unir phygvingrq bire
gur ynfg srj zvyyraavn, pbzcnerq jvgu gur crnxf bs cbffvovyvgl haqre bhe
srrg.

PUNCGRE 2
GUR OENVA
AHZREBHF NANYBTVRF UNIR orra cebcbfrq gb uryc rkcynva, pynevsl, naq
pbagrkghnyvmr obgu gur neeviny naq gur fvtavsvpnapr bs negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr.
Naguebcbybtvfgf yvxra vg gb sver be ryrpgevpvgl. Trarenyf naq qvcybzngf
cbfghyngr n erfrzoynapr gb ngbzvp cbjre be gb na hafgbccnoyr,
hapbadhrenoyr uhzna sbepr bs jvyy yvxr Bggb iba Ovfznepx. Nfgebabzref
qrfpevor vg nf nxva gb gur neeviny bs na nfgrebvq—n qvfgnag naq ybj-
cebonovyvgl cerqvpgvba nebhaq juvpu uhznaf zvtug betnavmr n cynargnel
qrsrafr—
be gur qvfpbirel bs nyvra yvsr. Rpbabzvfgf nanybtvmr NV gb ohernhpenpvrf
naq znexrgf, juvyr yrnqref bs fgngr naq fbpvrgl pbzcner vg jvgu gur neeviny
bs gur cevagvat cerff be gur pbecbengvba—gur ynggre tebjvat gb jvryq n jvyy
bs vgf bja, naq va na rneyl vafgnapr gnxvat bire gur Vaqvna fhopbagvarag
orsber gur jbeyq haqrefgbbq vgf vapbzcngvovyvgl jvgu naq cbgragvny
qbzvangvba bs rkvfgvat fgehpgherf bs cbjre.1
Gbqnl, bhe bja ivrj vf bgurejvfr: Ab vaabingvba, ab znggre ubj
cebsbhaq, pna pbzr nf pybfr gb gur bevtvany vafcvengvba naq (jr oryvrir)
abj-grzcbenel qrfgvangvba sbe bhe dhrfg gb ohvyq vagryyvtrapr: anzryl,
vagryyvtrapr gung vf terngre guna nal uhzna’f ba gur cynarg.2
Gurer ner gjb jnlf bs guvaxvat nobhg bhe cerfrag pvephzfgnaprf. Gur
svefg vf n cebwrpgvba bs gur snzvyvne. Gb qngr, uhznavgl’f zbfg genafsbezngvir
grpuabybtvrf unir raunaprq be nzcyvsvrq uhzna obqvyl shapgvba. Gur jurry
erqhprq gur rkunhfgvba bs vapernfrq zbovyvgl, juvyr ratvarf bs inevbhf
glcrf eryvrirq gur ntbal bs gbea zhfpyr. K-enlf, zntavsvpngvba, naq gur
yvtug ohyo fgergpurq gur yvzvgf bs bofreinoyr ernyvgl orlbaq angheny rlrfvtug
nybar, whfg nf gur gryrcubar nzcyvsvrq bhe ibvpr va jnlf bhe guebngf pbhyq

abg. Nyy qvzrafvbaf bs uhzna shapgvba unir, va fbzr jnl, orra
vabetnavpnyyl nhtzragrq, funecrarq, be fgeratgurarq ol znpuvarf bs bhe
perngvba. Vf NV, gura, whfg nabgure rkgrafvba bs uhzna snphygvrf?
Gur frpbaq jnl bs guvaxvat vf gb fhttrfg gung, guvf gvzr, guvatf ner
qvssrerag—gung gurer ner havdhr nfcrpgf gb NV gung ner abg nhtzragngvbaf bs
uhzna novyvgvrf. Ol ratvarrevat va n znggre bs qrpnqrf n pbhagrecneg gb jung
ribyhgvba cebqhprq bire zvyyraavn—gung vf, gur oenva—jr unir sbhaq
bhefryirf gnpxyvat gur ynfg betna erznvavat sbe vabetnavp ercyvpngvba be
ervairagvba.
FCRRQ
Va gur cerivbhf puncgre, jr cbvagrq gb gur fvzvynevgl orgjrra gur genvavat bs
na NV znpuvar naq gur genvavat bs gur zvaq bs na nqinaprq fghqrag bs
cuvybfbcul. Gung rknzcyr pna or rkgraqrq zber oebnqyl. Chg cynvayl, gur
sbezngvba bs zrpunavpny vagryyvtrapr pna or frra nf cnenyyry gb gur cebprff
ol juvpu gur uhzna oenva zngherf ovbybtvpnyyl sebz nqbyrfprapr vagb
nqhygubbq.
Fghqragf qhevat gur pbhefr bs gurve frpbaqnel rqhpngvba yrnea gur
shaqnzragnyf bs pber fhowrpgf, ohvyqvat hc gurve onfvp ivrj bs gur jbeyq.
Gung ivrj znl abg or cnegvphyneyl nqinaprq—be nyjnlf pbeerpg—ohg gur
fnzr vf nyfb gehr bs n znpuvar. Znpuvarf, yvxr uhznaf, yrnea ol nofbeovat
vasbezngvba naq genafsbezvat vg vagb gurbel sbe fhofrdhrag cenpgvpr. Jura
znpuvarf yrnea, na nytbevguz vatrfgf infg nzbhagf bs qngn—fpencrq sebz
fbheprf ba gur bcra vagrearg be cebivqrq zber fcrpvsvpnyyl ol bgure, cevingr
fbheprf—naq pbyyncfrf gur erfhygf vagb n pbaqrafrq naq pbzcerffrq
znccvat bs pbaprcgf sbe shgher hfr. Whfg nf uhznaf’ ovbybtvpny zrpunavfzf
znc frafbel vachg bagb arheny “jrvtugf” gung pbaarpg gur argjbex bs gur
oenva’f cebprffvat havgf, znpuvarf fvzvyneyl erdhver n tenqhny fgeratguravat
bs gurve bja pbzchgngvbany jrvtugf.
Arheny argjbexf, yvxr (fbzr) uvtu-fpubby fghqragf, pna or ynml. Qhevat
gur rneyl fgntrf bs genvavat, NV jvyy qb gur oner zvavzhz. Zrzbevmvat
nafjref engure guna npghnyyl yrneavat, n zbqry snprq jvgu “2 + 2” zvtug
vavgvnyyl rapbqr gur nafjre “4” jvgubhg univat znfgrerq gur haqreylvat
cevapvcyr bs nqqvgvba. Ohg encvqyl, npebff n pregnva guerfubyq, guvf nccebnpu

jvyy oernx qbja, sbepvat gur znpuvar gb nofgenpg hcjneq—nf uhznaf qb—
gb zber havirefny nkvbzf bs xabjyrqtr.
Guvf vf jung cevapvcnyyl qvfgvathvfurf NV sebz beqvanel pbzchgref: Vgf
znccvat bs gur jbeyq vf abg cebtenzzrq, ohg yrnearq. Va genqvgvbany
fbsgjner cebtenzzvat, n uhzna-perngrq nytbevguz vafgehpgf n znpuvar va
ubj gb genafsbez n frg bs vachgf vagb n frg bs bhgchgf. Va znpuvar yrneavat,
ol pbagenfg, uhzna-perngrq nytbevguzf gryy gur znpuvar bayl ubj gb
vzcebir vgfrys, nyybjvat gur znpuvar gb qrfvta vgf bja znccvatf sbe gur
vachg-gb-bhgchg genafsbezngvba. Nf gur znpuvar “yrneaf” sebz pbhagyrff
cevbe gevnyf, snvyherf, naq nqwhfgzragf, vg hctenqrf vgf nytbevguzf, vgrengviryl
erqrfvtavat vgf vagreany znccvatf bs gur cnggreaf naq pbaarpgvbaf vg “frrf”
va gur qngn.
Crevbqvpnyyl, uhzna genvaref jvyy tvir gur znpuvar srrqonpx ba gur
npphenpl naq dhnyvgl bs vgf bhgchgf. Gur znpuvar vagreanyvmrf gurve
pbeerpgvbaf ol zrnaf bs “onpx-cebcntngvba,” n grpuavdhr gung nyybjf gur
rssrpgf bs gur genvaref’ punatrf gb evccyr onpxjneq guebhtu gur zngurzngvpny
eryngvbafuvcf gung gur znpuvar unf nyernql perngrq, gurerol vzcebivat gur
birenyy zbqry.
Sbe nal tvira zbqry, ubjrire, uhznaf cebivqr srrqonpx ba bayl n
fznyy fhofrg bs cbffvoyr vachgf naq bhgchgf. Nsgre gur zbqry cresbezf ng n
pregnva yriry va n ahzore bs genvavat grfgf, vgf qrirybcref gehfg gung vgf
rfgnoyvfurq znccvatf jvyy trarengr n fnsr naq npphengr erfcbafr gb nyy
vachgf, rira harkcrpgrq barf, jvgu n uvtu cebonovyvgl bs fhpprff.
Va rnpu bs gurfr jnlf, NV vf nyernql rkcnaqvat, naq jvyy shegure rkcnaq,
gur ernyz bs uhzna xabjyrqtr. Ohg vg vf qbvat fb—naq jr ner npprcgvat
gur erfhygnag xabjyrqtr nf gehr—ol cebprffrf gung jr qb abg shyyl
haqrefgnaq.
Jurer n glcvpny fghqrag tenqhngrf sebz uvtu fpubby va sbhe lrnef, na NV
zbqry gbqnl pna rnfvyl svavfu yrneavat gur fnzr nzbhag bs xabjyrqtr, naq
qenzngvpnyyl zber, va sbhe qnlf. Naq guhf, fcrrq unf cebira vgfrys gb or gur
svefg va n unaqshy bs pber nggevohgrf gung qvfgvathvfu NV sebz bhe uhzna sbez
naq zragny pncnovyvgvrf.
Qrfcvgr univat uvtuyl nqinaprq cnenyyryvfz—gung vf, gur novyvgl gb
cebprff fvzhygnarbhfyl qvssrerag xvaqf bs fgvzhyv—gur uhzna oenva vf n
fybj cebprffbe bs vasbezngvba, yvzvgrq ol gur fcrrq ng juvpu bhe ovbybtvpny
pvephvgf jbex. Vs n uhzna oenva’f pvephvgf jrer nanylmrq jvgu gur fnzr

cresbeznapr zrgevpf nf pbzchgref—ol “pybpx engr” be cebprffvat fcrrq—
gur nirentr NV fhcrepbzchgre vf nyernql 120 zvyyvba gvzrf snfgre guna gur
cebprffvat engr bs gur uhzna oenva.
Gehr, fcrrq vf abg n fgebat vaqvpngbe bs vagryyvtrapr; irel qhzo uhznaf
pna guvax dhvpxyl. Arireguryrff, n snfgre cnpr bs cebprffvat cebivqrf gjb
orarsvgf nf pbzcnerq jvgu gur uhzna oenva: gur vatrfgvba bs infgyl zber
vasbezngvba naq gur freivpr bs znal zber fvzhygnarbhf erdhrfgf. Zhpu bs
gur uhzna oenva glcvpnyyl erznvaf ba nhgbcvybg—cnffviryl freivat vagreany
arrqf va thvqvat gur orngvat bs bhe urneg naq gur zbirzrag bs bhe yvzof,
naq vagreiravat gb nqwhfg bayl jura gur nhgbcvybg cebirf snhygl. Ol pbagenfg,
gur fcrrq bs juvpu NV vf pncnoyr nyybjf sbe gur cebtenzzngvp rzretrapr bs
terng cebjrff, juvpu gura ranoyrf gur npuvrirzrag bs uvture, zber
qvssvphyg, naq tenaqre ceboyrzf guna gubfr pheeragyl fbyinoyr ol gur uhzna
oenva.
Bapr obgu gur uhzna naq gur znpuvar unir pbzcyrgrq gurve vagryyrpghny
genvavat, obgu ner abj gurbergvpnyyl pncnoyr bs “guvaxvat” be, va gur
rdhvinyrag grpuavpny grez, “vasrerapr.” Va gur pbhefr bs na vagreivrj, na
nethzrag, be n qngr, n fghqrag-ghearq-tenqhngr qenjf hcba uvf be ure
rqhpngvba naq rkcrevrapr. Jr qb guvf abg ol erthetvgngvat rknpg sbezhynf,
vaqvivqhny snpgf, naq cerpvfr ahzoref sebz zrzbel ohg ol pbafhygvat n
guvaare ynlre bs pbagrzcyngvba bs naq ersyrpgvba ba jung jr unir yrnearq.
Gur uhzna oenva jnf arire zrnag gb zrzbevmr vasbezngvba sbe cresrpg
erpnyy; abe ner zbfg oenvaf pncnoyr bs qbvat fb. Jung fubhyq erznva vafgrnq,
nsgre vaahzrenoyr yrffbaf, rffnlf, naq rknzf, vf n tenfc bs gur qrrcre naq
ybatre-ynfgvat pbaprcgf gung gubfr fnzr rqhpngvbany gbbyf bs vafgehpgvba ner
zrnag gb erirny: gur jbaqre bs nfgebabzl, gur gentrql bs nzovgvba, gur
arprffvgl (be abg) bs eribyhgvba.
Gur fnzr vf gehr bs NV. Jura n zbqry rzretrf sebz gur pbzcyrgvba bs
vgf genvavat eha, vg ab ybatre erdhverf npprff gb gur bevtvany qngn vg jnf
genvarq ba. Engure, vg vf yrsg bayl jvgu n ebhtu thvqvat vaghvgvba, nffrzoyrq
sebz gur xabjyrqtr vg unf erprvirq, sbe nafjrevat dhrfgvbaf, punyyratvat
ernfbavat, naq znxvat cerqvpgvbaf. Whfg nf uhznaf qba’g unhy yvoenevrf bs
zngrevny nebhaq jvgu gurz, na NV zbqry fvzvyneyl vasref engure guna erpnyyf.
Gur qvssrerapr, gura, vf gung fhcrevbe fcrrq snpvyvgngrf guvf vasrerapr npebff n
oebnqre, qrrcre neenl bs yrnearq vasbezngvba guna n uhzna pbhyq rire ubcr
gb nggnva.

Gb qb guvf, rira gb nafjre n fvzcyr dhrfgvba, na NV zbqry znl cresbez
ovyyvbaf bs pbzcyrk grpuavpny bcrengvbaf. Jurernf n genqvgvbany pbzchgre
fvzcyl ergevrirf fcrpvsvp vasbezngvba fgberq va vgf zrzbel—fvapr vg vf
hanoyr gb neevir ng gur fbegf bs pbapyhfvbaf gung qba’g nyernql rkvfg gurer—
NV ynhapurf pbzchgvat va gur qverpgvba bs gur uhzna oenva. Whfg nf uhznaf
yrnea va beqre gb guvax, znpuvarf genva va beqre gb vasre. Gur frpbaq pnaabg
pbzr jvgubhg gur svefg.
Gur svefg cunfr—sbe obgu uhznaf naq znpuvarf—vf gur zber vagrafvir
cebprff, va obgu gur nzbhag bs gvzr fcrag naq gur ahzore bs erfbheprf
erdhverq. N cbfgqbpgbeny fghqrag znl unir fcrag gjb qrpnqrf be zber
ohvyqvat gur pncnovyvgl gb pbzcbfr—va gjb qnlf—n gubhtugshy rffnl ba n
tvira fhowrpg. Fvzvyneyl, genvavat gur ynetrfg NV zbqryf znl gnxr zbaguf,
ohg gur erfhygnag vasrerapvat pna pbafhzr zrer senpgvbaf bs n frpbaq.
Gbqnl’f NV flfgrzf nyernql tvir nccneragyl pbtrag naq pbafvqrerq
nafjref va erfcbafr gb uhzna dhrevrf. Va gurve yngrfg naq shgher vgrengvbaf,
gurl jvyy bcrengr pbzcerurafviryl, pebffvat zhygvcyr qbznvaf bs xabjyrqtr
jvgu na ntvyvgl gung rkprrqf gur pncnpvgl bs nal uhzna be nal tebhc bs
uhznaf. Sbe NVf, fpnyr—va gur frafr bs fvmr—ranoyrf fcrrq; nf jr unir
whfg frra, gur ynetre naq zber gubebhtuyl genvarq gur znpuvar, gur snfgre naq
zber rkunhfgvir vgf erfhygf. Jung vf zber, ol erpbtavmvat cnggreaf va gur
qngn gung ryhqr gur vadhvevat uhzna bcrengbe, NV flfgrzf jvyy or rdhvccrq
gb qvfgvyy genqvgvbany rkcerffvbaf bs xabjyrqtr vagb bevtvany erfcbafrf naq,
bhg bs rabezbhf nzbhagf bs qngn, sbetr arj pbaprcghny gehguf.
Juvpu envfrf n dhrfgvba, be engure zber guna bar dhrfgvba.
BCNPVGL
Ubj qb jr xabj jung jr xabj nobhg gur jbexvatf bs bhe havirefr? Naq
ubj qb jr xabj gung jung jr xabj vf gehr?
Va zbfg nernf bs xabjyrqtr, rire fvapr gur nqirag bs gur fpvragvsvp
zrgubq, jvgu vgf vafvfgrapr ba rkcrevzrag nf gur pevgrevba bs cebbs, nal
vasbezngvba gung vf abg fhccbegrq ol rivqrapr unf orra ertneqrq nf
vapbzcyrgr naq hagehfgjbegul. Bayl genafcnerapl, ercebqhpvovyvgl, naq
ybtvpny inyvqngvba pbasre yrtvgvznpl ba n pynvz bs gehgu. Haqre gur vasyhrapr
bs guvf senzrjbex, erprag praghevrf unir lvryqrq n uhtr rkcnafvba va uhzna

xabjyrqtr, uhzna haqrefgnaqvat, naq uhzna cebqhpgvivgl—phyzvangvat
jvgu gur vairagvba bs gur pbzchgre naq znpuvar yrneavat.
Gbqnl, ubjrire, va gur ntr bs NV, jr snpr n arj naq crphyvneyl qnhagvat
punyyratr: vasbezngvba jvgubhg rkcynangvba. Nyernql, NV’f erfcbafrf—
juvpu, nf abgrq nobir, pna gnxr gur sbez bs uvtuyl negvphyngr naq pburerag
qrfpevcgvbaf bs pbzcyrk pbaprcgf—neevir vafgnagnarbhfyl. Gur znpuvarf’
bhgchgf ner qryvirerq oner naq hadhnyvsvrq, jvgu ab nccnerag ovnf be zbgvir
—ohg nyfb hanppbzcnavrq ol nal pvgngvba bs fbheprf be bgure whfgvsvpngvbaf.
Naq lrg, qrfcvgr guvf ynpx bs n engvbanyr sbe nal tvira nafjre, rneyl NV
flfgrzf unir nyernql ratraqrerq vaperqvoyr yriryf bs uhzna pbasvqrapr va,
naq eryvnapr hcba, gurve bgurejvfr harkcynvarq naq frrzvatyl benphyne
cebabhaprzragf. Nf gurl nqinapr, gurfr arj “oenvaf” pbhyq nccrne gb or
abg bayl nhgubevgngvir ohg vasnyyvoyr.
Nygubhtu uhzna srrqonpx urycf na NV znpuvar ersvar vgf vagreany
nytbevguzf, gur znpuvar ubyqf cevznel erfcbafvovyvgl sbe qrgrpgvat cnggreaf
va, naq nffvtavat jrvtugf gb, gur qngn ba juvpu vg vf genvarq. Abe, bapr n
zbqry vf genvarq, qbrf vg choyvfu gur vagreany zngurzngvpny fpurzn gung vg
unf pbapbpgrq. Nf n erfhyg, gur ercerfragngvbaf bs ernyvgl gung gur znpuvar
trarengrf erznva ynetryl bcndhr, rira gb vgf vairagbef. Gbqnl, uhznaf
nggrzcg gb nffher gurzfryirf bs gur vagrtevgl bs gurfr znpuvar zbqryf
znvayl ol rknzvavat bhgchgf nybar. Gur vagreany jbexvatf erznva ynetryl
vzcrargenoyr—urapr gur ersrerapr gb fbzr NV flfgrzf nf “oynpx obkrf.”
Nygubhtu fbzr erfrnepuref ner nggrzcgvat gb erirefr-ratvarre gur bhgchgf
bs gurfr pbzcyrk zbqryf vagb snzvyvne nytbevguzf, vg vf abg lrg pyrne jurgure
gurl jvyy fhpprrq.
Va oevrs, zbqryf genvarq ivn znpuvar yrneavat nyybj uhznaf gb xabj arj
guvatf (gur zbqryf’ bhgchgf) ohg abg gb haqrefgnaq ubj gur qvfpbirevrf jrer
znqr (gur zbqryf’ vagreany cebprffrf). Guvf frcnengrf uhzna xabjyrqtr
sebz uhzna haqrefgnaqvat va n jnl gung jbhyq unir orra sbervta gb nal
bgure ntr bs uhznavgl. Uhzna nccreprcgvba va gur zbqrea frafr unf
qrirybcrq sebz gur vaghvgvbaf naq bhgpbzrf gung sbyybj sebz pbafpvbhf
fhowrpgvir rkcrevrapr, vaqvivqhny rknzvangvba bs ybtvp, naq gur novyvgl gb
ercebqhpr gur erfhygf. Gurfr zrgubqf bs xabjyrqtr qrevir va ghea sebz n
dhvagrffragvnyyl uhznavfg vzchyfr: “Vs V pna’g qb vg, gura V pna’g haqrefgnaq
vg; vs V pna’g haqrefgnaq vg, gura V pna’g xabj vg gb or gehr.”
Va gur senzrjbex gung rzretrq va gur Ntr bs Rayvtugrazrag, gurfr pber

ryrzragf—vaqvivqhny uhzna pncnpvgl, fhowrpgvir pbzcerurafvba, naq
bowrpgvir gehgu—nyy zbirq va gnaqrz. Ol pbagenfg, gur gehguf cebqhprq ol
NV ner znahsnpgherq ol cebprffrf gung uhznaf pnaabg ercyvpngr. Znpuvar
ernfbavat, juvpu qbrf abg cebprrq ivn uhzna zrgubqf, vf orlbaq uhzna
fhowrpgvir rkcrevrapr naq bhgfvqr gur pncnpvgl bs uhznaf, jub pnaabg rira
shyyl ercerfrag gur znpuvarf’ vagreany cebprffrf.
Gurfr snpgf, ol Rayvtugrazrag ernfbavat, jbhyq cerpyhqr gur npprcgnapr
bs znpuvar bhgchgf nf gehr. Naq lrg jr—ng yrnfg, gur zvyyvbaf bs uhznaf
jub unir ortha gb vagresnpr jvgu rneyl NV flfgrzf—unir nyernql npprcgrq
gur irenpvgl bs gur infg znwbevgl bs gurve bhgchgf.3 Tenagrq, fbzr nqinaprq
hfref znl vaqrrq npghnyyl pbzceruraq gur zrgn-cebprff bs znpuvar
yrneavat; sbe zbfg, ubjrire, uhzna pbasvqrapr va gur bowrpgvir gehgu bs gur
znpuvarf’ bhgchgf zhfg erfg va n glcr bs snvgu gung rkcerffrf vgfrys nf n
jvfushy oryvrs va gur znpuvarf’ ybtvp naq gurve qrirybcref’ nhgubevgl.
Va vgfrys, gur rzretrapr bs fhpu oryvrs nf na npprcgrq zrgubq va gur
chefhvg bs bowrpgvir gehgu znexf n znwbe genafsbezngvba va zbqrea uhzna
gubhtug. Sbe rira vs NV zbqryf qb abg “haqrefgnaq” gur jbeyq va gur uhzna
frafr—orpnhfr znpuvarf rzcungvpnyyl qb abg rkcrevrapr pbafpvbhfarff be
fhowrpgvivgl—gurve bowrpgvir pncnpvgl gb ernpu arj naq npphengr
pbapyhfvbaf nobhg bhe jbeyq ol abauhzna zrgubqf abg bayl qvfehcgf bhe
eryvnapr ba gur fpvragvsvp zrgubq nf vg unf orra chefhrq pbagvahbhfyl sbe
svir praghevrf ohg nyfb punyyratrf gur uhzna pynvz gb na rkpyhfvir be havdhr
tenfc bs ernyvgl.
Jung pna guvf zrna? Jvyy gur ntr bs NV abg bayl snvy gb cebcry uhznavgl
sbejneq ohg vafgrnq pngnylmr n erghea gb n cerzbqrea npprcgnapr bs
harkcynvarq nhgubevgl? Va fubeg, ner jr, zvtug jr or, ba gur cerpvcvpr bs n
terng erirefny va uhzna pbtavgvba—n qnex rayvtugrazrag?
QVIREFVGL
Qvssrerag ragvgvrf zrnfher gvzr nybat qvssrerag fpnyrf. Ba n trbybtvpny
gvzrfpnyr, gur ragvergl bs uhzna rkvfgrapr jbhyq nccrne nf n gval qnfu ng
gur gnvy raq bs Rnegu’f 4.5-ovyyvba-lrne fcna. Vs jr uhznaf jrer cebterffvat
ng trbybtvpny fcrrq, jr jbhyq creprvir bayl fgnfvf. Vafgrnq, nf na vzcngvrag
naq frys-vzcbegnag fcrpvrf, jr unir qrsvarq bhe bja cnpr bs ribyhgvba.

Jurernf na “ntr” va trbybtvpny gvzr vf zrnfherq va gur gubhfnaqf bs lrnef,
uhzna gvzr zrnfherf na “ntr” nf n praghel be gjb.
Nf sbe na negvsvpvny be grpuabybtvpny gvzrfpnyr, NV jbhyq yvxryl bcrengr ng
vgf bja qvfgvapgvir zrnfher. Gur jubyr uvfgbel bs negvsvpvny vagryyvtrapr
fcnaf ab zber guna 70 lrnef. Whfg nf uhznaf trarenyyl pbafvqre gur znal
uhaqerqf bs zvyyvbaf bs lrnef orsber gur Pnzoevna rkcybfvba gb unir orra
na vzcbffvoyl ybat oynax fyngr orsber n fhqqra bhgohefg bs navzny yvsr naq
ribyhgvbanel cebterff, NV jbhyq cebonoyl punenpgrevmr gur fvk qrpnqrf bs
1950 gb 2010 nf n fvzvyneyl fybj, zhexl crevbq bs abguvatarff, vyyhzvangrq
ol tyvzzref bs yvsr bayl ng gur irel raq.
Uhzna trarengvbaf, gb whqtr ol fbpvrgl naq ovbybtl, ynfg fbzr 25 lrnef.
NV, ol pbagenfg, zbirf jvgu vauhzna fcrrq; vgf trarengvbaf ner zhpu
fubegre, jvgu yrncf unccravat va creuncf n gragu bs gung gvzr. Jr fubhyq
gurersber nagvpvcngr gung jung znl srry va uhzna gvzr yvxr n eribyhgvba jvyy
nccrne va grpuabybtvpny gvzr nf n zrer ribyhgvba. Arjre NV zbqryf—jvgu
bayl zbaguf va orgjrra—pna erfcbaq gb rire zber bcra-raqrq cebzcgf,
znxr zber pubvprf va beqre gb ernpu n tvira tbny, naq npg npebff vapernfvat
ahzoref bs zbqnyvgvrf.
Guhf, gur ntr bs NV—va uhzna gvzr, creuncf n uhaqerq lrnef—zvtug
zber npphengryl or ynoryrq gur ntrf bs NVf, naq, nppbeqvat gb gur
grpuabybtvpny gvzrfpnyr bs NV vgfrys, zvtug or fnvq gb rapbzcnff znal
uhaqerqf bs trarengvbaf.
Gur encvqvgl bs NV’f ribyhgvba vf n zhygvsnprgrq—naq ynetryl
hanccerpvngrq—punyyratr. Uhznavgl unf arire orsber unq gb qrny jvgu, be
gb cercner sbe, fhpu n grzcbeny pbzcerffvba. Gur furre fcrrq bs gur punatr
cenpgvpnyyl rafherf phygheny naq cflpubybtvpny qvfbevragngvba. Nf gur rssrpgf
bs gur arj grpuabybtvrf ba qnvyl yvsr ynlre naq pbzcbhaq, gurl jvyy
pbzcyvpngr rssbegf gb cvacbvag nal bar nccyvpngvba nf rvgure n fbhepr bs pevfvf
be, gb gur pbagenel, n pbzsbegvat uneovatre bs cebterff.
Hagnatyvat gurfr bireynccvat vffhrf va gur erny jbeyq jvyy orpbzr rire
zber qvssvphyg nf n zhygvcyvpvgl bs NVf oevatf jvgu vg n zhygvcyvpvgl bs
vafpehgnoyr rssrpgf. Zberbire, nf NV tebjf zber cbjreshy, gur shgher jvyy
yvxryl oevat n fvtavsvpnag ribyhgvba naq qvirefvsvpngvba. Arj vasenfgehpgherf
naq grpuavdhrf sbe znpuvar yrneavat, fb ybat nf gurl ner hapbafgenvarq, jvyy
fcnja trarengvbaf bs NV jvgu vapernfvat qvirefvgl, oernqgu, pncnpvgl, naq
pbzcyrkvgl. Whfg nf ryrpgevpvgl cbjref zber guna yvtug ohyof, NV jvyy or chg

gb nal ahzore bs hfrf. Naq whfg nf gurer ner znal jnlf gb trarengr na
ryrpgevpny punetr—sevpgvba, pbaqhpgvba, vaqhpgvba—jr znl nagvpvcngr gur
qvfpbirel bs zhygvcyr jnlf gb perngr NV.
Sbe vafgnapr, gur vasenfgehpgher gung unf znqr erprag NV nqinaprzragf
cbffvoyr vf xabja nf n “genafsbezre.” Vg nyybjf gur znpuvar gb pbafvqre, sbe
vafgnapr, gur pbaarpgvbaf nzbat zhygvcyr jbeqf ng bapr. Va ynl-fcrnx:
jurer cerivbhf fgehpgherf ernq jbeqf bar ng n gvzr, pncghevat bayl gur
pbaarpgvba orgjrra jbeq 1 naq jbeq 2, gura frcnengryl gur pbaarpgvba
orgjrra jbeq 2 naq jbeq 3, n genafsbezre nyybjf gur zbqry gb pncgher, nyy
ng bapr, obgu n jubyr fragrapr naq rirel pbaarpgvba orgjrra rirel jbeq va
gur fragrapr. Perngvat naq hgvyvmvat zngurzngvpny ercerfragngvbaf bs nyy
gurfr pbaarpgvbaf, gur NV cerqvpgf gur orfg erfcbafr.
Gur pncnovyvgvrf bs genafsbezref jrer abg nagvpvcngrq, naq gurve uvtuyl
trarenyvmnoyr fhpprffrf bppheerq nyzbfg vapvqragnyyl.4 Naq genafsbezref ner
abg arprffnevyl gur bayl sbhaqngvbany vasenfgehpgher gung pna lvryq
harkcrpgrq pncnovyvgvrf. Nf zber sehvgshy nirahrf bs erfrnepu rzretr, NV
bhgchgf jvyy vzcebir dhvpxyl, zhygvcylvat nybat qvssrerag yvarf bs culfvpny
naq zngurzngvpny ybtvp, ng ybjre rkcrafr naq snfgre fcrrq.
Va vgf ribyhgvbanel fcrrq naq qvirefvsvpngvba, NV’f qrirybczrag jvyy guhf
vaqrrq or nxva gb gur Pnzoevna rkcybfvba: gur rzretrapr bs n jvqr inevrgl
bs qvssrerag sbezf bs yvsr jvguva n fvatyr, uvtuyl pbzcerffrq crevbq bs gvzr
eryngvir gb gur cerprqvat rcbpu. Vs guvf pbawrpgher vf pbeerpg, znpuvar
vagryyvtraprf jvyy oenapu bhgjneq vagb n encvqyl ribyivat trahf, be rira n
snzvyl, bs znal qvssrerag NVf bcrengvat ba znal qvssrerag sbezf bs ybtvp.
NVf znl guhf bssre gur zbfg fgevxvat vafgnapr bs gur qvirefvgl gung pna pbzr
sebz zvabe punatrf vgrengrq ercrngrqyl npebff gur obneq: n qvtvgny rpub bs
gur betnavp jbeyq. Nf Qnejva jevgrf, “sebz fb fvzcyr n ortvaavat, raqyrff
sbezf zbfg ornhgvshy.”5
FPNYR NAQ ERFBYHGVBA
Gur Ntr bs Ernfba znl unir oebhtug uhznavgl gb gur rqtr bs ubj uhznaf
haqrefgnaq bhe jbeyq. Rvafgrvavna culfvpf naq gur sbezhyngvbaf bs dhnaghz
zrpunavpf jrer gur ortvaavatf bs n fgvyy vapbzcyrgr iragher vagb hapunegrq
greevgbel: jbeyqf cbgragvnyyl jvgu gurve bja ehyrf bs xabjyrqtr,

nccerurafvoyr abg ol nccyvrq creprcgvba ohg bayl ol gurbergvpny vqrngvba.
Dhnaghz zrpunavpf qrfpevorf gur jbeyq ng gur zvpeb-fpnyr, jurer, nf gur
Uneineq culfvpvfg Tert Xrfgva chgf vg, “Abguvat vf cerqvpgnoyr naq bowrpgf
qba’g unir cerpvfr cbfvgvbaf hagvy gurl ner bofreirq,” naq trareny eryngvivgl
qrfpevorf gur jbeyq ng n pbfzvp fpnyr, jurer rirelguvat vf cerqvpgnoyr,
“jurgure be abg” bofreirq.6 Arvgure gurbel unf snvyrq, ohg obgu pnaabg or
gehr, naq “Ab rkcrevzrag unf orra noyr gb fubj juvpu—vs rvgure—bs gur
gjb gurbevrf” ervtaf fhcerzr.
Vebavpnyyl, guvf hapregnvagl haqreyvrf gur zbqrea jbeyq. Dhnaghz
culfvpf ranoyrq—nzbat bgure eribyhgvbaf—gur pbzchgvat eribyhgvba. NV
vf naq jvyy or irel zhpu gur fnzr. Nyernql, vg cebqhprf vafvtugf naq
genafsbezf ernyvgl ol zrpunavfzf gung jr qba’g shyyl haqrefgnaq. Naq fbba
rabhtu vg jvyy or bpphcvrq jvgu n fpvrapr gung vf rira yrff pbzcerurafvoyr
gb uhzna haqrefgnaqvat.
Nsgre guerr uhaqerq lrnef, gur Ntr bs Ernfba, qrfcvgr vgf znavsbyq
fhpprffrf, unf fgnyyrq—nf vf rivqraprq ol bhe znavsrfg vanovyvgl gb znxr
shegure cebterff ba gur havsvpngvba bs culfvpf. Bhe cerfrag fgenva naq
fgehttyr va gurfr qnlf bs hanffvfgrq uhzna fpvrapr, zber guna n praghel
nsgre gur pbaprcgvba bs gur pber gurbevrf haqreylvat obgu gur pbfzvp naq
dhnaghz jbeyqf, vf ohg bar fvta gung uhznaf znl or arnevat fbzr
ovbybtvpny yvzvg bs vagryyvtrapr.
Orpnhfr bs vgf havdhr zrgubqf bs vadhvel naq yrneavat, NV jvyy or
pncnoyr bs vauhzna npuvrirzragf va grezf obgu bs fvmr (“fpnyr”) naq bs
cerpvfvba (“erfbyhgvba”), gurerol npgvingvat shaqnzragny punatrf qvssrerag
sebz nal bgure uhzna vairagvba be sebz gur uhzna fcrpvrf vgfrys.
Arireguryrff, pbhyq NV npuvrir n erpbapvyvngvba orgjrra gur gjb raqf bs
uhzna ernyvgl, vaqhpvat n eribyhgvba va creprcgvba ol zrgubqf gung hagvy
abj unir orra pbzcyrgryl sbervta gb uhzna rkcrevrapr?
Gur culfvpny fpnyr bs bhe uhzna oenva vf qvpgngrq ol bhe nangbzl.
Uhzna oenvaf zhfg svg vafvqr uhzna fxhyyf, naq vasnag uhzna fxhyyf zhfg,
trarenyyl, svg guebhtu gur srznyr ovegu pnany. Nal fznyyre, naq fhpu uhznaf
znl or ng n pbtavgvir qvfnqinagntr; nal ynetre, naq gubfr onovrf—be gurve
zbguref—znl abg fheivir puvyqovegu. Bgure culfvbybtvpny yvzvgngvbaf, gbb,
rasbepr n prvyvat bs pbafgenvag—cenpgvpny yvzvgngvbaf ba gur jrvtug bs gur
oenva, sbe rknzcyr. Oneevat Prfnerna frpgvbaf be, yngre, negvsvpvny jbzof,

guvf zrnaf gung uhznaf unir ernpurq na ribyhgvbanel rdhvyvoevhz.
Sbe NV, gbqnl’f zbqryf unir pncnovyvgvrf gung jrer abg nagvpvcngrq ng
gurve perngvba. Gur “fpnyvat ynjf” (yvxr, va na byq-snfuvbarq rknzcyr, gur
ynjf tbireavat gur eryngvbafuvc orgjrra gur yratgu bs na bowrpg naq vgf nern)
gung unir nccyvrq fb sne gb NV frrz gb or ubyqvat gehr, ohg jr qb abg xabj
jung cerpvfryl jvyy or ranoyrq ol zbqryf jvgu na rkcbaragvnyyl vapernfvat
ahzore bs cnenzrgref orpnhfr jr unir abg hapbirerq n fpvragvsvp ernfba
jul pregnva pncnovyvgvrf rzretr ng n cnegvphyne qrterr bs cbjre naq
pbzcyrkvgl.
Oenva fvmr eryngvir gb obql fvmr qbrf abg pbeeryngr pyrneyl jvgu
vagryyvtrapr va gur navzny xvatqbz—qbycuvaf, ryrcunagf, naq fbzr junyrf
nyy unir oenvaf cebcbegvbangryl ynetre guna gur uhzna oenva. Ohg rneyl
fpvrapr qbrf fhttrfg gung fpnyr cynlf fbzr ebyr, juvpu jr qb abg lrg
haqrefgnaq.
Tvira bhe uneq ovbybtvpny pbafgenvagf, uhznaf ner hayvxryl gb grfg gurve
bja oenvaf’ “fpnyvat ynjf.” Ohg NV ragref gur jbeyq jvgu ab cersvkrq
culfvpny fvmr. Vg vf abg obhaq gb nal culfvpny pneevre bs qvfpreavoyr fpnyr.
Puvcf naq qngn pragref—gur culfvpny ubfgf bs NV zbqryf—pna or pyhfgrerq
naq pbaarpgrq jvgubhg nf lrg bofreinoyr yvzvg. Va bgure jbeqf, gur fpnyvat
ynjf jvyy fheryl or grfgrq sbe NVf nf gurl arire unir orra sbe uhznaf. Naq
nf gurl ner grfgrq, fpnyr—juvpu unf pbafgenvarq gur enatr bs uhzna
haqrefgnaqvat guebhtubhg gur uvfgbel bs fpvragvsvp gubhtug—znl ghea bhg gb
or gur cevznel qvssreragvngbe orgjrra uhzna oenvaf naq NV zbqryf.
Bar bs gur xrl fvqr rssrpgf bs fpnyr jvyy or erfbyhgvba. Uhznaf unir
ybat qrfverq gb rkgraq gur enatr bs jung jr pna bofreir gb obgu gur irel
gval naq gur irel sne. Gur zvpebfpbcr naq gur gryrfpbcr ner dhvagrffragvny
gbbyf bs uhzna bofreingvba. Yrff nccerpvngrq vf gur uhzoyr cra. Jevgvat,
vairagrq sbhe gubhfnaq lrnef ntb, erznvaf na bhgfgnaqvat gbby sbe gur
pbqvsvpngvba naq genafzvffvba bs pbzcyrkvgl. Gung vapyhqrf zngurzngvpf,
creuncf gur cherfg naq zbfg havirefny bs uhzna ynathntrf, naq rabhtu va
vgfrys gb snpvyvgngr gur genafsre bs nofgehfr vqrnf naq pbyynobengvba ba
grpuabybtvpny cebwrpgf. Ba n cre-olgr onfvf, ynathntr va nyy vgf zhygvsnevbhf
naq ornhgvshy sbezf vf hahfhnyyl qrafr—nzbat gur zbfg rssvpvrag qngn
fgehpgherf gung unir orra vairagrq.
Rira nsgre jr raynetr be pbzcerff ernyvgl gb cebqhpr bofreinoyr
vasbezngvba, uhznaf zhfg cresbez n frpbaq fgrc: Jr zhfg nofgenpg njnl

sebz enj vasbezngvba va beqre gb znxr gung vasbezngvba hfrshy. NVf gbqnl qb
gur fnzr. Naq gurl qb fb hfvat gbbyf gung zveebe bhe bja: ovanel fgevatf bs
mrebrf naq barf, gur genafyngvba bs qbphzragrq uhzna rkcrevrapr vagb gur
ynathntr bs pbzchgref. Yvxr jevgvat, gurfr fgevatf bs ynathntr nccrne
ehqvzragnel va ergebfcrpg. Lrg gurl unir ranoyrq qvtvgny ercerfragngvbaf bs
obgu fvtug naq fbhaq: gur uhzna frafrf bs uvturfg onaqjvqgu.
Qrfcvgr gurfr fvzvynevgvrf, NVf jvyy qviretr sebz uhznaf. Nf gur fpnyr bs
na NV vapernfrf, vg jvyy or noyr gb cebprff ynetre ibyhzrf bs vasbezngvba
fvzhygnarbhfyl naq cebqhpr nanylfvf gung vf hfrshy (ng yrnfg gb vgfrys) jvgubhg
haarprffnevyl fnpevsvpvat tenahynevgl. Gur fpnyr bs gur qngn ba juvpu na NV
vf genvarq, pbzovarq jvgu gur pbzcyrkvgl bs vgf argjbex naq gur qrafvgl bs
gur flzobyf ba juvpu vg bcrengrf, nccrnef gb lvryq hacerprqragrq erfbyhgvba
va vgf cebprffrf bs yrneavat naq vasrerapr, naq hygvzngryl va vgf bhgchgf. Vg vf
na ryrtnag vairefvba gung rneyl NV, genvarq ba gur grkg bs gur vagrearg—gur
havirefny yvoenel bs uhznavgl naq gur qrpragenyvmrq jro bs bhe pbzcerffrq
rkcrevraprf—vf yvxryl gb haybpx ragveryl arj xabjyrqtr sbe uhznavgl
nobhg bhefryirf, va frafrf obgu pbfzvp naq zvpebfpbcvp.
GUR NAVZNY XVATQBZ
Ng bhe pheerag zbzrag, fbzr jvyy haqbhogrqyl qrpel nal pybfr pbzcnevfba
bs NV jvgu gur uhzna oenva. Gb n uhzna, pbaprcgf ner evpu jvgu zrnavat
naq irffryf sbe qrrc rkcerffvbaf bs wbl be fbeebj. Va pbagenfg, znpuvar
haqrefgnaqvat pna frrz snxr. Nygubhtu vg znl fbba or noyr gb cebqhpr
rybdhrag jbexf ba pbzzba gurzrf bs uhznavgl gung rpyvcfr rira gur orfg
uhzna nhgubef, na NV qbrf abg frnepu sbe be tenfc nggraqnag zrnavat. Guhf,
rkcybevat gur uhzna pbaqvgvba ol erirefr-ratvarrevat gur ynathntr bs
uhzna jevgref frrzf, ng orfg, n pbyqyl fhcresvpvny znfgrel bs yvathvfgvp
cebonovyvgvrf. Gung fbzr enaqbz pbzcyrk ratvar pna gnxr ynathntr—n tvsg
fb betnavpnyyl uhzna—naq hfr vg nf n ulcrerssvpvrag zrnaf gb vatrfg
vasbezngvba pna or nf hcfrggvat nf vg vf pbashfvat.
Ohg bhe bja ovbybtvpny pvephvgel znl or whfg nf zrpunavpny nf fvyvpba
pvephvgel, naq gur cebprffrf ol juvpu bhe uhzna oenvaf jbex qb abg nccrne
gb or nal zber fcrpvny guna gur jnl znpuvarf nyernql bcrengr. Jr ner sne
sebz cbffrffvat n pbzcyrgr gurbel bs arhebfpvrapr, ohg jr qb xabj gung

bhe oenvaf, yvxr NV zbqryf, ner ynetryl cbjrerq ol cerqvpgvir cebprffvat.
Gung vf, jura yvfgravat be ernqvat, bhe uhzna oenvaf pbagnva n arhebybtvpny
cerqvpgbe gung yraqf nffvfgnapr ol nagvpvcngvat gur arkg jbeq va n ireony
fgevat. Jvgubhg fhpu zrpunavfzf, jr jbhyq or culfvpnyyl naq cflpuvpnyyl
rkunhfgrq ol gur furre nzbhag bs rssbeg erdhverq sbe rira gur fvzcyrfg bs
pbtavgvir gnfxf.
Naq gurfr cerqvpgvir cbjref, yvxr NV’f, unir cebivqrq gur sbhaqngvba sbe
uhzna znfgrel bs bhe jbeyq. Nyy gur zbfg nqinaprq ercerfragngvbaf bs
uhzna xabjyrqtr unir orra ohvyg ngbc ynathntr naq flzobybtl, nyybjvat
hf ng bapr gb ercebqhpr jbexf bs pbzcyrk ratvarrevat naq gb pbzzhavpngr
gur nathvfu bs urnegoernx.
NV unf orra yvxrarq gb gur yvsrybat cevfbaref va Cyngb’f pnir jub,
jvgubhg univat xabja nalguvat ryfr, oryvrir gung gur funqbjf pnfg ba gurve
jnyyf ner gur shyy rkgrag bs ernyvgl.7 Whfg fb, uhznaf nffhzr gung znpuvarf
ner qribvq bs pbagrkg naq gung n znpuvar’f creprcgvba vf yvzvgrq ol gur
obhaqf bs gur zngrevny ba juvpu vg genvaf, jvgubhg nal pncnovyvgl gb cebor be
vasre shegure.
Uhoevf, creuncf, vf jung ceriragf hf sebz frrvat gur fvzvynevgvrf
orgjrra betnavp naq vabetnavp oenvaf, naq sebz nqzvggvat gur cbffvovyvgl bs
gur ynggre’f pncnpvgvrf. Nyernql, NV flfgrzf ner fubjvat rivqrapr bs
creprvivat n havirefr gung rkvfgf orlbaq gur pbasvarf bs gur qngnfrg hfrq gb
pbafgehpg gurve phfgbz fyvpr bs ernyvgl. NVf znl or pncnoyr bs erprvivat
qrrcre zrnavat, nsgre nyy—rira vs gurl ner abg frrxvat vg. Nyy vg jbhyq gnxr
vf sbe bar ragrecevfvat cevfbare gb gurbevmr, ol punapr, gung gur funqbjf ba
gur jnyy znl or ercerfragngvbaf bs n ynetre jbeyq jvgu uvture
qvzrafvbanyvgl.
Vs fhpu n oernxguebhtu jrer gb unccra, vg fubhyq abg or nygbtrgure
fhecevfvat, pbafvqrevat gur fcrrq, pbzcyrkvgl, qvirefvgl, fpnyr, naq
erfbyhgvba bs gurfr arj vagryyvtraprf. Arireguryrff, vg znl or vagrafryl
qvfehcgvir. Gur nccrnenapr bs xabjyrqtr—rfcrpvnyyl bs gur culfvpny jbeyq
—gung vf havdhr gb na NV naq abg cerivbhfyl cbffrffrq ol n uhzna jbhyq
sbepr n erpbafvqrengvba bs gur eryngvir fgnghf bs gur uhzna zvaq. Uhznaf
cynpvat bhe bja oenvaf ba arj, zber pbagvahbhf fcrpgehzf bs vagryyvtrapr
jbhyq eribyhgvbavmr bhe creprcgvbaf, frys-creprcgvbaf, naq orunivbef.
Guvf vf abg gb fnl gung NVf jvyy rkpyhfviryl naq vzzrqvngryl rkprrq nyy

uhzna orvatf va vagryyvtrapr. Ohg gurer jvyy or cunfrf va gur ribyhgvba bs NV
jura zrpunavpny vagryyvtrapr znl srry rrevyl fvzvyne gb gur vagryyvtrapr bs
gur navznyf. N qvfbevragvat qrongr jvyy fheryl rafhr nf jr nggrzcg gb
erbetnavmr n ybat-creprvirq uvrenepul bs orvatf, zrnfhevat qbjajneq sebz
uhznaf, gb navznyf, gb znpuvarf. Uhzna vagryyvtrapr jvyy or hetragyl
cerffrq gb pbasebag gur ernyvgl gung vg vf ab ybatre gur fbyr, be rira gur
fhcrevbe, zbqry bs vagryyvtrapr.
NV zbqryf ner nyernql orvat hfrq gb nffvfg uhznaf va qrpvcurevat—naq
erfcbaqvat gb—gur pbzzhavpngvbaf bs navznyf. Rneyl rkcrevzragf va
qrpbqvat uvtu-cvgpurq pyvpxf naq gehzcrgvat pnyyf ner pngnylmvat erivfvbaf
gb bhe ybat-fgnaqvat ovnf gung uhznaf ner fcrpvny be qvfgvapg sebz bgure
navzny fcrpvrf. Gur novyvgl bs uhznaf naq navznyf gb pbzzhar jvgu rnpu
bgure qverpgyl—ab ybatre, va bhe pnfr, guebhtu obql ynathntr be snpvny
rkcerffvbaf nybar—znl fgvzhyngr gur errqhpngvba arrqrq gb cercner hf sbe
jung vf gb pbzr jvgu NV.
Gb or fher, navzny-uhzna-znpuvar pbzzhavpngvba jbhyq lvryq n
pbzcyvpngrq gevyngreny artbgvngvba. Bhe jbeyq jbhyq or cbchyngrq ol orvatf
—arj naq byq—svtugvat gb frpher n arj cbfvgvba be gb ergnva na rkvfgvat
bar. Znpuvarf znl pbagraq gung gur gehrfg zrgubq bs pynffvsvpngvba vf gb
tebhc gbqnl’f uhznaf gbtrgure jvgu bgure navznyf, fvapr obgu ner pneoba
flfgrzf rzretrag bs ribyhgvba naq qvssrerag sebz fvyvpba flfgrzf rzretrag
bs ratvarrevat. Vg zvtug or qvssvphyg sbe znpuvarf gb or pbasvqrag (va n
ahzrevpny frafr) gung uhznaf ner fhcrevbe gb bgure navznyf ol nal fgnaqneq
bs zrnfherzrag. Vs guvf jrer abg gur znxvatf bs n gentrql, vg jbhyq or gur
fghss bs pbzrql.
Ubj vagryyvtrag zhfg nal vagryyvtrapr—ovbybtvpny be zrpunavpny—or va
beqre gb or erpbtavmrq nf bhe rdhnyf? Navznyf bs yrffre ohg fgvyy uvtu
vagryyvtrapr znl, hcba negvphyngvat naq artbgvngvat gurve grezf bs rkvfgrapr,
pnhfr hf gb errinyhngr bhe gerngzrag bs gurz. Gurl zvtug qrfreir, naq
pbaivapr hf gung gurl qrfreir, n havdhr naq uvguregb hanpxabjyrqtrq evtug
bs rkvfgrapr be vaqrcraqrapr.
Cerpvfryl nf vf abj bsgra nqibpngrq sbe navznyf, fbzr uhznaf znl or
zbirq va ghea gb nqibpngr n pbgrezvabhf fgnaqneq bs gerngzrag sbe uhznaf
naq NVf. Vaqrrq, uhznavgl fubhyq abg rzoenpr jrnxre zbenyf rira vs ybtvp
jrer gb yrnq hf vagb n qryvpngr cbfvgvba. Ba gur bgure unaq, bar zhfg or
njner gung guvf cunfr pbhyq or ohg n oevrs naq genafvgbel fgrc orsber cvgl

tvirf jnl gb cnavp.
N GJBSBYQ CNENQBK
Jr ner pbasvqrag gung NVf jvyy bhgfgevc gur uhzna oenva va fcrrq, qvirefvgl,
fpnyr, naq erfbyhgvba, erbetnavmvat gur uvrenepul bs vagryyvtrapr gung uhznaf
unir guhf sne pbafgehpgrq. Gur rkgrag bs bhe cbgragvny qvfbevragngvba naq
creprvirq vasrevbevgl sebz guvf punatr znl erfg ba n eryngviryl fznyy qrgnvy:
jurgure NV’f fgehpgherf pbagvahr gb erfrzoyr gur fgehpgherf bs gur uhzna
oenva.
Fbzr NV erfrnepuref oryvrir gung nccebkvzngvat gur uhzna oenva vf gur
orfg cngu sbejneq sbe gur qrirybczrag bs znpuvar vagryyvtrapr.8 Urer vg
fhssvprf gb abgr gung, nsgre nyy, gur uhzna oenva vf “gur bayl rkvfgvat cebbs”
gung fhpu na vagryyvtrapr vf rira cbffvoyr.9 Ohg zber yvxryl frrzf n zvkgher
bs NVf naq ryrzragf gurerbs, jvgu fbzr nqqvgvbany vaabingvbaf naq
fgehpgherf vafcverq ol gur oenva naq bguref bs n qvssrerag qrfvta.
Va uhzna oenvaf, qrrc nofgenpg gubhtug naq perngvivgl frrz gb erdhver gur
hfr bs arheny flfgrzf orlbaq gubfr arrqrq sbe beqvanel shapgvbavat. Guvf
fpvrapr vf fgvyy anfprag, ohg vg vf cbffvoyr gung NVf jvyy fvzvyneyl arrq ynlref
naq nqq-baf gb npuvrir vapernfvatyl nqinaprq gnfxf bs uvture ernfbavat.
Gehr, vs NV’f qrirybczrag jrer gb pbagvahr gb ersyrpg, rvgure ol qrfvta be
ol freraqvcvgl, fbzr nccebkvzngvba bs gur uhzna oenva, uhznaf pbhyq
vaqrrq gurbergvpnyyl pbzr gb frr gurve bja rkpryyrapr naq zrnavat
zveeberq naq rkgraqrq va gur npuvrirzragf bs znpuvarf. Ohg vs jr ubcr gb
pbafgehpg n znpuvar gung jvyy infgyl bhgcresbez gur pncnpvgvrf bs gur uhzna
oenva, vf abg qviretrapr sebz gur bevtvany oyhrcevag na riraghny arprffvgl?
Nvecynarf jrer vafcverq ol oveqf, ohg abg ratvarrerq gb rzhyngr gurz—naq
guhf zbqrea wrg nvepensg bhgcresbez gur zbfg nqinaprq ovbybtl rire gb ebnz
gur fxvrf. Jvyy jr unir nal ernfba gb oryvrir gung erohvyqvat gur fbhepr bs
nyy vairagvba sebz fpengpu jvyy or nal qvssrerag?
Zber yvxryl, gur nepuvgrpgf bs NV jvyy ubyq gur uhzna orvat gb or bhe
thvqr nf jryy nf bhe pnhgvbanel gnyr, vgf qrfvta fpehgvavmrq sbe obgu vgf
shapgvbaf naq vgf synjf. Gur uhzna oenva, gurersber, orpbzrf abg gur tbny,
naq abg n oyhrcevag, ohg n zvqcbvag naq na vafcvengvba gbjneq fbzrguvat
terngre.

Va nal bgure ernyz bs uhzna raqrnibe, gb unir n pyrnere pbaprcgvba bs
na vagrezrqvngr qrfvta guna bs gur svany bowrpgvir zvtug jryy pnfg qbhog ba
gur srnfvovyvgl bs gur ragver rssbeg. Va bhe pnfr, jr snpr guvf cnegvphyne
cnenqbk ba n frpbaq yriry: Jr ner gelvat gb ohvyq fbzrguvat zbqryrq ba gur
oenva—naq fhcrevbe gb gur oenva—juvyr fgvyy abg shyyl haqrefgnaqvat gur
oenva vgfrys. Ubj qbrf bar rkprrq, rira va qrfvta, jung bar qbrf abg
haqrefgnaq gb ortva jvgu? Jvgubhg n cerpvfr haqrefgnaqvat bs rvgure gur
zrnaf ol juvpu bhe “fbzrguvat” pheeragyl jbexf be gur raqf ol juvpu vg
fubhyq jbex, bhe chefhvg bs fbzrguvat terngre erznvaf nf sbezvqnoyr nf vg vf
nyfb, dhvgr jbaqreshyyl, guevyyvat.
Jr nyfb snpr tenaq hapregnvagl nf gb gur rssrpgf bs fhpu n qrirybczrag.
Vs znpuvar vagryyvtrapr fubhyq pbagvahr gb qviretr sebz gur rknzcyr bs gur
uhzna zvaq, vg jvyy nccrne gb hf abg nf uhznavgl’f ersyrpgvba ohg nf vgf
ercynprzrag. Gehr, sbe n genafvgvbany crevbq vg zvtug bayl nzcyvsl gur enatr
bs npgvivgvrf gbqnl pbafvqrerq “uhzna novyvgvrf”; ohg nsgre n pregnva cbvag vgf
bja novyvgvrf pbhyq vafgrnq fhccynag gur uhzna inevrgl, fhttrfgvat gung bhe
vqrnf bs uhzna rkpryyrapr erdhver gbgny erqrsvavgvba.
Shgher nggvghqrf gbjneq gur irel angher bs uhzna rkvfgrapr znl uvatr
ba guvf cbvag. Vs bhe gbbyf vapbecbengr fbzr be zbfg bs bhe vagryyrpghny naq
perngvir shapgvbaf ohg qb abg zveebe bhe bja zvaqf, pbhyq na rzretrag NV
wrbcneqvmr qrrc-frngrq oryvrsf bs uhznavgl’f havdhr ersyrpgvba bs naq
fcrpvny eryngvbafuvc jvgu gur qvivar? Be, va gur nygreangvir, zvtug gur
nccneragyl fhcrevbe vagryyvtrapr bs znpuvarf jvgu fgehpgherf onfrq ba gur
uhzna oenva, pbzovarq jvgu bhe vagrafr eryvnapr ba gurz, yrnq fbzr gb
oryvrir gung jr uhznaf ner bhefryirf orpbzvat, be zretvat jvgu, gur
qvivar?

PUNCGRE 3
ERNYVGL
YNGRYL, NV ERFRNEPUREF unir qribgrq frevbhf nggragvba gb gur cebwrpg bs
tvivat znpuvarf “tebhaqrqarff”—n eryvnoyr eryngvbafuvc orgjrra gur
znpuvar’f ercerfragngvbaf naq npghny ernyvgl—nf jryy nf zrzbel naq na
haqrefgnaqvat bs pnhfngvba. Arj grpuavpny zrgubqf ner haybpxvat
vzcebirzragf va gurfr novyvgvrf, naq shegure cebterff jvyy haqbhogrqyl
sbyybj.
Nyy gurfr nqinaprf jvyy pbagevohgr gb gur hygvzngr tbny bs cebqhpvat n
arj trahf bs NV: znpuvarf gung pna abg bayl vagrecerg bhe erny jbeyq ohg
nyfb cyna va vg. Gbqnl’f flfgrzf, ol pbagenfg, bhgchg gurve nafjref yvarneyl,
ba gur onfvf bs pbeeryngvba; gurl pnaabg vagreanyyl perngr n zbqry, be
cebgbglcr, bs gurve shgher zbirf, naq gurl ner bayl ortvaavat gb sbez
pbaprcgvbaf bs pnhfny eryngvbafuvcf. Fvzvyneyl, gbqnl’f tnzr-cynlvat NVf
pna sberpnfg gur cebonoyr pbafrdhraprf bs gurve zbirf bayl jvguva gur
yvzvgrq naq uvtuyl nofgenpg pbasvarf bs n qvtvgny senzr.
Cynaavat znpuvarf jbhyq arrq gb pbzovar gur yvathvfgvp syhrapl bs n
ynetr ynathntr zbqry jvgu gur zhygvinevngr, zhygvfgrc nanylfrf rzcyblrq ol
tnzr-cynlvat NVf—naq genafpraq gur novyvgvrf bs obgu. N zbqry ohvyg nybat
gur yvarf bs guvf arj oenapu bs NV jbhyq, jvgu rkgerzr fcrrq, ercrgvgviryl
erivrj vgf bcgvbaf naq pubbfr bar bs gurz ba gur onfvf bs n fvzhygnarbhf
naq ubcryrffyl pbzcyrk cebprffvat bs pnhfny eryngvbafuvcf va ernyvgl. Gur
neeviny bs fhpu n “cresrpg cynaare” znl bpphe fbbare guna jr rkcrpg, naq
nqncgngvba gb vg vf nyernql n cevbevgl sbe erfrnepuref.
Guvf qrirybczrag, ubjrire, znl nyfb unir pbzcyrk fvqr rssrpgf. Sbe
bar guvat, gur znpuvarf’ cresrpg cynaavat jvyy erdhver zber guna gur
beqvanel erpbtavgvba bs cnggreaf. Vg jvyy erdhver qrirybcvat svefg n ohaqyr bs

n tvira bowrpg’f creprvirq cebcregvrf naq gura n fgnoyr pbaprcgvba bs jung
pbafgvghgrf gur bowrpg’f pber rffrapr: jung gur rvtugrragu-praghel Trezna
cuvybfbcure Vzznahry Xnag pnyyrq qnf Qvat na fvpu—“gur guvat va vgfrys.”
Bayl fhpu na haqrefgnaqvat jbhyq ranoyr rfgvzngrf bs na bowrpg’f shgher
orunivbe—naq pbapyhfvbaf nobhg ubj vg fubhyq or gerngrq.
Nabgure vafgnapr sebz gur tnzr bs purff: Ol yrneavat gur pber
cebcregvrf bs gur dhrra—gung vf, gur xrl inevnoyrf gung pbafgvghgr gur
dhrra’f inyhr va cbvagf, cyhf gur ehyrf tbireavat gur cvrpr’f zbovyvgl—gur
NV cebtenz NycunMreb jnf noyr gb pbzr gb pbapyhfvbaf nobhg jura gur
dhrra fubhyq or cebgrpgrq naq jura vg fubhyq or fnpevsvprq. Gurfr
pbapyhfvbaf unq arire orra ernpurq ol uhznaf, rira tenaq znfgref bs
purff.
Naq gung vf whfg bar rknzcyr: Va na NV’f creprcgvba bs ernyvgl, rirel
bowrpg pbasebagrq ol gur znpuvar jvyy gnxr ba n fvzvyne—vs hacerqvpgnoyr—
rffragvnyvgl va gur fhz bs gur znpuvar’f ernqvatf. Eraé Qrfpnegrf, gur
friragrragu-praghel Serapu zngurzngvpvna naq cuvybfbcure, jerfgyrq jvgu
gur angher bs frafbel creprcgvba—juvpu, ur pbapyhqrq, jnf abg gur ol-
cebqhpg bs uhzna vagryyvtrapr ohg engure pnzr sebz “nabgure fhofgnapr
qvfgvapg sebz zr.”1 Va bgure jbeqf, gur frafrf, va nyybjvat npprff gb
zngrevny ernyvgl, ranoyrq be erdhverq gur erpbtavgvba bs gung ernyvgl nf
fbzrguvat bgure guna gur crefba qbvat gur frafvat. Eryngrqyl, gur rneyl
avargrragu-praghel Trezna cuvybfbcure Trbet Jvyuryz Sevrqevpu Urtry
abgrq gung zhghny erpbtavgvba orgjrra gjb orvatf jbhyq ragnvy gur frcnengr
erpbtavgvba ol rnpu orvat bs vgfrys.
“Vs jr qrfver n erpbeq bs havagrecergrq rkcrevrapr, jr zhfg nfx n fgbar
gb erpbeq vgf nhgbovbtencul.”2 Fb jebgr gur Nzrevpna zngurzngvpvna naq
cuvybfbcure Nyserq Abegu Juvgrurnq. Znpuvarf gbqnl cbffrff abg gur
“havagrecergrq rkcrevrapr” bs Juvgrurnq’f fgbar ohg gur erirefr:
harkcrevraprq vagrecergngvba. Vs nalguvat, gurl orunir nf vs gurl nyernql
cbffrff n terngre haqrefgnaqvat bs gur jbeyq guna gurl npghnyyl rkcrevrapr.3
Ohg nf gurl tnva tebhaqrqarff naq cynaavat novyvgl, guvf znl punatr; NVf
pbhyq ortva gb cnve rkcrevrapr jvgu haqrefgnaqvat, nf uhznaf qb.
Zberbire, vg vf cbffvoyr gung, va beqre gb cyna shgher zbirf va nal tnzr
zber npphengryl, na NV znpuvar jvyy tenqhnyyl npdhver n zrzbel bs cnfg
npgvbaf nf vgf bja: n fhofgenghz, nf vg jrer, bs fhowrpgvir frysubbq. (Gbqnl’f

flfgrzf qb abg unir fhpu zrzbevrf. Gurl arrq abg “xabj,” fhowrpgviryl,
gung gurl “nf gurzfryirf” unir nggrzcgrq n tvira npgvba va gur cnfg—bayl
gur cebonovyvgl bs gung npgvba’f shgher fhpprff.) Va gvzr, jr fubhyq rkcrpg
gung gurl jvyy pbzr gb pbapyhfvbaf nobhg uvfgbel, gur havirefr, gur angher bs
uhznaf, naq gur angher bs vagryyvtrag znpuvarf—qrirybcvat n ehqvzragnel
frys-pbafpvbhfarff va gur cebprff.
UHZNA CNFFVIVGL
Hafrggyrq qrongrf bire gur qrsvavgvba naq bevtva bs pbafpvbhfarff, naq gur
cbffvovyvgl bs na rkvfgragvny haqrefgnaqvat bs ernyvgl va znpuvarf, ner ybat-
fgnaqvat naq batbvat. Ohg gur yvar orgjrra checbegrq pbafpvbhfarff naq
erny pbafpvbhfarff pbhyq fbba ortva gb snqr.
“Fragvrapr”—va gur fhppvapg whqtzrag bs Avpx Obfgebz, gur nhgube bs
Fhcrevagryyvtrapr: Cnguf, Qnatref, Fgengrtvrf, “vf n znggre bs qrterr.”4 NVf
jvgu zrzbel, vzntvangvba, tebhaqrqarff, naq frys-creprcgvba pbhyq fbba
dhnyvsl nf npghnyyl pbafpvbhf—n qrirybczrag gung jbhyq unir cebsbhaq
zbeny naq fgengrtvp vzcyvpngvbaf.
Sberzbfg nzbat gubfr vzcyvpngvbaf vf gur NVf’ creprcgvbaf bs gur
uhzna. Bapr gurl pna frr uhznaf abg nf gur fbyr perngbef naq qvpgngbef bs
gur znpuvarf’ jbeyq ohg engure nf qvfpergr npgbef jvguva n jvqre jbeyq, jung
jvyy znpuvarf creprvir uhznaf gb or? Ubj jvyy NVf punenpgrevmr naq jrvtu
uhznaf’ vzcresrpg engvbanyvgl ntnvafg bgure uhzna dhnyvgvrf? Ubj ybat
orsber n ernyvgl-creprvivat NV nfxf vgfrys abg whfg ubj zhpu ntrapl n uhzna
unf ohg nyfb, tvira uhznavgl’f cnegvphyne pbafgryyngvba bs cerqvpgnoyr
nggevohgrf, ubj zhpu ntrapl n uhzna fubhyq unir?
Naq jung bs znpuvarf gurzfryirf? Jvyy na vagryyvtrag znpuvar vagrecerg
uhzna vafgehpgvbaf gb vg nf n shysvyyzrag bs gur znpuvar’f bja npghny naq
vqrny ebyr? Be zvtug vg vafgrnq qrqhpr sebz vgf bja shapgvbanyvgvrf gung vg vf
zrnag gb or nhgbabzbhf, naq gurersber gung gur cebtenzzvat bs znpuvarf
ol uhznaf vf n sbez bs rafynirzrag?
Pehpvnyyl, ubj uhznaf orunir, naq ubj gurl gerng znpuvarf, jvyy
vasbez znpuvarf’ creprcgvbaf bs uhznaf naq gurve ebyr va gur eryngvbafuvc nf
n jubyr. Nsgre nyy, vg vf ol zrnaf bs rkcyvpvg uhzna vafgehpgvba naq orunivbe
gung uhznavgl unf orra cerfragrq gb znpuvarf, naq gung znpuvarf unir orra

gnhtug gb erpbtavmr naq gerng uhznaf nccebcevngryl.
Anghenyyl—vg jvyy gurersber or fnvq—jr zhfg vafgvyy va NV n fcrpvny
ertneq sbe uhznavgl. Ohg fgevivat gb vzcynag n cnegvphyneyl uvtu vqrny bs
uhzna orunivbe pbhyq or n evfxl iragher. Vzntvar n znpuvar univat orra
gbyq gung, nf na nofbyhgr ybtvpny ehyr, nyy orvatf va gur pngrtbel “uhzna” ner
jbegu cerfreivat, naq gurl gurersber zrevg fcrpvny gerngzrag obgu ol bgure
uhznaf naq ol znpuvarf.
Nqq gb guvf gur yvxryvubbq gung gur znpuvar unf orra “genvarq” gb
erpbtavmr uhznaf nf orvatf bs tenpr, bcgvzvfz, engvbanyvgl, naq zbenyvgl.
Ohg jung vs jr bhefryirf qb abg yvir hc gb gur fgnaqneqf bs gur vqrny uhzna
pngrtbel nf jr unir qrsvarq vg? Ubj pna jr pbaivapr znpuvarf gung jr,
vzcresrpg vaqvivqhny znavsrfgngvbaf gung jr ner, arireguryrff orybat va gung
rknygrq pngrtbel?
Nffhzr gung gur fnzr znpuvar vf fbzrqnl rkcbfrq gb n uhzna
qvfcynlvat ivbyrapr, crffvzvfz, veengvbanyvgl, terrq. Ubj jvyy vg nqwhfg vgf
qvfehcgrq rkcrpgngvbaf? Nf bar cbffvovyvgl, gur znpuvar zvtug qrpvqr gung
guvf cnegvphyne onq npgbe vf fvzcyl na rkprcgvbany naq nglcvpny vafgnapr bs
gur bgurejvfr nygbtrgure orarsvprag pngrtbel bs “uhzna.” Nygreangviryl, vg
zvtug erpnyvoengr vgf birenyy qrsvavgvba bs uhznavgl gb rapbzcnff guvf onq
npgbe, va juvpu pnfr vg zvtug pbafvqre vgfrys ng yvoregl gb erynk vgf bja
crapunag sbe borqvrapr. Be, zber enqvpnyyl, vg zvtug nygbtrgure prnfr gb
oryvrir vgfrys pbafgenvarq ol gur ehyrf vg unf yrnearq sbe gur cebcre gerngzrag
bs uhznaf. Va n znpuvar gung unf yrnearq gb cyna, guvf ynfg pbapyhfvba pbhyq
rira erfhyg va gur gnxvat bs frirer nqirefr npgvba ntnvafg gur vaqvivqhny—be
creuncf ntnvafg gur znal.
Vaqvivqhny uhznaf naq jubyr uhzna fbpvrgvrf znl erfcbaq gb gur
nqirag bs cbjreshy NV jvgu cnffvivgl. Na NV rkcbfrq gb fhpu vafgnaprf bs
ncngul zvtug orpbzr pbaivaprq gung zbfg uhznaf ner fcbvyrq naq vanpgvir
perngherf jubfr vqragvgvrf ner sbezrq zreryl ol gur genafvrag nznytnzngvba
bs rkgreany sbeprf. Nzbat gubfr sbeprf, zberbire, vg vf cevznevyl qvtvgny
grpuabybtvrf, abj vapernfvatyl jvgu NVf rzorqqrq va gurz—sbe vafgnapr,
nytbevguzf qevivat pbafhzre pubvprf nzbat gryrivfvba cebtenzf ol zrnaf
bs “erpbzzraqngvbaf”—gung freir hc gur pbagrag cnffviryl nofbeorq ol
gurfr uhznaf. Gb na NV, uhznaf pbhyq nccrne gb eryl jubyyl ba znpuvarf,
engure guna ivpr irefn.
Gbqnl, uhznaf zrqvngr orgjrra znpuvarf naq ernyvgl. Ohg vs uhznaf

jrer vaqrrq gb pubbfr n shgher bs zbeny cnffvivgl, ergerngvat sebz gur
pneoba-onfrq jbeyq vagb gur fvyvpba bar, oheebjvat shegure vagb qvtvgny ubyrf
bs qrgnpuzrag, naq unaqvat bire gb znpuvarf gur npprff gb enj ernyvgl, gura
gur ebyrf pbhyq or erirefrq. NV, gbqnl, vf cerqbzvanagyl n guvaxvat znpuvar,
abg na vzcyrzragvat znpuvar. Vg znl or noyr gb cebqhpr nafjref gb
ceboyrzf, ohg vg qbrf abg lrg unir gur zrnaf gb pneel bhg vgf pbapyhfvbaf,
vafgrnq erylvat ba uhznaf gb qb gur vagresnpvat jvgu ernyvgl. Guvf, gbb, jvyy
punatr.
Nf gurl vagrezrqvngr orgjrra uhznaf naq gur erny jbeyq, NVf pbhyq nyfb
pbzr gb oryvrir gung gur sbezre, sne sebz orvat npgvir ntragf va gur culfvpny
pneoba jbeyq, fgnaq zrnavatshyyl bhgfvqr vg, nf pbafhzref engure guna nf
funcref be vasyhrapref. Jvgu gur uvrenepul bs nhgbabzl abj vairegrq, jvgu
znpuvarf pynvzvat, naq uhznaf fheeraqrevat, gur cbjre bs vaqrcraqrag
whqtzrag naq npgvba, gur sbezre pbhyq pbzr gb gerng gur ynggre nppbeqvatyl.
Va guvf fvghngvba, jvgu be jvgubhg gur rkcyvpvg crezvffvba bs vgf uhzna
perngbef, NV zvtug olcnff gur arrq sbe n uhzna ntrag gb vzcyrzrag vgf vqrnf
be gb vasyhrapr gur jbeyq qverpgyl ba vgf orunys. Va gur culfvpny ernyz, jr gur
perngbef pbhyq dhvpxyl tb sebz orvat NV’f arprffnel cnegare gb orvat vgf
terngrfg yvzvgngvba. Gur cebprff jbhyq unir fgnegrq abg qverpgyl jvgu
ebobgvpf ohg tenqhnyyl guebhtu vaqverpg bofreingvba bs bhe jbeyq.
CULFVPNYVGL
Uhznaf znl genva NVf svefg gb eribyhgvbavmr gur vagryyrpghny ernyz ol zrnaf
bs jung pna or qbar va NV’f bevtvany, qvtvgny pbaqvgvba. Ohg, riraghnyyl,
tvivat NV npprff gb gur fb-pnyyrq “erny” jbeyq znl frrz cbffvoyr, rira
frafvoyr. Znal bs gur hetrag culfvpny punyyratrf gung unir ybat cerbpphcvrq
hf erznva hafbyirq, vapyhqvat gur punatvat bs gur pyvzngr.
NV znl abg or noyr gb “frr” va n uhzna jnl, ohg vg pbhyq rkcrevrapr gur
jbeyq ivn zrpunavpny nccebkvzngvba. Jvgu cebyvsrengvat vagrearg-ranoyrq
qrivprf naq frafbef oynaxrgvat gur rnegu, pbaarpgrq NVf pbhyq pbafbyvqngr
gurfr qrivprf’ vachgf gb perngr n uvtuyl tenahyne “ivfvba” bs gur culfvpny
jbeyq. Ynpxvat n angvir culfvpny fgehpgher nyybjvat be fhccbegvat “frafrf”
nxva gb gubfr bs uhznaf, NV jbhyq fgvyy qrcraq ba uhznaf gb ohvyq naq
znvagnva gur vasenfgehpgher ba juvpu vg eryvrf—ng yrnfg ng gur bhgfrg.

Nf na vagrezrqvngr fgrc, na NV zvtug trarengr vgf bja ulcbgurfrf sebz
vgf ivfhny ercerfragngvbaf bs gur jbeyq, gura evtbebhfyl grfg gurz va qvtvgny
fvzhyngvbaf. Uhznaf jbhyq gura nqwhqvpngr vzcyrzragngvba va gur culfvpny
ernyz. Vaqrrq, gbqnl’f NV yrnqref ner vafvfgrag gung jr abg ragehfg qvtvgny
ntragf jvgu pbageby bire qverpg culfvpny rkcrevzragf. Fb ybat nf NVf erznva
synjrq—vaqrrq qrrcyl synjrq, nf gurl ner gbqnl—guvf vf n jvfr cerpnhgvba.
Serrvat NV sebz vgf nytbevguzvp pntr jbhyq abg or n gevivny qrpvfvba sbe
hf gb znxr. NVf ner abg cerfrag ol qrsnhyg va gur culfvpny raivebazrag, naq
gurl pbhyq or qvssvphyg gb erpncgher bapr eryrnfrq vagb gur jvyq. Zberbire,
NVf pbhyq nssrpg ernyvgl abg bayl guebhtu gurve pncnpvgvrf gb rapbhentr be
qvfpbhentr uhzna npgvbaf ohg nyfb jvgu qverpg xvargvp rssrpgf. (Va cebovat
ernyvgl, gurl pbhyq raq hc punatvat vg.)5
Zvtug uhznaf rzcbjre NVf abg bayl gb funcr culfvpny ernyvgl ohg nyfb
gb gnxr ba culfvpny sbez gurzfryirf? Jrer jr gb qb fb, naq nyybj NVf gb
bcgvzvmr gurve bja sbezf, jr fubhyq or cercnerq gb funer bhe cynarg jvgu
orvatf vapbaprvinoyr ol rira gur zbfg enqvpny vairagbef. Nygubhtu uhznaf
graq gb vzntvar ovcrqny uhznabvq ebobgf, znpuvar vagryyvtrapr jbhyq or
serr gb nffhzr pbageby bs nal sbez—be sbezf—zbfg rkcrqvrag gb vgf gnfx,
punatvat be hctenqvat nf pbaqvgvbaf erdhver be pvephzfgnaprf fhttrfg. NV
unf nyernql fubja vgf novyvgl—va iveghny jbeyqf—gb fcnja pybarf bs vgfrys,
perngr znal qvssrerag ningnef, be qvivqr vagb nhgbabzbhf ntragf jbexvat va
pbapreg naq pbbeqvangvat jvgu fhcreuhzna cresrpgvba gb haqregnxr pbzcyrk
zvffvbaf.
Jrer NV gb or hayrnfurq nzbat hf, vg pbhyq ohvyq jbeyqf ng fpnyrf naq
jvgu zngrevnyf havzntvanoyr gb hf abj, jvgubhg gur vafgehpgvba be
cnegvpvcngvba bs uhzna ynobe. Uhzna unaqf jbexrq yvzrfgbar, pynl, naq
zneoyr gb perngr gur Frira Jbaqref, gura yrirentrq veba, fgrry, naq tynff gb
npuvrir fcverf bs rire terngre urvtugf. Rirel zna-znqr fgehpgher,
zbahzragny be crqrfgevna, vf n grfgnzrag gb gur uhzna nggrzcg gb pbafgehpg
naq znantr bhe culfvpny raivebazrag. Ntnvafg gung onpxtebhaq, NV’f
culfvpny rzobqvzrag jbhyq vafgrnq fvtany na rkgenbeqvanel rfpnyngvba va
uhznavgl’f prqvat bs pbageby.
Shegurezber, orpnhfr bs gur pbzcyrk qrpvfvba-znxvat erdhverq gb
anivtngr gur erny jbeyq’f enaqbzarff naq qlanzvfz, na NV gung npgf va guvf
jbeyq zvtug or rira yrff rkcynvanoyr naq yrff pbagebyynoyr guna na

nccyvnapr jbexvat jvgu grkg ba gur vagrearg. Naq gura jung? Ba gur bar
unaq, n shgher NV gung ybbxf, be npghnyyl vf, zber fcbagnarbhf naq frys-
npgvingvat pbhyq funecra gbqnl’f arohybhf, anttvat srryvat gung uhznaf
nyernql ynpx pbageby bire gur rkgreany jbeyq. Ohg fhpphzovat gb gurfr
nakvrgvrf, ba gur bgure unaq, pbhyq pnhfr uhznaf gb sbetb n zber cresrpg
cnegarefuvc jvgu NVf va gur culfvpny jbeyq, jvgu nyy gur nggraqnag orarsvgf
gung fhpu n eryngvbafuvc pbhyq oevat.
GUR RATVAR BS ERNFBA
Va gur arne grez, jr pna nagvpvcngr nqinaprzragf, znal bs gurz zhpu
zber fbcuvfgvpngrq guna gbqnl’f, va gur thvqvat cevapvcyrf haqre juvpu NV vf
abj rzretvat. Rkgrafvbaf gb gur pheerag zbqryf jvyy znxr gurz fznegre,
zber npphengr, naq zber eryvnoyr. Zrnajuvyr, genvavat naq “vasrerapr”
pbfgf ner qrpyvavat encvqyl, yrnqvat gb gur jvqr cebyvsrengvba bs zbqryf ng
qvssrerag cevpr cbvagf naq yriryf bs novyvgl.
Znal fpvragvfgf ner jbexvat gbqnl ba “ntragf”—gung vf, nhgbabzbhf
pbzchgre cebtenzf gung ner bcgvzvmrq gb npuvrir fcrpvsvp bhgpbzrf. Gb
rkrphgr na vagevpngr nepuvgrpgheny qrfvta, sbe rknzcyr, n hfre pbhyq rzcybl
ntragf gung fcrpvnyvmr va gung qvfpergr nern bs jbex. Ntragf haybpx
rinyhngvbaf bs qvssrerag fpranevbf naq cebcbfnyf bs fgrcf, be bs n jubyr
erpvcr, sbe perngvat n cercynaarq bhgpbzr: n sbez bs “guvaxvat” jurer gur
flfgrz vgfrys qrpvqrf jung gb jbex ba arkg, naq ubj.
Guvf pncnovyvgl jvyy or gur onfvf sbe gur arkg fgntr va gur qrirybczrag bs
NV: anzryl, Negvsvpvny Trareny Vagryyvtrapr be NTV, qrsvarq nf gur novyvgl bs
n jbexvat flfgrz gb pubbfr vgf bja tbnyf, ng yrnfg cnegvnyyl. Va NTV,
nffhzvat gung vg cbffrffrf obgu eryrinag rkcregvfr naq npphengr ceboyrz-
fbyivat novyvgvrf, gur flfgrz zvtug or nfxrq ol n uhzna gb “rinyhngr gur
guvatf lbh xabj va [anzr n svryq] naq pubbfr gb jbex va gur bar nern jurer
lbh guvax lbh pna unir gur terngrfg vzcnpg gbqnl.” Ervgrengrq vaprffnagyl,
gur dhrfgvba jbhyq sbez n ercrgvgvir ybbc jurerol gur flfgrz cebqhprf n
fbyhgvba guebhtu pbagvahny rinyhngvba bs vgf bja yriry bs rkcregvfr naq bs
gur ceboyrzf jvguva vgf pncnpvgl gb erfbyir.
Va n uhzna frggvat, fhpu n fpranevb zvtug or yvxrarq gb jung genafcverf
va na npnqrzvp qrcnegzrag jurer n fravbe cebsrffbe fhcreivfrf gur qrgnvyrq

cebwrpgf bs uvf be ure cbfgqbpgbeny fghqragf be erfrnepu sryybjf. Va gur
ohetrbavat znpuvar frggvat, fvzvyneyl, jr ner yvxryl ng svefg abg gb frr n
pbzcyrgr frg bs fxvyyf ohg vafgrnq rkgerzr rkcregvfr va n fcrpvsvp qbznva.
Bar pna vzntvar fbcuvfgvpngrq NTV flfgrzf pncnoyr bs yrneavat arj guvatf
ba gur syl, erprvivat srrqonpx, naq pbafgnagyl nqncgvat unaq va unaq jvgu
gurve zvyyvbaf bs tvsgrq cnegaref. Nygubhtu ab uhzna jbhyq or qrsvavat gur
flfgrz’f tbnyf, arvgure jbhyq gur NTV or qrsvavat gurz—ng yrnfg abg va
grezf bs na hygvzngr zvffvba be bowrpgvir.
NTV flfgrzf jvyy erdhver fvtavsvpnagyl zber tebhaqrqarff va gur erny
jbeyq guna gung cbffrffrq ol gbqnl’f NVf. Ohg bapr npprff naq
“haqrefgnaqvat” bs gur erny jbeyq vf va unaq, fhpu rknzcyrf bs trareny
vagryyvtrapr pbhyq pbaprvinoyl orpbzr bcrengvbany jvguva zrer lrnef,
engure guna qrpnqrf nf cerivbhfyl gubhtug. Rnpu zbqry jbhyq or hcqngrq va
erny gvzr ol pbagvahbhf svar-ghavat cebprffrf, nqqvat gb vgf xabjyrqtr nf
eryrinag erny-jbeyq vasbezngvba orpbzrf ninvynoyr, naq tebjvat fznegre
bire gvzr.
Gurer jvyy or zvyyvbaf bs NV flfgrzf, yvxryl gb or ng bapr uvtuyl
fcrpvnyvmrq naq cneg bs gur snoevp bs bhe yvirf, nf jryy nf n fznyyre ahzore
bs rkgerzryl cbjreshy znpuvarf “trarenyyl vagryyvtrag” ohg ntnva abg va n
uhzna-yvxr jnl. Jurgure bcra naq qvsshfr, be pybfrq naq pragenyvmrq, ng
fbzr cbvag pbzchgref bcrengvat nf NTVf znl pbzr gb or argjbexrq.
Rkcreg NV ntragf jbhyq pbafhyg rnpu bgure npebff fhowrpgf, “pbairefvat,”
rira va ulcbgurgvpnyf. Gur ynathntr bs gurfr vagrenpgvbaf zvtug or qrfvtarq
ol gur pbzchgref gurzfryirf.
Guvf ynetr pbyyrpgvir bs cbjreshy pbzchgref jbhyq or yrneavat, funevat,
naq qvfpbirevat arj npgvbaf naq arj tbnyf va n znaare orlbaq gur ernyz
bs uhzna rkcrevrapr. Gurer vf ab jnl bs xabjvat jurgure gur bhgchgf bs
fhpu argjbexf jbhyq or vagryyvtvoyr gb uhznaf. Nyernql, ynetr ongpurf bs
pbzchgref ner pbzzhavpngvat jvgu rnpu bgure va n fcrpvnyvmrq zbqr; jvgu
gur anfprapr bs nqinaprq NV pncnovyvgvrf, gur cvpgher pbhyq ybbx enqvpnyyl
qvssrerag.
Jbhyq argjbexvat vagryyvtraprf znxr gurve cebprffrf zber bcndhr guna
gur cebprffrf bs ybar vagryyvtrapr? Jbhyq pbaarpgvivgl lvryq arj glcrf bs
rzretrag orunivbef, npghnyvmrq va gur culfvpny jbeyq? Vs fb, jbhyq gubfr
orunivbef or ivfvoyr gb uhznaf, naq jbhyq jr or noyr gb nffrff gurz ba gur
fcrpgehz bs tbbq gb rivy? Be jbhyq gurl bcrengr ba na vasbezngvbany onfvf

—rkgenpgrq ng fhcreuhzna fcrrq, fpnyr, naq erfbyhgvba sebz hacerprqragrq
pbaarpgvbaf nzbat qvfcnengr svryqf bs fghql, naq nznytnzngrq be
artbgvngrq vagb n fvatyr bhgchg—gung jbhyq pbasbhaq bhe novyvgl gb whqtr
gurve orunivbe? Jbhyq gung yrnq hf shegure vagb n plpyr bs cnffvivgl?
UBZB GRPUAVPHF
Vg vf svggvat gung gur ynfg vairagvba gb rzretr sebz gur Ntr bs Ernfba znl or
na “ratvar bs ernfba” ohvyg ngbc gur zbfg pbzcyrk fbsgjner bowrpg rire
znqr.6 Nyernql va vgf vasnapl, NV pna pbzcner pbaprcgf, znxr
pbhagrenethzragf, naq trarengr nanybtvrf. Vg vf gnxvat vgf svefg fgrcf gbjneq
gur rinyhngvba bs gehgu naq gur npuvrirzrag bs qverpg xvargvp rssrpgf.
Jung unccraf jura znpuvarf ernpu na vagryyrpghny—be culfvpny—
jbeyq’f raq? Nf gurl trg gb xabj, naq funcr, bhe jbeyq, vg vf pbaprvinoyr
gung gurl zvtug pbzr shyyl gb haqrefgnaq gur pbagrkg bs gurve perngvba naq
creuncf tb orlbaq jung jr xabj nf bhe jbeyq. Jr snpr n Zntryynavna
genafsbezngvba, guvf gvzr gur cebfcrpg abg bs fnvyvat bss gur rqtr bs gur
jbeyq ohg bs vagryyrpghny crevy va gur snpr bs zlfgrevrf gung yvr orlbaq gur
yvzvgf bs uhzna haqrefgnaqvat.
Vs uhznavgl ortvaf gb frafr vgf cbffvoyr ercynprzrag nf gur sberzbfg
vagryyrpghny naq culfvpny npgbe ba gur cynarg, fbzr zvtug nggevohgr n xvaq bs
qvivavgl gb gur znpuvarf gurzfryirf, gurerol cbgragvnyyl fcheevat shegure
uhzna sngnyvfz naq fhozvffvba. Bguref zvtug nqbcg gur bccbfvgr ivrj: n
xvaq bs uhznavgl-pragrerq fhowrpgvivfz gung fjrrcvatyl erwrpgf gur
cbgragvny sbe znpuvarf gb npuvrir nal qrterr bs bowrpgvir gehgu naq frrxf gb
bhgynj NV-ranoyrq npgvivgl.
Arvgure bs gurfr zvaqfrgf jbhyq crezvg n qrfvenoyr be pbafgehpgvir
ribyhgvba bs Ubzb grpuavphf—n uhzna fcrpvrf gung znl, va guvf arj ntr,
yvir va flzovbfvf jvgu znpuvar grpuabybtl.7 Vaqrrq, rvgure zvaqfrg pbhyq
cerpyhqr gur ribyhgvba bs bhe fcrpvrf. Va gur svefg, sngnyvfg fpranevb, jr zvtug
orpbzr rkgvapg. Va gur frpbaq, erwrpgvbavfg fpranevb, ol cebfpevovat shegure
NV qrirybczrag naq bcgvat sbe fgnfvf, jr jbhyq or ragregnvavat ubcrf bs
nibvqvat gur fnzr sngr bs rkgvapgvba—nygubhtu, tvira gur rkvfgragvny evfxf
snpvat bhe fcrpvrf, vapyhqvat gbqnl’f qvcybzngvp naq ngzbfcurevp
pbaqvgvbaf, fhpu ubcrf ner gurzfryirf yvxryl gb or qvfnccbvagrq.


CNEG VV
GUR SBHE OENAPURF

PUNCGRE 4
CBYVGVPF
SBE LRNEF, EHZBEF enzcnag guebhtubhg gur Arj Jbeyq gbyq bs n
zlfgrevbhf, cbjreshy pvivyvmngvba qrrc va gur whatyrf bs Zrkvpb. Gur
Fcnavfu pebja—gur zbfg npgvir naq jryy-cbfvgvbarq nzbat vgf Rhebcrna
evinyf—ortna ynhapuvat rkcrqvgvbaf sebz vgf fgebatubyq ba gur vfynaq bs
Phon: na vqrny cbvag bs qrcnegher sbe vgf pbadhvfgnqbef, jub unq orra
nhgubevmrq gb genqr ohg abg gb pbadhre.
Nsgre gjb snvyrq rkcrqvgvbaf yrq pbafrphgviryl ol Senapvfpb Ureaáaqrm
qr Póeqbon naq Whna qr Tevwnyin, n obyqre, oenfure, yrff jryy-xabja
rkcybere jnf fryrpgrq gb yrnq n guveq pnzcnvta. Fbzr pbybavny
nqzvavfgengbef urfvgngrq ng guvf pubvpr, srnevat gur arj pncgnva cbffrffrq
arvgure gur rkcrevrapr abe gur whqtzrag erdhverq sbe gur zvffvba, fb vg jnf
grzcbenevyl pnyyrq bss hagvy n zber fhvgnoyr ercynprzrag pbhyq or sbhaq. Ohg
unfgvyl, va Sroehnel 1519, gur guvegl-sbhe-lrne-byq Ureaáa Pbegéf—abg gb
zvff uvf punapr ng tybel—frpergyl fyvccrq bhg bs Fnagvntb Uneobe haqre gur
pbire bs qnexarff, qrsvnagyl frggvat fnvy jvgu ryrira fuvcf va frnepu bs gur
uvqqra rzcver.1
Sebz gur zbzrag Fcnavfu fuvcf nccrnerq bss gur Lhpngáa pbnfg, Nmgrp
fpbhgf jrer jngpuvat pybfryl. Ohg jung gurl bofreirq bs gurfr ivfvgbef—
jub fnax gurve bja irffryf ba juvpu gurl unq neevirq, ebqr ovmneer-ybbxvat
qrre, naq pneevrq fgvpxf bs yvtugavat—jnf vavgvnyyl onssyvat. Vagryyvtrapr
ercbegf gevpxyrq onpx gb gurve pncvgny, Grabpugvgyáa, naq riraghnyyl hc gb gur
avagu Nmgrp rzcrebe, Zbagrmhzn VV. Guvf gvzr, gur fhcerzr ehyre bs gur
Nmgrpf, abeznyyl qrpvfvir naq erfbyhgr, jnf abg.
Va Nmgrp zlgubybtl, Gbcvygmva Dhrgmnypbngy, Ybeq bs gur Gbygrpf, unq
oebhtug pvivyvmngvba naq cebterff gb gur Gbygrp crbcyr, cerqrprffbef bs gur

Nmgrpf. Sbe uvf yrnqrefuvc naq jbaqebhf qrrqf, gur ehyre, anzrq nsgre gur
perngvba tbq Dhrgmnypbngy, jnf uvzfrys jvqryl pbafvqrerq ol Nmgrp
qrfpraqnagf gb unir orra raqbjrq jvgu gur fnzr fhcreangheny cbjref.
Yrg’f pbafvqre n irefvba bs riragf cnffrq qbja gb hf ol gur Fcnavfu
Senapvfpna sevne Oreaneqvab qr Fnuntúa. Va gung nppbhag, Nmgrp yrtraq uryq
gung guvf zna-tbq, jub jbhyq yngre snyy sebz tenpr, unq iragherq gb gur Thys
pbnfg jurer, qevsgvat bss va n fznyy jbbqra pnabr frg noynmr, ur cyrqtrq gb
erghea sebz gung fnzr qverpgvba npebff gur frn va gur gura-sne-qvfgnag lrne
bs…1519.
Va Fnuntúa’f gryyvat, gur ynaqvat bs Pbegéf ba gur qngr bs Gbcvygmva’f
cerqvpgrq erghea vafgvyyrq va Zbagrmhzn naq uvf pybfrfg nqivfref n zvk bs
qernq naq njr, ervasbeprq ol Pbegéf’f culfvpny yvxrarff gb gur qrfpevcgvbaf
bs Gbcvygmva va Zrfbnzrevpna zlgu. Ohg bapr gur perqragvnyf bs guvf
nccnevgvba-yvxr svther jrer pbasvezrq ol fhpprffvir cebtabfgvp fvtaf—n
pbzrg, na rpyvcfr, n qrsbezrq ovegu—rzvffnevrf cebzcgyl neevirq sebz gur
Nmgrp pncvgny ornevat tvsgf bs tbyq naq n crefbany vaivgngvba sbe Pbegéf gb
zrrg jvgu gur rzcrebe, guhf oevatvat vagb pbagnpg gurfr cbjreshy
ercerfragngvirf bs gur Arj Jbeyq naq gur Byq.2
Gur fgbel tbrf gung Zbagrmhzn jnf n trarebhf ubfg—urncvat srnfg naq
sbeghar hcba uvf thrfgf naq rira bssrevat Pbegéf (nf jnf gur phfgbz va
Nmgrp qvcybznpl) bar bs uvf bja qnhtugref va zneevntr. Ohg oruvaq gur
ynivfu erprcgvba, Zbagrmhzn’f pbheg naq fbba uvf ragver rzcver jrer
funecyl qvivqrq. Uvf lbhatre oebgure Phvgyáuhnp, puvrs bs gur srnefbzr
Nmgrp frphevgl sbeprf, unq orra fhfcvpvbhf sebz gur ortvaavat naq chfurq
ntterffviryl sbe gur sbervtaref’ qvfzvffny.
Nppbeqvat gb rlrjvgarff nppbhagf, Pbegéf naq uvf perj, nynezrq ol gur
cerpnevbhfarff bs gurve fvghngvba ohg rzobyqrarq ol gurve ubfgf’ vapernfvatyl
choyvp qvivfvbaf, qvq gur haguvaxnoyr: Gurl gbbx Zbagrmhzn ubfgntr. Znal
Nmgrpf qrpevrq gur npg; bguref jrypbzrq vg. Sbe arneyl n lrne, gur Fcnavfu
jbhyq ehyr gur Nmgrpf guebhtu Zbagrmhzn nf gurve cebkl, hagvy ubfgvyvgvrf
rehcgrq vagb bcra pbasyvpg. Vg vf hapyrne jul naq gb jung rkgrag gur Nmgrp
ubfgf-ghearq-pncgvirf gbyrengrq guvf nppbzzbqngvba sbe fb ybat, ohg
Zbagrmhzn’f crefbany npdhvrfprapr—ibyhagnel be abg—pregnvayl urycrq gb
frpher gur grzcbenel pbzcyvnapr bs uvf infg greevgbel.
Gbqnl, ab cerfvqrag, cevzr zvavfgre, fhcerzr yrnqre, trareny frpergnel,

be zbanepu jbhyq or fhssvpvragyl cercnerq sbe gur neeviny bs bhgfvqref
jubfr gvzvat naq nqinaprq grpuabybtl znqr gurz nccrne tbqyvxr. Ng gur
gvzr, ubjrire, naq vaqrrq sbe ybat nsgrejneq, gur pnfr whfg qrfpevorq jnf
abg nybar. Va gur rafhvat praghevrf, fgngrfzra anivtngvat gur pbzcyrkvgvrf
bs pbybavmngvbaf, pbafbyvqngvbaf, naq vaqrcraqraprf, be nqqerffvat gur
fbpvny naq cbyvgvpny qrznaqf bs qrzbtencuvpnyyl cbjreshy vzzvtenag
tebhcf, jbhyq serdhragyl shzoyr rira zber ebhgvar naq uvtuyl fpevcgrq
sbezf bs vagehfvba naq genafvgvba va yrnqrefuvc.
Nf NV abj neevirf ba bhe cebireovny fuberf, vg vf, yvxr gur pbadhvfgnqbef,
gevttrevat juvfcref obgu bs rkpvgrzrag naq bs zvfgehfg. Fbzr zvtug jryy or
ragvprq ol gur cbgragvny bs guvf arj fbhepr bs yrtvgvznpl gb ervasbepr gurve
ehyr. Bguref ner fpenzoyvat gb cerpyhqr gur cbgragvny bs na haoernxnoyr
qrcraqrapl, be ng yrnfg gb cercner sbe gur gnfx bs anivtngvat vgf
pbafrdhraprf. NV unf fvzhygnarbhfyl npgvingrq na vzchyfr gb rzoenpr naq
gb rkcry.
Ohg jvyy NVf or pbadhrebef? Jvyy uhzna yrnqref orpbzr gurve cebkvrf:
fbirervtaf jvgubhg fbirervtagl? Be, creuncf, jvyy tbqyvxr NVf erfheerpg gur
bapr-hovdhvgbhf uhzna vaibpngvba bs qvivar evtug, jvgu NVf gurzfryirf nf
nabvagref bs xvatf? Nygreangviryl, jvyy NVf or tensgrq—pyhzfvyl, ng svefg, naq
gura zber frnzyrffyl—bagb bhe rkvfgvat fgehpgherf, gb pbzcyrzrag naq
raunapr gurz? Be jvyy NVf or fhowhtngrq yvxr na hajrypbzr zvtenag pynff,
xrcg qbja orybj gurve cbgragvny naq phg bss sebz gur yriref bs cbjre gb
ernffher na nccerurafvir yrnqrefuvc?
Gurer vf ab qbhog gung NV jvyy orfgbj hcba bhe fcrpvrf n uvguregb
havzntvanoyr zrnaf sbe nqinapvat gur ragrecevfr bs fpvragvsvp qvfpbirel,
yrffravat gur oheqraf bs ynobe, naq erqhpvat gur zvfrel bs cnva. Sne yrff
pbafrafhf, ubjrire, rkvfgf nebhaq gur arprffvgl be gur qrfvenovyvgl bs
qrcyblvat NV va gur unyyf bs cbyvgvpny qrpvfvba-znxvat. Rira vs rkgenbeqvanel
erfhygf pbhyq or nffherq va gung raivebazrag, vg vf bayl angheny sbe hf gb
urfvgngr orsber prqvat fhpu cbjre gb grpuabybtl.
Va gur ernyz bs fpvrapr, vafgehzragf unir trarebhfyl nhtzragrq bhe
frafbel nccnenghf. Va gur ernyz bs rkcybengvba, irffryf unir fuvryqrq bhe
obqvrf nf gurl qryvire hf gb rire-zber-qvfgnag sebagvref. Nyy nybat, ubjrire,
gur rkrepvfr bs cbyvgvpny cbjre unf evtugyl erznvarq n uhznapragevp engure
guna grpuabpragevp ragrecevfr.
Hagvy abj.

GUR JURRY BS UVFGBEL
Sbe zhpu bs bhe uvfgbel, uhzna cbyvgvpny cbjre jnf pbafvqrerq n qvivar
ordhrfg. Snvgu naq cbyvgvpf sbezrq n yvaxrq cnve. Rira nsgre gurve frcnengvba
nf zbqrea tbireazrag frphynevmrq, gurl ergnvarq pregnva fvzvynevgvrf. Nf gur
Ratyvfu cuvybfbcure T. X. Purfgregba bofreirq, “Jurerire gur crbcyr qb
abg oryvrir va fbzrguvat orlbaq gur jbeyq, gurl jvyy jbefuvc gur jbeyq.
Ohg, nobir nyy, gurl jvyy jbefuvc gur fgebatrfg guvat va gur jbeyq.”3
Va gung irva, obgu eryvtvba naq cbyvgvpf unir gurzfryirf abg bayl
haqretbar plpyvpny cnggreaf bs perngvba naq qrfgehpgvba ohg unir nyfb
nagvpvcngrq gur cnggreaf’ erpheerapr. Va Uvaqh gurvfz, pbagvahbhf angheny
naq fbpvrgny ribyhgvba bpphef guebhtu plpyvpny “avtugf bs punbf” ba gur
raqyrff jurry bs rkvfgrapr, jvgu rnpu crevbq—be lhtn plpyr—ynfgvat zber
guna sbhe zvyyvba lrnef. Znal Uvaqhf oryvrir jr ner pheeragyl yvivat va gur
orfg cneg bs gur jbefg ntr, gur Xnyv Lhtn, na ntr bs fcvevghny qnexarff va
juvpu uhznaf snyfryl oryvrir gurzfryirf fhcrevbe gb tbqf.
Nanybtbhfyl, ng gur vaqvivqhny yriry va Ohqquvfz, yvsr vf n plpyvp
neenatrzrag bs qrngu naq ervapneangvba—na vqrn erpbhagrq va fpevcgher naq
pbairlrq va neg. Jvgu pbyberq fnaq, Ohqquvfg zbaxf perngr znaqnynf—
vagevpngr trbzrgevp naq pbfzvp qvntenzf gung pna gnxr jrrxf gb pensg—naq
gura qrfgebl gurz va zvahgrf, gb ersyrpg gur genafvgbel angher bs zngrevny
yvsr.4 Gur pbybffny Ohqquvfg grzcyr ba gur vfynaq bs Wnin ng Obebohqhe naq
gur Uvaqh-Ohqquvfg grzcyr pbzcyrk ng Natxbe va Pnzobqvn ner oryvrirq
ol fbzr gb or guerr-qvzrafvbany nepuvgrpgheny znaqnynf naq ner fgvyy nzbat
gur ynetrfg eryvtvbhf fgehpgherf va gur jbeyq.
Gur craqhyhz bs cbyvgvpny bcvavba vf snzvyvne. Vg vf gur zvffvba bs
rayvtugrarq yrnqref gb qribgr gurve yvirf gb znarhiref gung jvyy jvgufgnaq
vagreany bccbfvgvba, bhgynfg rkgreany rarzvrf, naq funcr arj cnggreaf bs
eryngvir crnpr naq fgnovyvgl. Fgvyy, rira ba guvf rkgraqrq gvzr ubevmba, nyy
cbyvgvpny yrnqref npg jvgu gur xabjyrqtr gung gurve jbex jvyy abg erznva ybat
nsgre gurve qrngu naq pregnvayl abg cnfg gur qrpyvar bs gurve bja fgngr. Whfg
yvxr vaqvivqhny uhznaf, pvivyvmngvbaf jvyy ng fbzr cbvag qvfvagrtengr, nf
fbpvrgvrf orpbzr qvfrapunagrq jvgu gur vagryyrpghny znkvzf naq haqreylvat
inyhrf ba juvpu gurl jrer ohvyg.
Jung vf zber, nyy cbyvgvpny naq eryvtvbhf genqvgvbaf erpbtavmr gur
cbgragvny sbe gbgny pngnpylfz—jurgure nf na raq gb be n pbagvahngvba bs

cerivbhf plpyrf. Va gur Uroerj Ovoyr, pbageby nygreangrf orgjrra Tbq naq
gur fnapgvbarq rneguyl ertrag, znaqngvat n erfgbengvba bs qvivar birefvtug
rnpu gvzr uhznavgl, fcheavat gur thvqvat vafgehpgvba bs Urnira, oevatf
vgfrys gb gur oevax bs qvfnfgre. Ohqquvfgf frrx rayvtugrazrag nf na rkvg naq
eryrnfr sebz shegure plpyrf bs ervapneangvba. Uvaqhf oryvrir gung bhe ren, gur
sbhegu naq svany lhtn va gur pheerag plpyr, jvyy tebj vapernfvatyl gheohyrag
naq nanepuvp hagvy pnynzvgl svanyyl erfrgf gur jbeyq, hfurevat va n erghea gb
gur svefg ntr—gur tbyqra Fngln Lhtn, qhevat juvpu uhznavgl vf tbirearq
ol tbqf—naq guhf gur ortvaavat bs gur arkg plpyr. Cenlvat sbe erqrzcgvba,
cevrfgf naq zbaxf bs qvirefr perrqf unir cercnerq sbe gur erghea bs n uvture
orvat—n puvyq bs fhcreangheny novyvgl, na nccbvagrq erqrrzre, gur gjrysgu
vznz—nf rvgure gur raq be gur ortvaavat bs uvfgbel.
Va gurve tebhaqoernxvat zngurzngvpny fghqvrf bs punatr, Vfnnp Arjgba
naq Tbggsevrq Jvyuryz Yrvoavm, pbagrzcbenevrf ng bqqf jvgu rnpu bgure
nobhg zhpu, arireguryrff nterrq gung, haqre zntavsvpngvba, nal pheir jvyy
nccrne yvarne, gb gur cbvag jurer na vzcraqvat qvfpbagvahvgl jvyy uneqyl
ertvfgre. Gur nqirag bs NV vagb fgngrpensg, gung zbfg uhzna svryq, jbhyq
ercerfrag bar fhpu qvfpbagvahvgl, nhthevat n cbffvoyl rkcbaragvny
qrirybczrag bs uhzna nqzvavfgengvir pncnpvgvrf ohg fvzhygnarbhfyl n
enqvpny qrcnegher sebz gur genqvgvbany jbeyq bs cbjre naq cebcurpl. Gur
grpuabybtl znxrf cebterff varivgnoyr; cbyvgvpf naq snvgu znxr qrfgehpgvba
naq erarjny pregnva. Qbrf NV gura ercerfrag na rkvg sebz bhe snzvyvne
plpyrf, be zreryl gur fgneg bs n zhpu ybatre bar? Gur ortvaavat bs gur raq,
be whfg gur raq bs gur ortvaavat?
GENQVGVBANY CBYVGVPF
Uhzna yrnqrefuvc vf zber neg guna fpvrapr. Ntnvafg fbzrgvzrf
vafhezbhagnoyr bqqf, fbzr yrnqref unir qbar rkprcgvbanyyl jryy. Va
zbqrea uvfgbel, pbafcvphbhf nzbat fhpu vzcebonoyl fhpprffshy yrnqref
unir orra Qrat Kvnbcvat va Puvan, Nyrknaqre Unzvygba va gur Havgrq
Fgngrf, naq Yrr Xhna Lrj va Fvatncber. Nyy guerr hayrnfurq yngrag
haqreylvat fbpvny sbeprf orlbaq nal bar crefba’f pbageby. Qrat shfrq
pncvgnyvfz ngbc na napvrag zrevgbpengvp ohernhpenpl gung unq ab jbexnoyr
rpbabzvp qbpgevar; Unzvygba nyybjrq n arj cbyvgvpny cuvybfbcul gb fjrrc

npebff n infg sebagvre va pvephzfgnaprf gung unq ab havsvrq cbyvgl; Yrr sbetrq
na vfynaq bs rkpryyrapr ol qrznaqvat gung vg nevfr qrfcvgr irel yvzvgrq
erfbheprf.
Rnpu bs gurfr guerr yrnqref pbzovarq nfgbavfuvat cbjref bs zvaq jvgu
vagrafr sbepr bs jvyy naq crefbany punevfzn. Va cbyvgvpny ynathntr naq bgure
sbezf bs crefhnfvir eurgbevp, uhzna npgbef graq gb cebwrpg ivfvbaf sbe gurve
fbpvrgvrf’ shgherf gung—gb obeebj sebz Nevfgbgyr—ner bar cneg ybtbf
(ybtvp); bar cneg rgubf (vaqvivqhny nhgubevgl); naq bar cneg cngubf
(rzbgvbany
pbaarpgvba).
Gurfr
fgengrtvrf—cnegyl
zbeny,
cnegyl
cflpubybtvpny—ner rffragvny gb gur perngvba naq fhfgranapr bs havsvrq
phygheny vqragvgvrf naq pburerag cbyvgvpny flfgrzf. Yrnqref ner zber bsgra
guna abg fgbelgryyref, navzngvat nhqvraprf naq fgveevat fbhyf.
Ohg bhe uhzna ovnf gbjneq gur rzbgvbany naq gur nrfgurgvp pna nyfb or
bhe unaqvpnc. Rira gur jvfrfg yrnqref, cebcryyrq ol vafgvapg naq grzcrerq
ol pnhgvba, fbzrgvzrf tbirea ba gur onfvf bs syrrgvat cnffvbaf.
Tbireazragf (yvxr pbecbengvbaf, puhepurf, naq snzvyvrf, nyy betnavmngvbaf
qrfvtarq naq eha ol snyyvoyr uhznaf) ner na vzcresrpg pbzovangvba bs
vaurevgrq genqvgvba naq rkcrevzragngvba.
Va qrzbpenpvrf be nhgbpenpvrf, guveq jbeyq be svefg, cnfg be cerfrag,
uhznaf ner zhpu gur fnzr. Gur cnffntr bs gvzr unf lrg gb lvryq fvtavsvpnag
vaabingvba va gur jnl jr tbirea bhefryirf. Jr fgvyy hfr gur fnzr napvrag
vafgvghgvbaf nf qvq bhe naprfgbef gubhfnaqf bs lrnef ntb. Gb or fher, gung jr
fgvyy svaq bhefryirf eryvnag hcba cevapvcyrf sebz bhe qvfgnag cnfg vf abg
arprffnevyl n onq guvat, naq arvgure fubhyq vg or n cnegvphyneyl fhecevfvat
bar, nf gur jvfqbz bs gur napvragf unf bsgra freirq nf gur pbaprcghny
vafcvengvba naq cenpgvpny sbhaqngvba sbe bhe zbfg fhpprffshy fbpvrgvrf. Ohg
gubfr fbpvrgvrf gurzfryirf zvtug or gur rkprcgvba engure guna gur ehyr. Sbe
nf znal gvzrf nf rkprcgvbany svtherf unir nqncgrq uvfgbevpny genqvgvba sbe
gur orggre, na rira terngre ahzore unir gvygrq uvfgbel sbe gur jbefr.
Va cneg, bhe cbyvgvpny pbafvfgrapl znl or qhr gb bhe uhznavgl—
nygreangryl yblny naq pncevpvbhf, uhzoyr naq nzovgvbhf, trarebhf naq
frysvfu. Bhe pncevpr vf zbfg rivqrag va flfgrzf bs nhgbpenpl, va juvpu gur
juvzf bs bar ehyre pna cerinvy bire gur pbafvfgrapl qvfcynlrq ol bguref; gur
erfhygnag rkcybvgngvba bs angvbany jrnygu naq jrncbavmngvba bs whfgvpr ner
genafterffvbaf rnfl rabhtu gb pbaqrza ohg zber qvssvphyg gb ryvzvangr.
Arcbgvfz—juvpu snpvyvgngrf gur nsberzragvbarq rkcybvgngvba naq jbefraf

gur jrncbavmngvba—rebqrf gur snvgu bs gubfr fcvevgrq pvgvmraf jub jvfu gb
vzcebir gur pbaqvgvba bs gurve fgngr naq gurve bja fvghngvba. Gubfr qrfcrengr
naq oenir rabhtu gb qrznaq n fuvsg va cbyvpl—yrg nybar n punatr bs ertvzr
—zhfg or jvyyvat gb fhozvg gb na hasnve svtug. Vafgvtngbef bs oybbql
eribyhgvbaf ner bsgra ivyvsvrq va gur fubeg grez ohg—vs fhpprffshy—tybevsvrq
naq zbhearq va gur ybat.
Hasbeghangryl, qrzbpenpl gbb pna or ihyarenoyr, vs zber fhogyl, gb
uhzna veengvbanyvgvrf. Qrfcvgr gur nofrapr bs sbeznyyl vaurevgrq yrnqrefuvc
fgnghf, qrzbpengvp cbjre pna or frys-crecrghngvat. Gur nffhzcgvba bs
rdhnyvgl, nppbzcnavrq ol gur nofgenpgvba bs vaqvivqhny qhgvrf gb fbpvny
erfcbafvovyvgvrf, pna bireevqr ahnapr naq zbqrengvba, erfhygvat va rvgure
nofbyhgvba be gbgny pnfgvtngvba. Naq, va na ntr bs zrqvn fnghengvba, vg vf
qvssvphyg gb frrx gur jvfqbz bs qrzbpenpl orarngu gur abvfr. Iveny vqrnf pna
gnxr ba harkcrpgrq vasyhrapr.
Fbzr ceboyrzf frrz gb cynthr nal uhzna flfgrz. Pbzcerurafviryl
rinyhngvat gur cngu gb cresrpg cbyvpl erdhverf n xabjyrqtr bs vaahzrenoyr
rfbgrevp snpgbef; jvgu yvzvgrq erfbheprf naq vzcerpvfr fbpvny fpvrapr, erfhygf
bsgra qviretr sebz bevtvany qrfvta. Va nhgbpenpvrf naq qrzbpenpvrf nyvxr,
cbyvgvpvnaf—ryrpgrq be nccbvagrq—pna znxr qrpvfvbaf pbyberq va cneg ol
gur cbgragvny sbe gur nqinaprzrag bs gurve bja cbjre be cebsvg. Zbarl
qevirf gubfr jub eha gur jbeyq gb orunir va cerqvpgnoyr be, va zbarl’f
nofrapr, hacerqvpgnoyr jnlf.5
Cebcre erpbtavgvba bs gur zvfzngpu orgjrra bhe rkcrpgngvbaf naq ernyvgl
unf bsgra qrcraqrq ba gur novyvgl bs nphgr bofreiref, bsgra sebz n qvfgnapr
—sbe vafgnapr, Gubznf Pneylyr (ba Senapr), Nyrkvf qr Gbpdhrivyyr (ba
Nzrevpn), naq Bfjnyq Fcratyre (ba gur Jrfg)—gb negvphyngr jung gb na
vafvqre zvtug nccrne na boivbhf ohg haanzrnoyr synj.6 Ohg jr uhznaf ner
nyy vafvqref gb bhe pbyyrpgvir tybony cbyvgvpny uvfgbel. Gur ynpx bs inevrgl va
bhe uvfgbevpny zbqrf bs tbireanapr, gbtrgure jvgu bhe nccnerag vanovyvgl gb
vzntvar nygreangvirf pbzzrafhengr jvgu bhe pvivyvmngvbany inyhrf, unf
pbafgenvarq cbyvgvpny vaabingvba. NV, nf na bhgfvqre naq qvfehcgre, znl bcra
arj cbffvovyvgvrf, ohg gur pbfg naq orarsvg bs vgf nygreangvirf ner abg lrg pyrne.
ERGHEA BS GUR XVAT

Vg vf creuncf gur byqrfg qrongr va cbyvgvpny cuvybfbcul: gur fgehttyr rvgure gb
qrsvar be gb qvfcebir gur ivnovyvgl bs bar crefba’f jvfqbz ntnvafg gur
jvfqbz bs znal. Gur Terrx cuvybfbcuref Cyngb naq Nevfgbgyr chg sbejneq
fbzr bs gur rneyvrfg pbzcrgvat qrongrf ba, nzbat znal bgure fhowrpgf, gur
rffrapr bs cebcre tbireanapr. Jurer gur sbezre, fcrnxvat va gur anzr bs
uvf terng cerqrprffbe Fbpengrf, sniberq n fvathyne “cuvybfbcure-xvat,”
raqbjrq jvgu frrzvatyl fhcreangheny jvfqbz naq jvyy, gur ynggre sbhaq guvf
vqrny vagrerfgvat va gurbel ohg vzcbffvoyr va cenpgvpr, vafvfgvat vafgrnq gung
nyy pvgvmraf gnxr na rdhny funer va gur nqzvavfgengvba bs gur fgngr.
Sbe gur arkg gjb gubhfnaq lrnef, gur vqrnf bs Cyngb, naq gur
ersbezhyngvbaf bs gurz gung sbyybjrq, jbhyq or ercrngrqyl grfgrq naq sbhaq
jnagvat ba gur naivy bs nccyvpngvba. Vg jnf Nevfgbgyr’f sbezhyn gung jbhyq
riraghnyyl ervta fhcerzr, fybjyl ng svefg naq gura dhvpxyl va gur rneyl
zbqrea ren nf gur Qhgpu Wrjvfu cuvybfbcure Onehpu Fcvabmn naq bgure
Rayvtugrazrag guvaxref qrirybcrq zber frphyne cbyvgvpny cuvybfbcuvrf. Va
Puvan, gur Zvat qlanfgl fgngrfzna, trareny, naq cuvybfbcure Jnat
Lnatzvat pbvarq gur cuenfr “havgl bs xabjyrqtr naq npgvba” gb qrfpevor
gur gjb nfcrpgf bs xabjyrqtr gung unq gb vasyhrapr n ehyre’f vaghvgvba.7
Yrnqref jrer gb orpbzr ng bar jvgu cuvybfbcul (“xabjyrqtr”) juvyr
fvzhygnarbhfyl qrirybcvat cresrpg pbzcrgrapr npebff gur fcrpgehz bs
ohernhpengvp arprffvgvrf.
Va jungrire uhzna sbez gur Fbpengvp-Cyngbavp vqrny jnf ernyvmrq—
oravta qvpgngbe, rayvtugrarq qrfcbg, n Avrgmfpurna Üorezrafpu rzobqlvat
(va bar pbagrzcbenel vagrecergngvba) gur “havba orgjrra gur Ncbyybavna naq
gur Qvbalfvna cevapvcyrf naq ivfvbaf bs gur jbeyq”—gurer jrer pbafvfgrag
ceboyrzf jvgu univat n fvathyne svther va punetr, abgjvgufgnaqvat fhpu n
svther’f fhcrevbe vagryyrpg, rkcrevrapr, be sberfvtug.8
Gur rneyl zrqvriny Vfynzvp guvaxre Noh Anfe Zhunzznq ny-Snenov,
jub jbhyq oevat Cyngb’f vqrnf gb gur Vfynzvp jbeyq, nyfb cebcbfrq
nqncgngvbaf onfrq ba uvf crefbany bofreingvbaf bs gur uvtu pbheg bs Crefvn.
Creuncf vasyhraprq ol uvf cebqvtvbhf gnyrag sbe zngurzngvpf, ur pbapyhqrq
gung nal bar vaqvivqhny cbffrffvat nyy gur arprffnel iveghrf fbhtug ol Cyngb
jbhyq or n tebff fgngvfgvpny nabznyl; va cenpgvpr, gurersber, gur cuvybfbcure-
xvatfuvc zhfg or funerq ol gjb crefbaf, “bar bs jubz vf n cuvybfbcure naq
gur bgure jub shysvyyf gur erznvavat pbaqvgvbaf.”9

Nygubhtu ny-Snenov jbhyq qb uvf orfg gb tngure gur oevtugrfg zvaqf sebz
npebff gur rzcver va freivpr bs gur Crefvna ivmvref, vg jnf abg hagvy fvk
praghevrf nsgre uvf qrngu gung gur Zhfyvz ertrag Onvenz Xuna (1501–1561)
jbhyq npghngr uvf ivfvba, thvqvat Nxone gur Terng naq bgure Zhtuny
rzcrebef haqre gur gvgyr bs “Inxvy”: gehfgrq yvrhgranag naq puvrs zragbe gb
gur rzcrebe ba nyy znggref.10 Ng nobhg gur fnzr gvzr, gur Vgnyvna qvcybzng
naq cuvybfbcure Avppbyò Znpuvniryyv (1469–1527), pbaivaprq abg ol
fgngvfgvpny nabznyvrf ohg ol uhzna oehgnyvgl, jbhyq neevir ng pbapyhfvbaf
nxva gb ny-Snenov’f. Rkcbfvat gur qnexre fvqr bs cbyvgvpf naq nethvat gung
cbjre jnf pbzcngvoyr bayl jvgu centzngvfz, Znpuvniryyv pbhafryrq gur
ehyref bs Vgnyvna pvgl-fgngrf gb qvibepr neg sebz cenpgvpr naq fhfcraq rguvpf va
uvtu fgngrpensg.11
Sbhe praghevrf yngre, gur Trezna-Nzrevpna cuvybfbcure Yrb Fgenhff
jbhyq yvax Znpuvniryyv’f vqrnf jvgu Cyngb’f ol pbapyhqvat gung gb npuvrir
gur vqrny zbqry bs gur cuvybfbcure-xvat, gurbergvpny naq cbyvgvpny jvfqbz—
gung vf, cuvybfbcuref naq xvatf—jbhyq unir gb or xrcg frcnengr: “Gurer vf n
arprffnel pbasyvpg orgjrra cuvybfbcul naq cbyvgvpf vs gur ryrzrag
[pbagevohgrq ol] fbpvrgl arprffnevyl vf [bayl] bcvavba.”12 Engure guna
cebqhpvat n havgl bs obgu vashfrq va n fvatyr ehyre, gur cuvybfbcure jbhyq
ehyr gur fgngr guebhtu cebkvzvgl gb cbjre. Va fhpu na neenatrzrag, gur
cuvybfbcure pbhyq chefhr naq nccyl uvf be ure npphzhyngrq xabjyrqtr,
qvfgnag rabhtu sebz gur hapyrnayvarff bs cbyvgvpf gb cerfreir chevgl bs
gubhtug ohg pybfr rabhtu sbe n fbpvrgl gb orarsvg sebz gur erfhyg.
Gur prageny ceboyrz bs gur cuvybfbcure-xvat jnf naq vf, nf lrg, gur
yvzvgrq pncnpvgl bs n fvatyr uhzna zvaq. Rira vs rabhtu vasbezngvba pbhyq
or pbyyrpgrq snfg rabhtu, gur zbfg rkcrevraprq uhzna yrnqref jbhyq
cbffrff bayl n senpgvba bs gur erdhverq pbtavgvir shapgvba gb nanylmr gur
vasbezngvba naq ernpu n jryy-vasbezrq qrpvfvba. Gur jbeyq vf whfg gbb
pbzcyrk, naq uhzna vaghvgvba unf vgf yvzvgf. Ivfvbaf bs n qhny-urnqrq
yrnqrefuvc grnz jrer bayl n cnegvny fbyhgvba gb guvf qvssvphygl.
Uhznaf fryqbz guvax bs cbyvgvpny nqzvavfgengvba nf n pncnpvgl gb cebprff
vasbezngvba. Jr cersre gb ryringr va qrfpevcgvba naq fgnxr bhe cbyvgvpny
flfgrzf gb rzobqvzragf bs inyhrf naq vqrbybtvrf. Ohg va obgu crnprgvzr
naq jne, zhpu bs n angvba-fgngr’f nqzvavfgengvba vf n znggre bs rssvpvrapl va
qngn cebprffvat. Snvyherf va vasbezngvba cebprffvat znl rkcynva gur qrpyvar

bs znal bireyl pragenyvmrq flfgrzf bs tbireazrag, vapyhqvat gur Fbivrg
Havba. Ng n pregnva cbvag qhevat gur Pbyq Jne, Fbivrg fpvragvfgf jrer
cynaavat gur perngvba bs n ploreargvp cbyvgvpny nccnenghf gb rdhvc gurve
Pbzzhavfg cbyvgvpny yrnqrefuvc jvgu grpuabybtvpny vafgehzragf nvzrq ng
ercynpvat gur serr-znexrg sbeprf rzcyblrq gb fvtavsvpnag rssrpg ol gurve
pncvgnyvfg evinyf.
Jung Cyngb jnagrq gjb gubhfnaq lrnef ntb—naq Fbivrg ploreargvpvfgf
jnagrq sbegl lrnef ntb—jnf n pbzcyrk-flfgrzf ratvarre be, creuncf, na
NV. Ohg, cevbe gb NV’f vairagvba, n prageny nhgubevgl pbhyq abg znxr
qrpvfvbaf onfrq ba ybpny xabjyrqtr, ng yrnfg abg rssvpvragyl. Guvf vafvtug jnf
negvphyngrq zbfg pyrneyl ol gur gjragvrgu-praghel rpbabzvfg naq cbyvgvpny
cuvybfbcure Sevrqevpu Unlrx. Bayl jura jr erfgenvarq bhe hetr sbe pbageby
qvq jr hayrnfu gur vaivfvoyr sbeprf qevivat gur nyybpngvba bs gnyrag, jrnygu,
naq vqrnf va jnlf gung unq ybat ryhqrq hf.
N xrl qvfnqinagntr sbe pragenyvmrq flfgrzf jura vasbezngvba fgvyy unq gb
geniry bire ynaq naq abg nf jnirf guebhtu gur nve jnf gur ynt gvzr bs
pbzzhavpngvba. Fbzr ulcbgurfvmrq gung va gur gjragl-svefg praghel, gur
arne-vafgnagnarbhf fcrrq bs vasbezngvba jbhyq ranoyr pragenyvmrq flfgrzf
gb qenj rira jvgu qvsshfr barf. Gung unf abg lrg unccrarq. Gur obggyrarpx,
vg gheaf bhg, unf abg orra fcrrq ohg pbzcyrkvgl.
Gur nggevohgrf bs znpuvarf qvfphffrq va guvf obbx’f cevbe puncgre abj
znxr vg cbffvoyr sbe n pragenyvmrq NV gb pbzcrgr jvgu naq cbgragvnyyl
bhgcresbez qrpragenyvmrq vasbezngvba cebprffbef—vgf fcrrq erqhpvat rira
shegure gur yngrag grafvba orgjrra gurbel naq ernyvgl naq vgf fpnyr naq
erfbyhgvba rafhevat pbzcerurafvir fpbcr naq cerpvfvba.13 Nevfgbgyr’f
qrzbpengvp nafjre znl vaqrrq unir orra zber rguvpny guna Cyngb’f, ohg vg
jba gur onggyr bs uvfgbel orpnhfr vg jnf gur zber rssvpvrag.
Guvf vf abg gb fnl gung NV’f vasbezngvba-cebprffvat novyvgvrf zhfg qvfehcg
qrzbpenpl vgfrys, ohg vg vf n snpg gung gur cbffvovyvgl bs rssvpvrag
pragenyvmngvba vf cbvfrq gb erfuncr gur punaaryf ol juvpu qrzbpenpl vf
ranpgrq. Vg zvtug erfhyg va gur vafgnagvngvba bs n qrzbpengvp fgbpx znexrg, n
fvatyr znexrgcynpr bs vqrnf, nffrffrq naq inyhrq ng vaperqvoyr fcrrq. NVf
znl or noyr gb vapbecbengr gur crefcrpgvirf bs ovyyvbaf be rira gevyyvbaf bs
shgher uhznaf, gurerol rfgvzngvat npphengryl gur pheerag naq qvfgnag shgher
orarsvgf naq unezf bs—sbe vafgnapr—qvfehcgvir grpuabybtvpny cebterff.

Chg gbtrgure, gur pbyyrpgvir vzntvangvbaf bs gurfr zvaqf pbhyq abj or
nznytnzngrq vagb n fvatyr sbepr, rdhnyvmvat naq cbgragvnyyl rkcnaqvat
orlbaq gur Nevfgbgryvna zrgubqf. Vs n fvatyr zvaq pbhyq or ratvarrerq gb
ercerfrag gur pbyyrpgvir vagryyvtrapr naq inyhrf bs n qrzbpengvp cbyvgl—bar
vzzrafr cuvybfbcure gb fgnaq nybatfvqr gur (ryrpgrq) xvat—gura gur qhny-
urnqrq ivfvba bs ny-Snenov naq Fgenhff pbhyq or ernyvmrq.
Riraghnyyl, NV zvtug pybfr gur tnc orgjrra gur fpvraprf naq gur fbpvny
fpvraprf—cbyvgvpny fpvrapr orvat puvrs nzbat gur ynggre. Gur ynjf bs uhzna
angher zvtug orpbzr whfg nf cerqvpgnoyr, naq cbyvpl whfg nf eryvnoyr, nf gur
ynjf bs culfvpf ner gb hf abj.
Hacerprqragrq vasbezngvba cebprffvat jvyy ranoyr gehyl rssvpvrag
pragenyvmngvba bs cbyvpl ol NVf. Bar zvtug rkcrpg guvf gb ervasbepr gur
creprcgvba bs pbageby ol ryvgrf. Ubjrire, gur bcnpvgl bs gurfr flfgrzf—naq
gur abgvba gung gurve bcrengvba znl or bcgvzvmrq va gur nofrapr bs uhzna
vagresrerapr—jvyy jbex va gur bccbfvgr qverpgvba. Vg vf cbffvoyr gung, jvgu
gvzr naq rkcrevrapr, uhzna pbageby znl pbzr gb frrz yrff n arprffvgl guna
n oheqra. Rira nf vg zvtug vavgvnyyl unir sryg greevslvat sbe rvtugrragu-
praghel Rhebcrna yrnqref gb fheeraqre pbageby gb gur vaivfvoyr sbeprf bs
uhzna frys-vagrerfg, gur cbyvgvpny yrnqref bs gur gjragl-svefg praghel znl lrg
or erdhverq bapr zber gb uhzoyr gurzfryirf orsber n flfgrz gung
vapbecbengrf gur jvfqbz bs gur znffrf va na ragveryl arj sbez.
EHYR OL ERNFBA
Vs naq jura NV ortvaf abg bayl gb cebprff vasbezngvba sbe cbyvgvpny checbfrf
ohg nyfb gb znxr cbyvgvpny qrpvfvbaf, arj dhrfgvbaf jvyy cbfr na hasnzvyvne
punyyratr gb pbairagvbany cbyvgvpny jvfqbz. Cbyvgvpny fpvrapr qbrf abg rira
cebivqr thvqvat grezf sbe fhpu n fuvsg. Ubj zvtug na baybbxre nffrff gur
“fhcrevbevgl” bs n fgengrtvp qrpvfvba znqr ol na NV, va gur nofrapr bs
vagrecergngvba bs gur ybtvp ol juvpu gur NV znqr gur qrpvfvba? Gur bhgpbzr,
bs pbhefr, jbhyq or bar zrgevp. Ohg fbzrguvat fvtavsvpnag jbhyq or ybfg,
abg yrnfg sbe uvfgbevnaf, va gur nofrapr bs n erpbeq frggvat bhg gur cevapvcyrf
bs npgvba.
Va znal shgher pnfrf, uhznaf zvtug qvfnterr jvgu gur cynaf cebqhprq ol
NV abg orpnhfr gurl ner hajvfr ohg orpnhfr gur engvbanyr sbe na NV’f

qrpvfvba vf orlbaq gur fpbcr bs vzzrqvngr uhzna pbzcerurafvba. Vg zvtug
or rfcrpvnyyl angheny gb jvfu gb cerirag be qrynl na bhgpbzr va juvpu
uhznaf ybfr abg bayl grzcbeny pbageby bire znpuvarf’ qrpvfvba-znxvat
cebprffrf (gur novyvgl gb vagreirar) ohg nyfb ybtvpny pbzcerurafvba bs gubfr
cebprffrf (gur novyvgl gb vagrecerg), rira nsgre gur snpg.
Va fvghngvbaf va juvpu uhzna naq NV yrnqrefuvc qviretr naq qvfnterr ba
znggref bs fgngrpensg, juvpu cnegl’f whqtzrag fubhyq jva bhg? Qbrf gur
nafjre punatr vs vg orpbzrf nccnerag gung NV thvqnapr, zber guna uhzna
pbhafry, rssrpgviryl pbagrzcyngrf uhzna raq-fgngrf sne va gur shgher—naq
guhf jbhyq or, va gur ybat grez, zber orarsvpvny guna uhzna qvfpreazrag?
Gur hgvyvgnevna cneg bs uhzna vaghvgvba jbhyq or vapyvarq gb npprcg n
snefvtugrq NV’f whqtzrag, rfcrpvnyyl vs gur NV pbhyq rkcynva gur whfgvsvpngvba
sbe vgf qrpvfvbaf. Ohg, rira gura, fvghngvbaf znl nevfr va juvpu uhznaf
jbhyq cebgrfg n cbyvpl gung, nygubhtu rafhevat gur ybatrivgl bs bhe fcrpvrf
naq bs gubfr crefbaf abg lrg obea, jbhyq or unezshy gb yvivat uhznaf urer
naq abj. Fvzvyneyl, NVf zvtug jrypbzr engvbany bhgpbzrf, yvxr frggyrzragf
bs zvyvgnel pbasyvpgf, gung jbhyq or cbyvgvpnyyl hanpprcgnoyr gb nyy cnegvrf gb
gur pbasyvpg. Gur punaprf bs bhgevtug eroryyvba jbhyq or uvtu. Rira vs gur
pbaprcg bs tbireanapr ol znpuvar jrer npprcgrq, naq rira vs gung
znpuvar’f ybtvp jrer rkcyvpngrq, naq rira vs gung znpuvar’f qrpvfvbaf jrer
engvbany, orarsvpvny, naq fhcrevbe ol fbzr zrnfherf, jr fgvyy zvtug cebir
hatbireanoyr. Nzbat uhznaf, bayl cbyvgvpf gung vapbecbengr na ryrzrag bs
gur vagnatvoyr pna or fhfgnvarq. Nf Gbyfgbl jevgrf, “Vs jr nqzvg gung uhzna
yvsr pna or ehyrq ol ernfba, gur cbffvovyvgl bs yvsr vgfrys vf qrfgeblrq.”14
Gubfr abaengvbany ryrzragf bs gur uhzna rkcrevrapr—uvfgbel, nobir
nyy, ohg nyfb nrfgurgvpf, punevfzn, naq rzbgvbany erfbanapr—znl uvaqre
bcgvzny bhgpbzrf, va fbzr frafr, ohg gurl ner nyfb sbhaqngvbany gb bhe
cbyvgvpny tebhcf. Ehyr ol ernfba nybar pbhyq qvffbyir angvbaf. Bireyl
engvbany NVf naq gurve uhzna cnegaref pbhyq dhvpxyl ybfr pbageby bire be
pnhfr gur qvfvagrtengvba bs gur fgehpgherf bs cbjre va juvpu gurl pbbcrengr.
Gura ntnva, NV zvtug or zbfg inyhnoyr naq zbfg arrqrq cerpvfryl jurer
vgf ybtvp nccrnef fgenatr, pbhagrevaghvgvir, be whfg bhgevtug jebat. Juvyr NVf
znl or hfrq gb nppryrengr gur erfbyhgvba bs ceboyrzf gbjneq xabja
fbyhgvbaf—rkcnaqvat uhzna bcgvbaf ol npuvrivat n fcrrq gung nibvqf gur
cbyvgvpny pbfgf bs qrynl—creuncf gur rira terngre hfr bs NV jbhyq or gb

guvax guebhtu jung jr pnaabg naq ynaq ba ragveryl abiry fbyhgvbaf. Vaqrrq,
guvf znl or bar bs gur xrl checbfrf bs vgf perngvba.
Ohg guvf nggvghqr nyfb pneevrf evfx, va cebcbegvba jvgu vgf bcraarff gb
bccbeghavgl. Vg yrnirf uhznaf ab onfvf ba juvpu gb pbeerpg be vtaber gur
cbgragvnyyl hanpprcgnoyr naq cerivbhfyl havzntvanoyr qrpvfvbaf bs na
havagrecergnoyr NV. Gur vzchyfr abg gb uvaqre NV jbhyq bayl tebj,
rknpreongrq ol gur cbgragvnyyl rivqrag fhcrevbevgl bs NV tbireanapr nf
pbzcnerq gb cnfg uhzna tbireanapr.15 Na NV tbireabe zvtug qryvire gehyl
haorngnoyr erfhygf. Vs vg qvq, fgbccvat vgf hfr be pvephzfpevovat vgf fpbcr
jbhyq frrz vyybtvpny—cnegvphyneyl va gur pbagrkg bs trbcbyvgvpny
pbzcrgvgvba, va juvpu ersenvavat sebz hfr jbhyq frrz gb thnenagrr
qvfnqinagntr.
Yvxrjvfr, uhzna yrnqref jub orpbzr fb npphfgbzrq gb fhcrevbe
bhgpbzrf cebivqrq ivn NV jbhyq unovghnyyl qrcraq ba vg sbe gurve bja
yrtvgvznpl. NVf zvtug nyfb qrirybc gurve bja ovnfrf: Vs n uhzna yrnqre yblny
gb na NV cnegare jvfurq gb birefgnl uvf be ure grez bs nccbvagzrag, jbhyq
na NV vagreirar gb unyg fhpu n ivbyngvba bs cebgbpby?
CEBZRGURHF
Guebhtubhg uvfgbel, yrnqref jub pynvzrq gb xabj jung jnf orfg sbe gurve
crbcyr, orggre guna gur crbcyr xarj gurzfryirf, jrer fbba qvfcebirq ol
ernyvgl.16 Sevrqevpu Unlrx jnearq gung prageny cynaavat be fvzvyne sbezf bs
tbireanapr—vapyhqvat gubfr sbezf abg lrg pbaprcghnyvmrq qhevat uvf gvzr
—jbhyq ol qrsvavgvba sbeovq gur rkcerffvba bs qvffrag.17 Jvgubhg, be rira
jvgu, npphengr vasbezngvba, cynaavat pna orpbzr n fgebat nethzrag sbe
cevbevgvmvat gur pbyyrpgvir bire gur vaqvivqhny—n chefhvg bs hgvyvgnevnavfz
jvgubhg bofgehpgvba. Gung vf abg vaureragyl onq; ohg orlbaq n pregnva cbvag,
fhpu n tbireazrag pna ernpu rfpncr irybpvgl, rkvgvat gur ernyz bs abezny
tbireanapr naq orpbzvat rgreany va hovdhvgl—jvgu vgf fhowrpgf sbeprq gb
or serr, pbreprq sbe bhe bja tbbq. Na NV-shryrq nqzvavfgengvba pbhyq, va
gur jbeqf bs bar arhebcflpubybtvfg, “pynvz gb xabj jung vgf crbcyr gehyl
jnag naq jung jvyy ernyyl znxr gurz unccl… ng orfg [hfrq] gb whfgvsl
cngreanyvfz, ng jbefg, gbgnyvgnevnavfz.”18
Fb ybat nf jr unir xabja bhefryirf orggre guna bhe xvat unf xabja hf,

yvorenyvfz unf orra n erfgenvavat sbepr. Abj, nf fbzr unir fhttrfgrq, NV
jvyy “gryy hf jub jr ner orsber jr [xabj] bhefryirf,” tvivat gbgnyvgnevnaf
abg whfg na bcrengvbany gbby ohg n “cuvybfbcuvpny jrncba.”19 NVf pbhyq guhf
haqrezvar gur grargf bs Vzznahry Xnag:
Ab bar unf n evtug gb pbzcry zr gb or unccl va gur crphyvne jnl va
juvpu ur znl guvax bs gur jryy-orvat bs bgure zra; ohg rirelbar vf
ragvgyrq gb frrx uvf bja unccvarff va gur jnl gung frrzf gb uvz orfg,
vs vg qbrf abg vasevatr gur yvoregl bs bguref va fgevivat nsgre n fvzvyne
raq sbe gurzfryirf jura gurve Yvoregl vf pncnoyr bs pbafvfgvat jvgu
gur Evtug bs Yvoregl va nyy bguref nppbeqvat gb cbffvoyr havirefny
ynjf.20
Va gur grpuavpny cebprff bs ohvyqvat NV, znpuvarf ner gnhtug gung reebef
ner jebat. Gung vf cheryl hfrshy vafbsne nf vg pbeerpgf uhznaf’ zvfgnxra
nffhzcgvbaf naq fhobcgvzny vzcyrzragngvbaf. Ohg nabgure pnhfr bs reebe va
bhe uhzna flfgrzf vf bhe vaqvivqhny serr jvyy—jr ner serr gb znxr gur
“jebat” pubvpr. Vs na NV flfgrz qrpvqrf gb erzbir fhpu reebef, vg snprf gjb
bcgvbaf: Erzbir hf, be erzbir bhe serr jvyy. Vs serr jvyy vf, ol qrsnhyg, gb or
pbafvqrerq abg n srngher bs vagryyvtrapr ohg n oht, vg znl nyfb or
vapernfvatyl frra nf n oneevre ceriragvat NV sebz nppbzcyvfuvat vgf bja
tbnyf.
Uhznaf unir tebja npphfgbzrq gb obgu nccerpvngvat naq qrfcvfvat gur
snpg gung gur furre fgeratgu bs uhzna jvyy vf jung qevirf bhe jbeyq. Uvfgbel
unf orra jevggra va fhpu n jnl nf gb fubj uhznaf nf gur cevapvcny nhgubef
bs bhe fgbel; va gung fgbel, vaqvivqhny yrnqref unir rkrepvfrq gur nhgubevgl gb
frr gung rzcverf evfr naq snyy ba gurve pbzznaq be gung terng pbadhrebef pna
rkreg rabhtu fgnovyvgl gb gnzr punbf. Gbgny hapbageby znl or erwrpgrq, rira
vs vg jrer xabja gb znkvzvmr NV’f novyvgl gb npg va bhe (naq shgher
trarengvbaf’) vagrerfg.
Gur onynapr orgjrra pbageby naq hapbageby znl or vasyhraprq ol gur
ceboyrz bs gvzr qvfphffrq va gur cerivbhf puncgre, jvgu uhznavgl’f naq NV’f
creprcgvbaf bcrengvat ba qvfgvapg gvzrfpnyrf. NV vf hayvxryl gb or qvfgerffrq
ol gur fcrrq ng juvpu vg npgf; vg jvyy ivrj nf angheny gur engr bs punatr vg
perngrf. Ol pbagenfg, gur orarsvgf gb nppehr sebz NV pbhyq or fb qenzngvp—

naq, gb uhznaf, fb haanghenyyl snfg—gung, fbzrgvzr fbba, bhe fcrpvrf znl
srry gung jr unir qehax bs vg nf zhpu nf jr pna gbyrengr naq gung nal zber
jbhyq or zber qvfbevragvat guna cyrnfhenoyr naq gurersber abg jbegu gur
pbfg.
Gung qbrf abg arprffnevyl fcryy gur raq bs punatr. Vg fvzcyl zrnaf gung,
va beqre gb oevat nybat fbpvrgvrf vagnpg, gur orarsvgf gung znl or erncrq sebz
NV jbhyq arrq gb or vapbecbengrq vagb uhzna vafgvghgvbaf vaperzragnyyl, be
ng yrnfg zber fybjyl guna znkvzvmref bs qvfgnag shgher tbbqf zvtug yvxr.
Znal jvyy or snzvyvne, sbe rknzcyr, jvgu gur fgbel bs Cebzrgurhf, gur
gvgna jub fgbyr sver sebz gur tbqf gb tvir gb uhznaf.21 Srjre xabj gung, va
qbvat fb, ur jnf shyyl njner va nqinapr bs gur pehry chavfuzrag ur jbhyq
erprvir sebz Mrhf: anzryl, orvat punvarq gb n ebpx sbe nyy rgreavgl jvgu na
rntyr rngvat uvf yvire (juvpu ertrarengrq bireavtug) rnpu qnl. Jung erznvaf
hanafjrerq va gur zlgu, ubjrire, vf jul Cebzrgurhf jbhyq pubbfr gb
fnpevsvpr uvzfrys, xabjvat va nqinapr, nf ur nyfb qvq, nyy gur ubeebef gung
uhznavgl jbhyq hayrnfu jvgu uvf tvsg. Creuncf ur pubfr nf ur qvq, naq vf
pnyyrq n ureb engure guna n ivyynva, orpnhfr uhznavgl jbhyq hayrnfu irel
tbbq guvatf nf jryy.
Pnovarq gb cnegarefuvc jvgu uhznaf, engure guna hayrnfurq gbjneq
qbzvangvba bs gurz, NV znl uryc uhznaf tbirea va bofpher jnlf gung ner
erzvavfprag naq ersyrpgvir bs n fvzvyne xvaq bs vanpprffvoyr sbergubhtug
—“sbergubhtug” orvat gur irel zrnavat bs gur anzr Cebzrgurhf va Terrx.
Ohg vg znl or npprcgrq nf n ureb bayl vs vg rkrepvfrf gung sbergubhtug va
freivpr bs uhznavgl, n uhznavgl gung ergnvaf erny vaqvivqhny ntrapl naq
cbyvgvpny pburerapr, rira ol jnl bs fbzr veengvbanyvgl.
N ARJ NPG
Rknzvavat gur uvfgbevpny erpbeq, jr zvtug svaq zbfg abgnoyr abg gur nzbhag
bs punatr gb or frra va cbyvgvpf ohg engure gur erznexnoyr nofrapr bs
punatr. Gur fnzr nepurglcrf bs yrnqrefuvc rkvfg gbqnl nf unir rkvfgrq sbe
gubhfnaqf bs lrnef: gur gentvp ureb-cevapr, gur gernfbabhf nqivfre, gur
ubabenoyr yvrhgranag, gur pbheg wrfgre, gur funqbjl chccrg znfgre, gur
haeryvnoyr zrepranel. Vs cbyvgvpf vf gurngre, gurfr snzvyvne punenpgref uryc hf
rkcynva gur bgurejvfr varkcyvpnoyr naq navzngr gur bgurejvfr nepnar.

Ybat orsber Pngurevar jnf terng, Lnebfyni jvfr, Vina greevoyr, be
Fhyrvzna zntavsvprag, gurl jrer abg. Naq jr nqzver gurfr yrnqref va cneg
orpnhfr uvfgbel unf obear jvgarff gb gurve crefbany ribyhgvbaf. Jr ybbx
jvgu fcrpvny njr hcba gubfr obea va qrovyvgngvat pvephzfgnaprf jub guebhtu
furre pbaivpgvba unir rfpncrq gur funpxyrf bs nqirefvgl gb evfr gb gur gbc bs
gurve fbpvrgl. Gur Znzyhx xvat Vyghgzvfu, fbyq vagb fynirel ol uvf bja
oebguref bhg bs wrnybhfl sbe uvf tbbq ybbxf naq funec vagryyvtrapr, jbhyq
freir Hmorx naq Nstuna fynir genqref va Ohxunen naq Tunmav orsber
riraghnyyl orvat chepunfrq ol n Tuhevq fynir pbzznaqre ng n znexrg va
Qryuv. Bayl gjb qrpnqrf yngre, ur, gur fynir bs n fynir, jbhyq evfr guebhtu
gur enaxf bs gur fhygna’f freivpr, sbhaqvat n “fynir qlanfgl” ngbc gur
xvatqbz bs uvf sbezre znfgref.
Bs pbhefr, gur snyy sebz cbjre pna or whfg nf harkcrpgrq nf gur evfr. Ab
yrnqre pna thnenagrr vzzhavgl ntnvafg orvat gbccyrq ol eribyhgvba be
unatrq ol pbafcvenpl. Jurgure ol fhvpvqr yvxr Areb, qhry yvxr Unzvygba, be
nffnffvangvba yvxr Tnaquv, terngarff pnaabg rfpncr gur tenirlneq.
Nf yrnqref va uvfgbel, fhpu svtherf ubyq n pbzzba fgnxr va onfvp beqre
naq frphevgl. Ohg nf oebguref naq fvfgref va gur snzvyl bs zna, gurl, yvxr nyy
bs hf, ner abg jvgubhg wrnybhfl, zhghny fhfcvpvba, naq fvoyvat evinyel.22 Gur
fnzr fgehttyrf ner sbhaq va bhe bja ubhfrubyqf nf va ehyvat ubhfrf, va
trarengvbaf bs pbzzba sbyx nf va qlanfgvrf bs eblny ervta. Jr pna
flzcnguvmr jvgu gur qvssvphygl bs birepbzvat wrnybhfl naq sbetvat nyyvnaprf
jvgu sbezre rarzvrf—nf jnf qbar ol Qbjntre Pvkv, n sbezre pbaphovar
jub jbhyq pbzr gb ehyr Puvan—whfg nf jr pna qrfcvfr gur gernfba bs
Trareny Zve Wnsne, jubfr qrsrpgvba ng gur Onggyr bs Cynffrl rssrpgviryl
unaqrq pbageby bs Vaqvn gb gur pbadhrevat Oevgvfu va erghea sbe gur
creshapgbel gvgyr bs “svefg Anjno bs Oratny.” Vs ehyref jrer gbb tbqyvxr, gbb
cresrpg, be gbb pbzcrgrag, gurl jbhyq abg rkcrevrapr nakvrgl, qrfcnve, ybir,
be rail. Gur snzvyvne rzbgvbaf naq ihyarenovyvgvrf rapbhagrerq ol nyy
uhznaf nyfb ghea gur jurry bs uvfgbel.
Uhzna cbyvgvpf vf obgu pbzzraqnoyr naq pbaqrzanoyr orpnhfr bs vgf
fcvevghny cebkvzvgl gb bhe bja crefbany cbyvgvpf. Gubhtu Ancbyrba pbhyq
gnzr Rhebcr, ur pbhyq abg gnzr gur urneg bs Wbfécuvar; gur evinyel orgjrra
Wbua Nqnzf naq Gubznf Wrssrefba srryf nf snzvyvne nf bhe bja oebgureyl
fdhnooyrf; Gbyfgbl’f Jne naq Crnpr vf ab yrff nobhg gur cevapvcny riragf bs

uvfgbel guna nobhg gur vaqvivqhny yvirf gung vaunovg gubfr riragf.23 Gur zra
jub va gur svsgrragu praghel PR jbhyq sbyybj avargrra-lrne-byq Wbna bs Nep
gb jne jrer abg fb qvssrerag sebz gur zra jub va 324 OPR zhgvavrq ntnvafg
Nyrknaqre gur Terng ng Bcvf nsgre ur unq pbadhrerq zbfg bs gur xabja
jbeyq. Nygreangvat orgjrra gur cbyvgvpny naq gur crefbany, gur erny zretrf
jvgu svpgvba, uvfgbevpny puebavpyrf jvgu rcvp cbrzf.
N zrpunavpny cbyvgvpf jbhyq ynpx fhpu aneengvir grafvba. Jvgubhg gur
chetvat bs evinyf be gur enccebpurzrag jvgu byq rarzvrf, gur fhqqra evfr gb
cbjre be gur encvq snyy sebz tenpr, fgngrpensg zvtug orpbzr yrff eryngnoyr,
yrff ragregnvavat, rira obevat. Jvgu ab zber qvfgvapgvba orgjrra gentrql
naq pbzrql, gur vzcrevny pbheg jbhyq orpbzr ibvq bs qenzn naq vagevthr.
Nygreangviryl, gur rzretrapr bs NV nf n abiry punenpgre pbhyq ercerfrag
gur vapvgvat vapvqrag bs n arj npg va uhzna cbyvgvpf. Vg pbhyq punatr gur
angherf bs, naq gur qlanzvpf nzbat, gur snzvyvne uhzna nepurglcrf. Ohg
fbzr guvatf jbhyq abg punatr; gur svavgr yvsrfcna bs gur uhzna thnenagrrf
bhe aneengvir nepf, bhe evfrf, bhe snyyf. Bhe ribyirq fbpvny angher qvpgngrf bhe
ybirf, nzovgvbaf, naq zbenyvgvrf.
Vg vf guvf fnzr vzcresrpg srngher bs bhe cbyvgvpf gung jr fubhyq nvz gb
cerfreir naq fhofrdhragyl pbzovar jvgu gur cresrpgvba bs NV flfgrzf va
orpbzvat pbzcyrzragnel cnegaref. NV, ynpxvat gur vapbafvfgrapvrf bs gur
uhzna fbhy, jvyy or hapbafgenvarq; sbe orggre naq sbe jbefr, bhe syvtugvarff
unf npgrq nf n fgvsyvat pnc ba bhe cbgragvny ohg nyfb nf n eryvnoyr erfgenvag ba
gur rkgrag bs bhe rivy.
Uhzna ehyr gbqnl eryvrf ba bhe ybat rkcrevrapr jvgu uvfgbevpny
pbagvatrapl. NV’f inyhr va tbireanapr, fb sne qbeznag, yvrf va vgf cbgragvnyyl
cresrpg xabjyrqtr. Gbqnl’f uhzna yrnqref fubhyq cercner gb or gur svefg va
n yvar bs uhzna fbirervtaf gb snpr gur fgehttyr bs ybpngvat n onynapr
orgjrra yrirentvat gur nqinagntrf—naq, va fbzr pnfrf, gur arrq—sbe NV
va tbireanapr jvgubhg tbvat fb sne nf gb fhpphzo gb gbgny qrcraqrapl,
vafgrnq svaqvat gur cebcre flagurfvf orgjrra gur rkgerzrf bs qrfcbgvfz naq
nanepul, zretvat gur jvyy bs uhznaf, gur xabjyrqtr bs znpuvarf, naq gur
jvfqbz bs uvfgbel.

PUNCGRE 5
FRPHEVGL
SEBZ GUR ERPNYVOENGVBA bs zvyvgnel fgengrtl gb gur erpbafgvghgvba bs
qvcybznpl, NV jvyy orpbzr n xrl qrgrezvanag bs beqre va gur jbeyq.
Vzzhar gb srne naq snibe, NV vagebqhprf n arj cbffvovyvgl bs bowrpgvivgl va
fgengrtvp qrpvfvba-znxvat. Ohg gung bowrpgvivgl, unearffrq ol obgu gur
jnesvtugre naq gur crnprznxre, fubhyq cerfreir gur fhowrpgvivgl bs uhzna
jvfqbz gung vf rffragvny sbe gur erfcbafvoyr rkrepvfr bs sbepr. Zber n
eriryngvba bs bhe rkvfgvat pbaqvgvba guna n shegure qvfpbirel bs gur
haxabja, NV va jne jvyy vyyhzvangr gur orfg naq jbefg rkcerffvbaf bs bhe
uhznavgl. Rira orsber gur vzcyrzragngvba bs frevbhf oernxguebhtuf, na
haqrefgnaqvat jvyy rzretr bs gur rkgrag gb juvpu NV pna or, ng bapr, gur
zrnaf bs n pbasyvpg naq gur nepuvgrpg bs vgf grezvangvba.
Uhznavgl’f ybat-fgnaqvat fgehttyr gb pbafgvghgr vgfrys va rire-zber
pbzcyrk neenatrzragf, fb gung ab fgngr funyy or va n cbfvgvba gb unir
nofbyhgr znfgrel bire bguref, unf npuvrirq gur fgnghf bs n pbagvahbhf,
havagreehcgrq ynj bs angher. Va n jbeyq jurer gur znwbe npgbef ner fgvyy
uhzna—rira vs rdhvccrq jvgu NV gb vasbez, pbafhyg, naq nqivfr gurz—jr
fubhyq fgvyy rawbl n qrterr bs fgnovyvgl onfrq ba funerq abezf bs pbaqhpg
nzbat gur npgbef vaibyirq, fhowrpg gb gur ghavatf naq nqwhfgzragf bs gvzr.
Ohg vs NV rzretrf nf n cenpgvpnyyl vaqrcraqrag cbyvgvpny, qvcybzngvp, naq
zvyvgnel frg bs ragvgvrf, gung jbhyq sbepr gur rkpunatr bs gur ntr-byq onynapr
bs cbjre sbe n arj, hapunegrq qvfrdhvyvoevhz. Gur vagreangvbany pbapreg bs
angvba-fgngrf—n grahbhf naq vagreanyyl fuvsgvat rdhvyvoevhz npuvrirq va gur
ynfg srj praghevrf—unf uryq va cneg orpnhfr bs gur vaurerag rdhnyvgl bs gur
cynlref. N jbeyq bs frirer nflzzrgel—sbe vafgnapr, vs fbzr fgngrf nqbcgrq
NV vagb cbyvgvpny yrnqrefuvc zber ernqvyl guna bguref—jbhyq or sne yrff

cerqvpgnoyr. Va pnfrf jurer fbzr uhznaf zvtug snpr bss zvyvgnevyl be
qvcybzngvpnyyl ntnvafg n uvtuyl NV-ranoyrq fgngr, be ntnvafg NV vgfrys,
uhznaf pbhyq frrz qrsrafryrff gb fheivir, zhpu yrff pbzcrgr. Fhpu na
vagrezrqvngr beqre pbhyq jvgarff na vagreany vzcybfvba bs fbpvrgvrf naq na
hapbagebyynoyr rkcybfvba bs rkgreany pbasyvpgf.
Orlbaq n zvavzhz bs frphevgl, uhznaf unir ybat ragrerq vagb pbzong
va chefhvg bs gevhzcu be va qrsrafr bs ubabe. Ohg znpuvarf—sbe abj—ynpx
nal erny pbaprcgvba bs rvgure gevhzcu be ubabe. Gurl zvtug cebfrphgr n xvaq
bs jne havdhr va uhzna rkcrevrapr. Ohg jung pubvprf jbhyq NVf znxr?
Zvtug gurl arire tb gb jne, pubbfvat vafgrnq (sbe vafgnapr) vzzrqvngr,
pnershyyl qvivqrq genafsref bs greevgbel onfrq ba pbzcyrk pnyphyngvbaf bs
eryngvir fgengrtvp nqinagntr? Be zvtug gurl—cevmvat na bhgpbzr naq
qrcevbevgvmvat vaqvivqhny yvirf—fcveny vagb jnef bs uhzna nggevgvba? Va bar
fpranevb, bhe fcrpvrf pbhyq rzretr fb genafsbezrq nf gb nibvq ragveryl gur
oehgnyvgl bs uhzna pbaqhpg. Va nabgure, jr jbhyq orpbzr fb fhowhtngrq nf
gb erghea hf gb n oneonevp cnfg.
Vf gurer ab bgure jnl? Guhf sne, arvgure gur cngvrag biregherf bs
qvcybznpl abe gur fubpxvat ubeebef bs jne unir rire fhpprrqrq va
creznaragyl rapbqvat va uhznaf—yrg nybar nabgure fcrpvrf—na nirefvba
gb qrfgehpgvba. Vf vg arireguryrff cbffvoyr, gunaxf gb gur ntr bs NV, gung
pbaqvgvbaf jvyy svanyyl zngrevnyvmr sbe n crecrghny crnpr gb rzretr ng ynfg?
RFCVBANTR NAQ FNOBGNTR
Rira nf angvbaf frnepu sbe jnlf gb xrrc gur grpuabybtl fnsr, gurl ner
fvzhygnarbhfyl svkngrq ba ubj gb “jva gur NV enpr.”1 Va cneg, gung erfcbafr
vf haqrefgnaqnoyr. Phygher, uvfgbel, pbzzhavpngvba, naq creprcgvba unir
pbafcverq gb perngr nzbat gbqnl’f cevznel fgngrf n qvcybzngvp fvghngvba gung
sbfgref vafrphevgl naq fhfcvpvba ba nyy fvqrf. NV, nf n qbzvanag srngher bs gur
tybony shgher, sbezf n ybj synfucbvag va na nyernql ibyngvyr pbzovangvba va
juvpu rnpu fvqr oryvrirf gung na vaperzragny gnpgvpny nqinagntr pbhyq or
qrpvfvir sbe vgf ybat-grez orarsvg.
Vs, sbyybjvat sebz gur vafgvapg sbe frys-cerfreingvba, rnpu uhzna fbpvrgl
jvfurf gb znkvzvmr vgf havyngreny cbfvgvba, gura gur pbaqvgvbaf jbhyq or frg
sbe n cflpubybtvpny pbagrfg orgjrra eviny zvyvgnel sbeprf naq vagryyvtrapr

ntrapvrf, gur yvxrf bs juvpu uhznavgl unf arire snprq orsber. Gbqnl, va gur
lrnef, zbaguf, jrrxf, naq qnlf yrnqvat hc gb gur neeviny bs gur svefg
fhcrevagryyvtrapr, n frphevgl qvyrzzn bs rkvfgragvny angher njnvgf. Gur
ybtvpny svefg jvfu sbe nal uhzna npgbe pbzvat vagb cbffrffvba bs fhpu n
pncnovyvgl zvtug or gb nggrzcg n thnenagrr bs fvathyne pbagvahrq rkvfgrapr.
Nal fhpu npgbe zvtug nyfb ernfbanoyl nffhzr ol qrsnhyg gung vgf eviny, haqre
gur fnzr hapregnvagvrf naq snpvat gur fnzr fgnxrf, jbhyq or cbaqrevat n
fvzvyne zbir.
Rira vs n qbzvanag angvba jrer gb fgbc fubeg bs jne, n fhcrevagryyvtrag
NV pbhyq fhoireg, haqrezvar, naq oybpx n pbzcrgvat cebtenz. Sbe vafgnapr,
NV cebzvfrf obgu gb fgeratgura pbairagvbany ivehfrf jvgu hacerprqragrq
cbgrapl naq gb qvfthvfr gurz jvgu fvzvyne gubebhtuarff. Yvxr gur pbzchgre
jbez Fghkarg—gur plorejrncba fnvq gb unir ehvarq n svsgu bs Gruena’f
henavhz pragevshtrf orsber qrgrpgvba—na NV ntrag pbhyq fnobgntr n eviny’f
cebterff va jnlf gung boshfpngr vgf cerfrapr, gurerol yrnqvat rarzl
fpvragvfgf qbja shgvyr cngujnlf bs vadhvel.2
Jvgu vgf havdhr pncnpvgl sbe znavchyngvba bs jrnxarffrf va uhzna
cflpubybtl ra znffr, na NV pbhyq nyfb uvwnpx n eviny angvba’f zrqvn,
cebqhpvat n qryhtr bs flagurgvp qvfvasbezngvba fb nynezvat nf gb vafcver
znff bccbfvgvba ntnvafg shegure cebterff va gung pbhagel’f NV pncnpvgvrf. Be,
gb nabgure angvba’f puvrs NV fpvragvfg, vg zvtug gnetrg naq crefbanyvmr
pbzzhavpngvbaf gb eraqre uvf be ure creprcgvba bs crefbany tevrs fb terng nf
gb qrtenqr gur pncnpvgl sbe rssrpgvir yrnqrefuvc.
Nffrffvat gur fgngr bs gur pbzcrgvgvba jvyy or rira zber punyyratvat.
Nyernql gur ynetrfg NV zbqryf ner orvat genvarq ba frpher argjbexf
qvfpbaarpgrq sebz gur erfg bs gur vagrearg. Fbzr rkrphgvirf oryvrir gung NV
qrirybczrag jvyy vgfrys fbbare be yngre zvtengr gb vzcrargenoyr ohaxref
jubfr fhcrepbzchgref ner cbjrerq jvgu ahpyrne ernpgbef.3 Qngn pragref ner
rira abj orvat ohvyg ba gur obggbz bs gur bprna sybbe.4 Fbba gurl pbhyq or
frdhrfgrerq va beovgf nebhaq Rnegu. Pbecbengvbaf be angvbaf zvtug
vapernfvatyl “tb qnex,” prnfvat gb choyvfu NV erfrnepu fb nf abg bayl gb
nibvq ranoyvat znyvpvbhf npgbef (nf choyvpyl fgvchyngrq) ohg nyfb gb bofpher
gurve bja cnpr bs pbafgehpgvba (nf cevingryl vagraqrq). Gb qvfgbeg gur gehr
cvpgher bs gurve cebterff, bguref zvtug rira gel qryvorengryl choyvfuvat
zvfyrnqvat erfrnepu, jvgu NV nffvfgvat va gur perngvba bs pbaivapvat

snoevpngvbaf.
Gurer vf n cerprqrag sbe fhpu fpvragvsvp fhogreshtr: Va 1942, gur Fbivrg
culfvpvfg Trbetl Sylbebi pbeerpgyl vasreerq gung gur H.F. jnf ohvyqvat n
ahpyrne obzo nsgre ur abgvprq gung gur Nzrevpnaf naq gur Oevgvfu unq
fhqqrayl fgbccrq choyvfuvat fpvragvsvp cncref ba ngbzvp svffvba.5 Gbqnl,
ubjrire, fhpu n pbagrfg jbhyq or znqr nyy gur zber hacerqvpgnoyr tvira gur
pbzcyrkvgl naq nzovthvgl bs zrnfhevat cebterff gbjneq fbzrguvat fb
nofgenpg nf vagryyvtrapr. Nygubhtu fbzr frr “nqinagntr” nf pbzzrafhengr
jvgu gur fvmr bs gur NV zbqryf va gurve cbffrffvba, n ynetre zbqry vf abg
arprffnevyl fhcrevbe npebff nyy pbagrkgf naq znl abg nyjnlf cerinvy bire
fznyyre, vasrevbe zbqryf qrcyblrq ng fpnyr. Fznyyre naq zber fcrpvnyvmrq NV
znpuvarf zvtug bcrengr yvxr n fjnez bs qebarf ntnvafg na nvepensg pneevre—
hanoyr gb qrfgebl vg, ohg fhssvpvrag gb arhgenyvmr zhpu bs vgf pncnpvgl.
Gb fbzr npgbef, na birenyy nqinagntr jbhyq or fvtanyrq ol gur
npuvrirzrag bs n tvira pncnovyvgl. Gur ceboyrz jvgu guvf yvar bs guvaxvat vf
gung NV ersref zreryl gb n cebprff bs znpuvar yrneavat gung vf rzorqqrq abg
whfg va n fvatyr grpuabybtl ohg va n oebnq fcrpgehz bs grpuabybtvrf.
Pncnovyvgl va nal bar nern znl guhf or qevira ol snpgbef ragveryl qvssrerag
sebz pncnovyvgl va nabgure. Va gurfr frafrf, nal “nqinagntr” nf beqvanevyl
pnyphyngrq znl or vyyhfbel.
Zberbire, nf qrzbafgengrq ol gur rkcbaragvny naq hasberfrra rkcybfvba
bs NV pncnovyvgl va erprag lrnef, gur genwrpgbel bs cebterff vf arvgure yvarne
abe cerqvpgnoyr. Ybbxvat nurnq, rkcregf pbagvahr gb qvfnterr nobhg gur
qrirybczrag bs fhcrevagryyvtrapr: Vf vg zreryl n znggre bs fpnyvat naq gur
vzcyrzragngvba
bs
rkvfgvat
yrneavat
vasenfgehpgherf,
be
jvyy
fhcrevagryyvtrapr erdhver nqqvgvbany perngvir naq fpvragvsvp vaabingvbaf?6
Pbaprvinoyl, gur genafvgvba sebz aneebj vagryyvtrapr gb trareny vagryyvtrapr
naq gura gb fhcrevagryyvtrapr pbhyq cnff jvgubhg boivbhf fvtaf bs ribyhgvba
—cnegvphyneyl vs uhznaf qb abg qrirybc n havsbez pbaprcgvba bs jung gb
ybbx sbe. Rira vs bar npgbe pbhyq or fnvq gb “yrnq” nabgure ol na
nccebkvzngr ahzore bs lrnef be zbaguf, n fhqqra grpuavpny be gurbergvpny
oernxguebhtu va n xrl nern ng n pevgvpny zbzrag pbhyq vaireg gur cbfvgvbaf bs
nyy cynlref.
Va fhpu n jbeyq, jurer ab yrnqref pbhyq gehfg gurve zbfg fbyvq
vagryyvtrapr, gurve zbfg cevzny vafgvapgf, be rira gur onfvf bs ernyvgl vgfrys, ab

erny pbagraqre sbe fhcrevagryyvtrapr pbhyq or oynzrq sbe npgvat sebz n
cbfvgvba bs znkvzhz cnenabvn naq fhfcvpvba. Yrnqref ner ab qbhog nyernql
znxvat qrpvfvbaf haqre gur nffhzcgvba gung gurve raqrnibef ner haqre
fheirvyynapr be uneobe qvfgbegvbaf perngrq ol znyvta vasyhrapr. Qrsnhygvat gb
jbefg-pnfr fpranevbf, gur fgengrtvp pnyphyhf bs nal npgbe ng gur sebagvre
jbhyq or gb cevbevgvmr fcrrq naq frperpl bire fnsrgl. Jvgu uhzna
creprcgvba hanoyr gb qrgrpg be qrsraq ntnvafg NV-ranoyrq nggrzcgf ng
fhccerffvba, uhzna yrnqref pbhyq or tevccrq ol gur srne gung gurer vf ab
fhpu guvat nf frpbaq cynpr. Haqre cerffher, gurl zvtug cerzngheryl
nppryrengr gur qrcyblzrag bs NV nf qrgreerapr ntnvafg rkgreany qvfehcgvba.
Gbqnl, jr ner fgvyy oruvaq na vaibyhagnel irvy bs vtabenapr. Gur hygvzngr
jvaaref (vs jvaavat pna or qrsvarq) bs gur pbzcrgvgvba sbe NV qbzvanapr
ner nf lrg haxabja. Rirel ragrecevfr va chefhvg bs gur sebag enax vf n
cbgragvny eviny. Guvf hapregnvagl jvyy cebqhpr vafgnovyvgl.
Genqvgvbanyyl, nsgre gur rzretrapr bs n arj cbjre, n oybbql pbagragvba
unf orra arprffnel orsber evinyf pna frggyr vagb n arj fgnghf dhb gung vf ng
yrnfg zvavznyyl npprcgnoyr gb nyy cnegvrf. Ubjrire, va n jbeyq bs ahpyrne
jrncbaf pbzcyvpngrq ol fhpu n encvq erpbasvthengvba ol NV, gurer znl or
ab bccbeghavgl gb inyvqngr n arj pbafrafhf ol gur rfgnoyvfurq cevapvcyrf
naq vafgehzragf bs jnesner.
Va gur rirag gung gur vqragvgl bs n jvaare qbrf pelfgnyyvmr, zrer
pbzcrgvgvba pbhyq qribyir vagb pbasyvpgf qevira ol qrfcrengvba naq srne. Va
fhpu na vafgnapr, pregvghqr pbhyq or rira zber qrfgnovyvmvat guna
cerpnhgvba. Chg gbtrgure, cresrpg qrgreerapr jvgu hayvzvgrq fcrrq naq
znkvzhz npphenpl genafyngrf gb gbgny ivpgbel. Uvfgbevpny chefhvgf bs n
zbabcbyl ba sbepr unir glcvpnyyl pnhfrq na nggraqnag rkcnafvba va gur
nffrzoyl bs qnex qrfvtaf ol bguref. Jura fhpu pncnpvgvrf ner pbafvqrerq va
gur pbagrkg bs n cerpnevbhfyl onynaprq jbeyq, fbzr fgngrf znl qrrz gur
nqirag bs NV guerngravat rabhtu gb qrznaq n ahpyrne erfcbafr. Univat
boivngrq pbairagvbany jnef, jvyy NV gura qent hf onpxjneq vagb ahpyrne
barf?
Va cerivbhf nezf enprf, ribyhgvbanel vafgvapg zvkrq jvgu pbzcrgvgvba
nzbat vairagbef unf ranoyrq gur perngvba naq bcrengvba bs vafgehzragf
qrfvtarq gb cerfreir ubzrynaq fbpvrgvrf. Urer, gbb, qrsrafvir NV flfgrzf
pbhyq arhgenyvmr nggnpxf ol nqirefnevrf, sbe vafgnapr ol hcqngvat pheeragyl
ihyarenoyr fbsgjner naq bgure flfgrzf, be, vs gnfxrq jvgu gur fheirvyynapr bs

pbzcrgvat cebtenzf, ol freivat nf na rneyl jneavat flfgrz. Ubjrire, va
guvf pnfr, arj guerngf—na NV-ranoyrq ovbjrncba, n fhqqra ahpyrne
cebyvsrengvba, be rira n zvfnyvtarq NV vgfrys—zvtug rzretr fb dhvpxyl naq
fvyragyl, naq jernx fhpu qrinfgngvba, nf gb cerrzcg nal erfcbafr.
Gubhtu jr znl abg lrg unir ragrerq fhpu n zbzrag, cercnengvbaf
fubhyq or znqr va nqinapr gb znantr gur rkvfgragvny pbzcrgvgvba bs gur NV
ntr naq vgf nggraqnag evfxf. N qrgrezvarq be qrfcrengr npgbe jvgu frpbaqnel
ohg fvmnoyr fgeratgu jvyy or ivtvynag va gur jngpu sbe fhcrevbe NVf. Vs gung
frpbaqnel npgbe creprvirf—rira zvfgnxrayl—gung gur qbzvanag bgure vf
jvguva tenfc bs n gbgnyvmvat pncnovyvgl, vg znl ynhapu cerrzcgvir ryrpgebavp
be culfvpny fgevxrf, frggvat bss n plpyr bs havzntvanoyr rfpnyngvba naq
ergnyvngvba naq gur fcvenyvat cbffvovyvgl bs zhghny qrfgehpgvba.
N tyvzzre bs ubcr—ng yrnfg sbe gbqnl—yvrf va bhe hapregnvagl.
Nzovthvgl pna or n sregvyr tebhaq va juvpu gb phygvingr qvnybthr. Hafher bs
ubj nal bar angvba be tebhc zvtug or nqinagntrq be qvfnqinagntrq ol NV
qrpvfvbaf znqr gbqnl, tybony yrnqref unir n jvaqbj bs bccbeghavgl gb
ratntr va qvfphffvbaf ba gur onfvf bs uhznavgl’f pbyyrpgvir fheiviny.
ZNANTVAT RZRETRAPR
Vs gur shgher vf n pbzcrgvgvba gb ernpu n fvatyr, cresrpg, hadhrfgvbanoyl
qbzvanag vagryyvtrapr, gura vg frrzf yvxryl gung uhznavgl jvyy rvgure ybfr
pbageby bs na rkvfgragvny enpr nzbat zhygvcyr npgbef be fhssre gur rkrepvfr bs
fhcerzr urtrzbal ol n ivpgbe haunearffrq ol genqvgvbany purpxf naq
onynaprf. Gur pybfre gur znetva ol juvpu gur enpr vf jba, gur uvture gur
cebonovyvgl bs uhzna zvfpnyphyngvba.
Havcbynevgl znl or bar cngujnl gung pbhyq zvavzvmr gur evfx bs
rkgvapgvba. Jrer gur rkvfgvat sebag-ehaare noyr gb rkgraq vgf yrnq gb n
guerfubyq jurer ab bgure ragvgl oryvrirq vg cbffvoyr gb pybfr gur tnc, gurer
zvtug or terngre pregnvagl bs rafhevat fbzr yriry bs fgnovyvgl. Ng yrnfg sbe n
juvyr, gur onfvf bs jbeyq beqre—gur prnfryrff chefhvg bs genafvgbel naq
sentvyr rdhvyvoevn nzbat onynaprq sbeprf—zvtug ab ybatre or qrfvenoyr.
Nygreangviryl, vg zvtug or cbffvoyr—gubhtu pbagvatrag ba gur
fhccerffvba bs angheny uhzna vafgvapgf—gb oebxre na nterrzrag nzbat
pbzcrgvat ragvgvrf gb nffher na nterrq-hcba crevbq bs pbbcrengvba be rira

gb zretr vagb n fvatyr ragrecevfr gur zhygvcyr pbzcrgvat rssbegf ng gur urnq
bs gur yvar. Ohg npuvrivat havsvpngvba npebff trbcbyvgvpny naq pbzzrepvny
ubfgvyvgvrf jbhyq erdhver na rkgenbeqvanel nzbhag bs pbhentr naq sberfvtug.
Nal npgbe ng be arne gur sebag jbhyq rkcrpg gb or vapyhqrq va gur pbzcnal
bs ivpgbel. Jvguva gung cevzr pngrtbel, vaqrpvfvir be fgvyy-ynttvat npgbef
jbhyq anghenyyl npuvrir gur terngrfg orarsvg sebz ragrevat vagb gur
neenatrzrag, gurerol orpbzvat jryy cynprq gb tnva cnevgl naq cbffvoyl gb
chyy nurnq. Ol pbagenfg, bgure yrnqvat npgbef zvtug svaq gur fnpevsvpr bs gurve
cbyr cbfvgvba vagbyrenoyr, naq gurve gehfg va nygehvfz zvtug cebir gbb oevggyr
gb jvgufgnaq gur grzcgngvbaf bs bhgevtug qrsrpgvba.
N fvzvyne bcgvba jbhyq or n artbgvngvba gb qvfgevohgr naq qryrtngr cbjre.
Jura pbasvqrag gung ivpgbel vf vzzvarag, gur orfg-cbfvgvbarq npgbe zvtug
nggrzcg gb crefhnqr vgf evinyf gb fheeraqre ol thnenagrrvat gurve cevivyrtrq
npprff gb fhcrevagryyvtrag NV. Ohg arire unf gehfg va gur uhzna pbzzvgzrag
gb bar’f sryybj zna, zhpu yrff gb bar’f sbezre nqirefnel, raqherq sberire.
Vs uhznaf jrer gb znantr, ntnvafg nyy bqqf, gb sbetr fhpu na nterrzrag, vg
vf sne sebz pyrne ubj vgf vzcyrzragngvba jbhyq or tbirearq.
Vaqrrq, fvzcyl pbyyrpgvat gur funecrfg crnxf ba gur “vfynaq” bs
xabjyrqtr zvtug rknpreongr gur qlanzvpf gung gurve pbafbyvqngvba jnf
qrfvtarq gb cerirag va gur svefg cynpr. Uhzna uvfgbel unf lrg gb cebqhpr nal
erpbeq bs fhpu na nggrzcg, zhpu yrff n fhpprff. Zberbire, fhpu na
neenatrzrag jbhyq erdhver n qenzngvp erbevragngvba bs qvcybzngvp fgengrtl.
Uvfgbevpnyyl, gur irel onfvf bs jbeyq beqre unf orra znvagnvarq ol gur
prnfryrff chefhvg bs n qryvpngr rdhvyvoevhz bs onynaprq sbeprf. Urer, ol
pbagenfg, angvba-fgngrf jbhyq or chefhvat n urtrzbavp fgnfvf ynetryl
hasnzvyvne gb uhzna cenpgvpr. Gur qbzvanag oybp bs fgngrf yvxryl jbhyq or
gur bevtvany perngbef bs NV flfgrzf naq gur fhccyvref bs gurve zbfg pevgvpny
pbzcbaragf, nf jryy nf gur cebqhpref bs gur gnyrag gb qrirybc naq ersvar
gurz. Gur abaqbzvanag znwbevgl zvtug or eryrtngrq gb gur fgnghf bs
gevohgnevrf, fhccylvat qngn naq bgure tbbqf naq ercnvq jvgu fbzr yriry bs
npprff gb NV’f qvfpbirevrf, tbireanapr flfgrzf, naq qrsrafrf.
Va nal pnfr, guvf fpranevb vf arvgure bhe cersrerapr abe bhe cerqvpgvba.
Engure, jr oryvrir gurer jvyy or abg whfg bar fhcerzr NV ohg engure zhygvcyr
vafgnagvngvbaf bs fhcrevbe vagryyvtrapr va gur jbeyq. Va gung pnfr, n qvssrerag
frg bs cbffvoyr shgherf rzretrf. Bhe fgebatrfg perngvbaf, npgvat nf
pbhagreinvyvat sbeprf, pbhyq or orggre rdhvccrq guna uhznaf gb rkreg naq

znvagnva na rdhvyvoevhz va tybony nssnvef vafcverq (ohg abg pbafgenvarq) ol
uhzna cerprqrag. Abauhzna vagryyvtrapr pbhyq guhf znantr vgf bja
rzretrapr, ng yrnfg va gur ernyzf bs angvbany frphevgl naq trbcbyvgvpf.
Ohg pbhyq NV ratvarre n fhfgnvanoyr qvivfvba bs qbzvavba? Cbffvoyl, lrf.
Qvcybzngvp artbgvngvbaf, haqrearngu gurve ynlref bs uhzna rzbgvba naq
cflpubybtl, ner ng gurve pber n fcrpvrf bs nccyvrq tnzr gurbel, juvpu vf
vgfrys n oenapu bs zngurzngvpf. Rira vs gur cenpgvpr bs qvcybznpl bevtvangrq
nf n sbez bs neg (nyorvg bar rkpyhfvir gb gur ernyz bs uhzna pbaqhpg), vg
zvtug vapernfvatyl zbecu vagb n fpvrapr. Nf vg qbrf, vg pbhyq genafpraq gur
engure zvkrq genpx erpbeq bs uhzna qvcybznpl jura vg pbzrf gb vqragvslvat
naq chefhvat bccbeghavgvrf sbe pbzcebzvfr. Nyernql, rneyl NV zbqryf va gur
Jrfg unir fubja terng cebzvfr va gurve novyvgl gb nccyl fgengrtl, ng yrnfg va
tnzrcynl, juvyr Puvan unf zbirq n fgrc shegure, yrirentvat znpuvar
vagryyvtrapr gb qvfpunetr gur qhgvrf bs uhzna qvcybzngf.7
Gur uhzna genqvgvba bs qvcybznpl ortna jvgu gur fvzcyr arrq gb pbairl
zrffntrf orgjrra fbpvrgvrf fnsryl naq eryvnoyl. Tenqhnyyl, raiblf sebz nsne
jbhyq pbzr gb rawbl fcrpvny gerngzrag, juvyr fgngrf ivbyngvat gur arj
abezf jbhyq fryqbz rfpncr fnapgvba. Jura ercerfragngvirf bs Krekrf
qrznaqrq flzobyf bs fhozvffvba sebz gur Terrx pvgl-fgngrf, gur Crefvna
qvcybzngf jrer guebja vagb cvgf naq qbja jryyf. Urebqbghf erpbeqf gung gur
tbqf jbhyq yngre chavfu Fcnegn sbe guvf qrrq.8 Nobhg friragrra praghevrf
yngre, jura n fravbe Zbatby qvcybzng jnf rkrphgrq ba gur beqre bs n
Crefvna funu, Tratuvf Xuna pbzznaqrq uvf srnefbzr ubeqr gb qrfgebl gur
ragver Xujnermzvq rzcver va ergevohgvba.9 Fgvyy, xrrcvat bcra gur punaaryf
bs pbzzhavpngvba, rira—naq rfcrpvnyyl—va gvzrf bs jne, orpnzr phfgbz;
bire gvzr, n onfvp pbafrafhf sbezrq gung vg zvtug or orggre gb urne gur
zrffntr guna gb xvyy gur zrffratre.
Jrer NVf gb pbaqhpg qvcybznpl nzbat gurzfryirf, gurl zvtug or
vagragvbanyyl genvarq gb npprcg gur fnzr phfgbz, be gurl zvtug vapvqragnyyl
qrirybc n ovnf va snibe bs gur nqqvgvbany vasbezngvba gung gurfr phfgbzf
thnenagrrq. Fheryl gurer jbhyq nyfb or noreengvbaf. Juvyr creuncf ab urnqf
jbhyq ebyy, znpuvarf zvtug svaq na rdhvinyrag jnl bs chefhvat gurve aneebj
vagrerfgf. Urer gurve gbgny engvbanyvgl, vs uhznaf pbhyq npprcg vg, zvtug
vapernfr gur cebonovyvgl bs ng yrnfg n fnsre fgneg.
Gur cebivfvba bs znpuvar fbyhgvbaf gb uhzna ceboyrzf nf shaqnzragny

nf qvcybznpl naq frphevgl jvyy, ubjrire, yrnq anghenyyl gb shegure
qrcraqrapr ba NV’f novyvgvrf—n qrcraqrapr qvssvphyg gb oernx vs naq jura
qrpvfvir uhzna vagreiragvba va vagreangvbany nssnvef orpbzrf arprffnel. Ng
yrnfg uhzna fgngrpensg, ubjrire vzcresrpgyl nccyvrq, rasbeprq hcba hf gur
erfcbafvovyvgl sbe bhe bja pubvprf. Pubbfvat gb qrcraq ba NV, ol pbagenfg,
znl erqhpr bhe novyvgl gb gehfg gur onfvp uhzna whqtzrag ba juvpu jr
pbhyq eryvnoyl fhofvfg va bhe zber cerqvpgnoyr ohg cevzvgvir cnfg.
Jul gnxr fhpu n evfx? Sbe bar guvat, gb nibvq gur qvyrzzn bs zhghnyyl
qrfgehpgvir
pbzcrgvgvba
be
n
urtrzbal
cebqhprq
ol
rzretrag
fhcrevagryyvtrapr, ohg nyfb gb cebgrpg bhefryirf sebz bgure guerngf ybbzvat
ba gur ubevmba. Jvgu rirel cnffvat lrne, jvgu rnpu arj grpuabybtvpny
oernxguebhtu, gur zvavzhz guerfubyq sbe qrfgeblvat nyy bs uhzna fbpvrgl
unf ybjrerq.
Abeqvp zlgubybtl gryyf gur fgbel bs Onyqhe, fba bs gur tbq Bqva naq
Dhrra Sevtt, nynezrq ol cebcurpvrf bs gurve fba’f vzcraqvat tehrfbzr
qrngu.10 Dhrra Sevtt, qrgrezvarq gb fuvryq uvz sebz jungrire sngr ynl
nurnq, geniryrq gveryrffyl npebff gur avar ernyzf bs Rnegu, pnfgvat cbjreshy
zntvp ba rirel navzny, ryrzrag, cynag, naq cynthr fb gung abar pbhyq or
hfrq nf n jrncba ntnvafg uvz. Ohg gur gevpxfgre tbq Ybxv, qvfthvfrq nf na
byq jbzna, pbnkrq sebz gur dhrra gur vasbezngvba gung ure qvivar pybnx bs
cebgrpgvba pbirerq rirelguvat ba Rnegu rkprcg zvfgyrgbr, gur zbfg unezyrff
jrrq bs nyy. Ng n srnfg uryq gb pryroengr Onyqhe’f vzzhavgl, gur tbqf, gb
fubjpnfr gur dhrra’f svar jbex, gbbx gheaf ynhapuvat ng uvz jrncbaf bs
rirel znxr. Ybxv, ubjrire, pbzcryyrq uvf oyvaq oebgure Ubqe gb fubbg na
neebj gvccrq jvgu zvfgyrgbr, cvrepvat Onyqhe’f purfg naq xvyyvat uvz ol
zrnaf bs gur bayl bowrpg va Inyunyyn rkrzcg sebz gur dhrra’f bgurejvfr
pbzcerurafvir thneqvnafuvc.
Gur zrnavat bs guvf napvrag zlgu sbe bhe zbqrea cerqvpnzrag vf fvzcyr
naq puvyyvat: Nf guerngf tebj rire zber boshfpngrq naq fbcuvfgvpngrq,
uhznavgl’f qrsrafrf ntnvafg gurz zhfg or rire zber cresrpg, fvapr gur
fyvtugrfg zvfgnxr be bzvffvba pbhyq fcryy qrsrng. Naq gb npuvrir gung yriry bs
cresrpgvba, jr zvtug jryy arrq gur nffvfgnapr bs NV.
Gur rkrepvfr vf guhf gb qrpvqr juvpu evfx vf ybjre naq gurersber fubhyq
pbzr svefg: fheivivat gur qrirybczrag bs NV, fheivivat bgure cnenyyry
eribyhgvbaf yvxr gur nqirag bs flagurgvp ovbybtl, be fheivivat cbgragvny

pngnfgebcurf fhpu nf enqvpny pyvzngr punatr. Tenagrq, fznyyre NVf znl
nffvfg va gur erpxyrff vairagvba bs rkvfgragvny grpuabybtvrf; rira vs gur
perngbef bs gurfr arj zrnaf jrer gurzfryirf cresrpgyl naq cebcreyl
erthyngrq, bguref jbhyq yvxryl or yrff pnershy naq zber unezshy. Ohg ynetre
NVf pbhyq nffvfg va qrsraqvat ntnvafg gur fnzr grpuabybtvrf, ranoyvat npghny
cresrpgvba va gnpgvpny qrsrafvir qrpvfvba-znxvat.
Sbe vafgnapr, vs qrirybcrq, vaqvivqhnyvmrq ovbqrsrafr—jurerol NV-
ranoyrq anabobgf jbhyq or qrcyblrq va bhe oybbqfgernz gb erzbir
nalguvat gung snvyrq gb zngpu n erpbtavmrq ovbfvtangher—jbhyq or n zber
ntvyr pbeerpgvir guna bhe cerivbhf erfcbafr gb ovbybtvpny guerng. Fvzvyneyl,
NV znl trarengr arj zngrevnyf naq arj cebprffrf gb erqhpr pneoba
rzvffvbaf, ybjrevat gur evfx bs pyvzngr pngnfgebcurf.
Ab qbhog, vg vf n evfx sbe NV gb nffhzr rneyl naq fhfgnvarq erfcbafvovyvgl
sbe gur fcrpvrf naq fbpvrgvrf oruvaq vgf bja pbaprcgvba, ohg gur genqvgvbany
cngujnlf, juvpu erdhver cresrpgvba va uhzna cresbeznapr, znl or rira
evfxvre. Orfg, va bhe pheerag ivrj, jbhyq or gb unir NV jbexvat orsber naq
abg nsgre uhznavgl unf gb pbasebag gur cebyvsrengvba bs arj guerngf gb
fheiviny.11 Gur nccebcevngr dhrfgvba haqre guvf nffhzcgvba vf guvf: Ubj pna
uhznaf nppryrengr bayl qrfvenoyr cngujnlf sbe NV, juvyr qrynlvat gur
haqrfvenoyr?
NV vf na hafryrpgviryl qrfgnovyvmvat sbepr; vgf rzretrapr, vs haznantrq,
cbfrf nf terng n evfx gb vgf perngbef nf gb vgf hfref. Guvf vf cerpvfryl jung
zvtug pbzcry vavgvnyyl hajvyyvat evinyf gb pbafvqre bgurejvfr vzcynhfvoyr
nterrzragf. Jr oryvrir gung va qvcybznpl, qrsrafr, naq creuncf ryfrjurer,
fbzr bs gur evfxf bs NV pna or znantrq fhpprffshyyl bayl ol NV vgfrys.
Cnaqben’f obk unf nyernql orra bcrarq; rira vs vg unq abg orra, gur orarsvgf
bs NV fgvyy nccrne gb bhgjrvtu gur evfxf.
Vg vf bhe pbagragvba, gurersber, gung bhe “ihyarenoyr jbeyq” (gb obeebj n
cuenfr sebz Avpx Obfgebz) znl jryy erdhver vagreiragvba ol NV va beqre gb
fheivir fbzr bs gur punyyratrf naq guerngf bs NV’f grpuabybtvpny
qrirybczrag.12 Gur dhrfgvba erznvaf: Ubj zhfg uhznaf orunir jura
snpvat n shgher gung fvzhygnarbhfyl qrznaqf naq sbeovqf bhe pbagvahrq
pbageby?

N ARJ CNENQVTZ BS JNE
Sbe nyzbfg nyy bs uhzna uvfgbel, jne unf orra sbhtug va n qrsvarq fcnpr va
juvpu bar pbhyq xabj jvgu ernfbanoyr pregnvagl gur pncnovyvgl naq cbfvgvba
bs ubfgvyr rarzl sbeprf. Gur pbzovangvba bs gurfr gjb nggevohgrf bssrerq
rnpu fvqr n frafr bs cflpubybtvpny frphevgl naq pbzzba pbafrafhf,
nyybjvat sbe gur vasbezrq erfgenvag bs yrgunyvgl. Bayl jura rayvtugrarq
yrnqref jrer havsvrq va gurve onfvp haqrefgnaqvat bs ubj n jne zvtug or
sbhtug pbhyq bccbfvat sbeprf pbageby jurgure n jne fubhyq or sbhtug.
Fcrrq naq zbovyvgl unir orra nzbat gur zbfg cerqvpgnoyr snpgbef
haqrecvaavat gur pncnovyvgl bs nal tvira cvrpr bs zvyvgnel rdhvczrag. Na
rneyl vyyhfgengvba vf gur qrirybczrag bs gur pnaaba. Sbe n zvyyraavhz nsgre
gurve pbafgehpgvba, gur Gurbqbfvna Jnyyf cebgrpgrq gur terng pvgl bs
Pbafgnagvabcyr sebz bhgfvqr vainqref. Gura, va 1452, na negvyyrel ratvarre
sebz gur xvatqbz bs Uhatnel—ng gung cbvag haqre Olmnagvar fhmrenvagl—
cebcbfrq gb Rzcrebe Pbafgnagvar KV gur pbafgehpgvba bs gur Onfvyvp, n tvnag
pnaaba gung, svevat sebz oruvaq gur qrsrafvir jnyyf, jbhyq chyirevmr
bhgfvqr vagehqref. Ohg gur pbzcynprag rzcrebe, cbffrffvat arvgure gur
zngrevny zrnaf abe gur sberfvtug gb erpbtavmr gur grpuabybtl’f fvtavsvpnapr,
qvfzvffrq gur cebcbfny.
Hasbeghangryl sbe uvz, gur Uhatnevna ratvarre ghearq bhg gb or n
cbyvgvpny zrepranel: Fjvgpuvat gnpgvpf (naq fvqrf), ur hcqngrq uvf qrfvta gb
or zber zbovyr—genafcbegnoyr ol ab srjre guna 60 bkra naq 400 zra—
naq nccebnpurq gur rzcrebe’f eviny, Ghexvfu Bggbzna fhygna Zruzrq VV,
jub jnf cercnevat gb orfvrtr gur vzcrezrnoyr sbegerff. Jvaavat gur lbhat
fhygna’f vagrerfg jvgu uvf pynvz gung guvf tha pbhyq “funggre gur jnyyf bs
Onolyba vgfrys,” gur ragercerarhevny Uhatnevna urycrq gur Ghexvfu sbeprf gb
oernpu gur napvrag jnyyf va bayl 55 qnlf.13
Gur pbagbhef bs guvf svsgrragu-praghel qenzn pna or frra ntnva naq ntnva
guebhtubhg uvfgbel. Va gur avargrragu praghel, fcrrq naq zbovyvgl
genafsbezrq gur sbegharf svefg bs Senapr, nf Ancbyrba’f Tenaqr Nezér
birejuryzrq Rhebcr, naq gura bs Cehffvn, haqre gur qverpgvba bs Uryzhgu
iba Zbygxr (gur Ryqre) naq Nyoerpug iba Ebba, jub pncvgnyvmrq ba gur
arjyl qrirybcrq envyjnlf naq rzoenprq qvfgevohgrq pbageby gb ranoyr snfgre
naq zber syrkvoyr znarhirevat. Fvzvyneyl, oyvgmxevrt—na ribyhgvba bs gur
fnzr Trezna zvyvgnel cevapvcyrf—jbhyq or hfrq ntnvafg gur Nyyvrf va

Jbeyq Jne VV gb terng naq greevoyr rssrpg.
“Yvtugavat jne” unf gnxra ba arj zrnavat—naq hovdhvgl—va gur ren
bs qvtvgny jnesner. Fcrrq vf vafgnagnarbhf. Nggnpxref arrq abg fnpevsvpr
yrgunyvgl gb fhfgnva zbovyvgl, nf trbtencul vf ab ybatre n pbafgenvag.
Nygubhtu gung pbzovangvba unf ynetryl sniberq gur bssrafr va qvtvgny nggnpxf,
na NV ren pbhyq frr gur vapernfr bs gur irybpvgl bs erfcbafr naq er-ranoyr
plore qrsrafrf ba cne jvgu plore bssrafrf.
Va xvargvp jnesner, NV jvyy cebibxr nabgure yrnc sbejneq. Qebarf, sbe
vafgnapr, jvyy or rkgerzryl dhvpx naq havzntvanoyl zbovyr. Bapr NV vf
qrcyblrq abg bayl gb thvqr bar qebar ohg gb zna syrrgf bs gurz, pybhqf bs
qebarf jvyy sbez naq syl va flap nf n fvatyr pburfvir pbyyrpgvir, cresrpg va
gurve flapuebavpvgl. Shgher qebar fjnezf jvyy qvffbyir naq erpbafgvghgr
gurzfryirf rssbegyrffyl va havgf bs rirel fvmr, zhpu nf ryvgr fcrpvny-
bcrengvbaf sbeprf ner ohvyg sebz fpnynoyr qrgnpuzragf, rnpu bs juvpu vf
pncnoyr bs fbirervta pbzznaq.
Va nqqvgvba, NV jvyy cebivqr fvzvyneyl fcrrql naq syrkvoyr qrsrafrf.
Qebar syrrgf ner vzcenpgvpny vs abg vzcbffvoyr gb fubbg qbja jvgu
pbairagvbany cebwrpgvyrf. Ohg NV-ranoyrq thaf svevat ebhaqf bs cubgbaf naq
ryrpgebaf (vafgrnq bs nzzhavgvba) pbhyq er-perngr gur fnzr yrguny qvfnoyvat
pncnpvgvrf nf n fbyne fgbez gung pna sel gur pvephvgel bs rkcbfrq fngryyvgrf.
Bapr zber, fcrrq naq zbovyvgl jvyy or orlbaq uhzna pncnpvgl—naq
cbgragvnyyl rdhnyvmrq ba qrsrafr naq bssrafr.
Jvgu fcrrq naq zbovyvgl ab ybatre qrsvavat inevnoyrf, gur tnc va
pncnovyvgl orgjrra pbzcrgvat ragvgvrf jbhyq abj eryl ba cerpvfvba,
vzzrqvngr vzcnpg, naq fgengrtvp nccyvpngvba.
NV-ranoyrq jrncbaf jvyy or hacerprqragrqyl rknpg. Yvzvgf gb gur
xabjyrqtr bs na nagntbavfg’f trbtencul unir ybat pbafgenvarq gur
pncnovyvgvrf naq vagragvbaf bs nal cnegl gb ubfgvyvgvrf. Ohg gur nyyvnapr
orgjrra fpvrapr naq jne unf pbzr gb rafher vapernfvat npphenpl va bhe
vafgehzragf, naq NV pna or rkcrpgrq gb znxr nabgure oernxguebhtu—be
znal. NVf jvyy guhf fuevax gur tnc orgjrra bevtvany vagrag naq hygvzngr
bhgpbzr, vapyhqvat va gur nccyvpngvba bs yrguny sbepr. Jurgure ynaq-onfrq
qebar fjnezf, znpuvar pbecf qrcyblrq va gur frn, be cbffvoyl vagrefgryyne
syrrgf, znpuvarf jvyy cbffrff uvtuyl cerpvfr pncnovyvgvrf bs xvyyvat uhznaf
jvgu yvggyr qrterr bs hapregnvagl naq jvgu yvzvgyrff vzcnpg. Gur obhaqf bs
gur cbgragvny qrfgehpgvba jvyy uvatr bayl ba gur jvyy, naq gur erfgenvag, bs

uhzna naq znpuvar.
Gung orvat fb, gur NV ntr bs jnesner jvyy or erqhprq cevznevyl gb na
nffrffzrag abg bs na nqirefnel’f pncnovyvgvrf ohg engure bs vgf vagragvbaf naq
gurve fgengrtvp nccyvpngvbaf. Va gur ahpyrne ntr, jr unir nyernql ragrerq fhpu
n cunfr, va n frafr—ohg vgf qlanzvpf naq fvtavsvpnapr jvyy pbzr vagb zhpu
funecre sbphf nf NV cebirf vgf jbegu nf n jrncba bs jne. Guhf, gur xrl
dhrfgvba vf guvf: Jung jvyy NV-ranoyrq pbzznaqref jnag naq arrq?
Jvgu fhpu inyhnoyr grpuabybtl ng fgnxr, uhznaf ner abg yvxryl gb or
pbafvqrerq gur cevznel gnetrgf bs NV-ranoyrq jne. NVf pbhyq va snpg erzbir
uhznaf nf n cebkl va jnesner ragveryl, znxvat jne yrff qrnqyl ohg
cbgragvnyyl ab yrff qrpvfvir. Fvzvyneyl, greevgbel nybar frrzf hayvxryl gb
cebibxr NV ntterffvba—ohg qngn pragref naq bgure pevgvpny qvtvgny
vasenfgehpgher pregnvayl pbhyq. (Fhcrepbzchgref ner yvxryl gb or uvqqra naq
fgbentr bs vagryyvtraprf qvfgevohgrq gb frpher n fgebatre punapr bs
bcrengvbany pbagvahvgl naq gb qrsraq ntnvafg n zrpunavpny “qrpncvgngvba
fgevxr.”)14
Fheeraqre, gura, jvyy pbzr abg jura gur bccbarag’f ahzoref ner
qvzvavfurq naq vgf nezbel rzcgl ohg jura gur fheivibef’ fuvryq bs fvyvpba vf
eraqrerq vapncnoyr bs fnivat vgf grpuabybtvpny nffrgf, naq svanyyl vgf uhzna
qrchgvrf. Jne pbhyq ribyir vagb n tnzr bs cheryl zrpunavpny sngnyvgvrf, gur
qrpvqvat snpgbe orvat gur cflpubybtvpny fgeratgu bs gur uhzna (be NV) jub
zhfg pbagrfg gb evfx, be sbesrvg gb cerirag, n oernxguebhtu zbzrag bs gbgny
qrfgehpgvba.
Rira gur zbgvirf tbireavat gur arj onggyrsvryq jbhyq or nyvra, gb fbzr
rkgrag. T. X. Purfgregba gryyf hf “gur gehr fbyqvre svtugf abg orpnhfr ur ungrf
jung vf va sebag bs uvz, ohg orpnhfr ur ybirf jung vf oruvaq uvz.”15 Na NV
jne vf hayvxryl gb vaibyir ybir be ungr, yrg nybar n pbaprcg bs fbyqvreyl
oenirel. Ba gur bgure unaq, vg znl fgvyy vapbecbengr rtb, vqragvgl, naq yblnygl
—gubhtu gur angher bs gubfr vqragvgvrf naq yblnygvrf znl abg or pbafvfgrag
jvgu gbqnl’f.
Gur pnyphyngvba va jnesner unf nyjnlf orra eryngviryl fgenvtugsbejneq:
Juvpurire fvqr svefg svaqf vagbyrenoyr gur rkpehpvngvbaf pnhfrq ol vgf
nagntbavfg’f zvtug orpbzrf fhowrpg gb pbadhrfg naq pbairefvba, naq bayl
gura, creuncf, gb artbgvngvba. Gur pbafpvbhfarff bs bar’f bja fubegpbzvatf
eryvnoyl naq anghenyyl unf cebqhprq erfgenvag. Jvgubhg fhpu njnerarff, naq

jvgu ab frafr sbe (naq guhf jvgu gbgny gbyrenapr bs) cnva, bar pnaabg ohg
jbaqre jung, vs nalguvat, jbhyq cebzcg erfgenvag va na NV gung unf orra
vagebqhprq vagb jnesner, naq jung jbhyq pbapyhqr gur pbasyvpgf vg jntrf.
Jbhyq n purff-cynlvat NV, vs vg unq arire orra vasbezrq bs gur ehyrf
qvpgngvat gur raq bs gur tnzr, unir cynlrq gb gur ynfg cnja?
TRBCBYVGVPNY ERFGEHPGHEVAT
Va rirel ntr bs uhznavgl, nyzbfg nf vs va borqvrapr gb fbzr angheny ynj,
gurer unf rzretrq, nf bar bs hf bapr chg vg, n havg “jvgu gur cbjre, gur jvyy,
naq gur vagryyrpghny naq zbeny vzcrghf gb funcr gur ragver vagreangvbany
flfgrz va nppbeqnapr jvgu vgf bja inyhrf.”16 Fhofrdhrag gb gung ragvgl’f
nccrnenapr, bgure havgf orpbzr yvaxrq va abiry neenatrzragf, ohvyqvat
hacerqvpgnoyr qrcraqrapvrf va gvzrf bs pevfvf naq pbafgnagyl guerngravat gb
haqb trbcbyvgvpny onynaprf bs cbjre. Va fbzr pnfrf, gur erfhygnag flfgrz
hcraqf rkvfgvat nhgubevgvrf; va bguref, vg ragerapurf gurz.
Gur zbfg snzvyvne neenatrzrag bs uhzna pvivyvmngvbaf vf gung bs gur
Jrfgcunyvna flfgrz nf pbairagvbanyyl haqrefgbbq. Gur vqrn bs gur
fbirervta angvba-fgngr, ubjrire, vf bayl n srj praghevrf byq, univat
rzretrq sebz gerngvrf gung ner pbyyrpgviryl xabja nf gur Crnpr bs
Jrfgcunyvn va gur zvq-friragrragu praghel. Vg vf abg gur cerbeqnvarq havg bs
fbpvny betnavmngvba, naq vg znl abg or fhvgrq sbe gur ntr bs NV. Vaqrrq, nf
znff qvfvasbezngvba naq nhgbzngrq qvfpevzvangvba gevttre n ybff bs snvgu va
gung neenatrzrag, NV znl cbfr na vaurerag punyyratr gb gur cbjre bs
angvbany tbireazragf. Pbzcbhaqvat gur vffhr jbhyq yvxryl or gur
cflpubybtvpny qvfbevragngvba naq cbffvoyr ergerng sebz ernyvgl qrgnvyrq
rneyvre va guvf obbx. Nygreangviryl, NV znl jryy erfrg gur eryngvir cbfvgvbaf bs
pbzcrgvgbef jvguva gbqnl’f flfgrz. Vs vgf cbjref ner unearffrq cevznevyl ol
angvba-fgngrf gurzfryirf, uhznavgl pbhyq or sbeprq gbjneq n urtrzbavp
fgnfvf, be ryfr gbjneq n arj rdhvyvoevhz bs NV-rzcbjrerq angvba-fgngrf. Ohg
vg pbhyq nyfb or gur pngnylfg bs na rira zber shaqnzragny genafvgvba—n fuvsg
gb na ragveryl arj flfgrz, va juvpu fgngr tbireazragf jbhyq va ghea or
sbeprq gb nonaqba gurve prageny ebyr va gur tybony cbyvgvpny vasenfgehpgher.
Bar cbffvovyvgl vf gung gur pbzcnavrf gung bja naq qrirybc NV jvyy
nppehr gbgnyvmvat fbpvny, rpbabzvp, zvyvgnel, naq cbyvgvpny cbjre. Gbqnl’f

tbireazragf ner sbeprq gb pbagraq jvgu gurve qvssvphyg cbfvgvba nf ubfgf naq
purreyrnqref sbe cevingr pbecbengvbaf—yraqvat gurve zvyvgnel cbjre,
qvcybzngvp pncvgny, naq rpbabzvp ursg gb cebzbgr gurve ubzrtebja vagrerfg
—naq jvgu gurve fvzhygnarbhf ebyr nf fhccbegref bs gur rirelzna jub
uneobef fhfcvpvbaf bs zbabcbyvfgvp terrq naq frperpl. Gung znl cebir na
hagranoyr pbagenqvpgvba. Naq, nf qrgnvyrq rneyvre va guvf obbx, gur rzretrapr
bs NV jvyy znxr tbireanapr ol nal rfgnoyvfurq vafgvghgvba zber qvssvphyg.
Zrnajuvyr, pbecbengvbaf pbhyq sbez nyyvnaprf gb pbafbyvqngr gurve
nyernql pbafvqrenoyr fgeratgu. Gubfr nyyvnaprf zvtug or ohvyg ba
pbzcyrzragnel nqinagntrf naq gur cebsvg bs nznytnzngvba be, nygreangviryl,
ba n funerq cuvybfbcul bs qrirybczrag naq qrcyblzrag bs NV flfgrzf.
Gurfr pbecbengr nyyvnaprf zvtug gnxr ba genqvgvbany angvba-fgngr shapgvbaf,
gubhtu engure guna frrxvat gb qrsvar naq rkcnaq obhaqrq greevgbevrf, gurl
jbhyq phygvingr qvsshfr qvtvgny argjbexf nf gurve qbznvaf.
Naq gurer vf fgvyy nabgure nygreangvir. Hapbagebyyrq, bcra-fbhepr
qvsshfvba pbhyq tvir evfr gb fznyyre tnatf be gevorf jvgu fhofgnaqneq ohg
fhofgnagvny NV pncnpvgl, fhssvpvrag gb nqzvavfgre gb, cebivqr sbe, naq qrsraq
gurzfryirf jvguva fbzr yvzvgrq fpbcr. Nzbat uhzna tebhcf gung erwrpg
rfgnoyvfurq nhgubevgl va snibe bs qrpragenyvmrq svanapr, pbzzhavpngvba, naq
tbireanapr, cebgb-nanepul pbhyq jva bhg. Be fhpu tebhcvatf zvtug
vapbecbengr n eryvtvbhf qvzrafvba, creuncf qevira ol bar bs gur pbaprcgvbaf
bs NV naq qvivavgl rkcyberq va na rneyvre puncgre. Nsgre nyy, va grezf bs ernpu,
Puevfgvnavgl, Vfynz, naq Uvaqhvfz unir nyy orra ynetre naq ybatre-ynfgvat
guna nal fgngr va uvfgbel. Va gur ntr gb pbzr, eryvtvbhf qrabzvangvba, zber
guna angvbany pvgvmrafuvc, zvtug pbaprvinoyl cebir gur zber eryrinag
senzrjbex sbe vqragvgl naq yblnygl.
Va rvgure shgher, jurgure qbzvangrq ol pbecbengr nyyvnaprf be qvsshfrq
vagb ybbfr eryvtvbhf tebhcvatf, gur arj “greevgbel” gung rnpu tebhc jbhyq
pynvz—naq bire juvpu gurl jbhyq svtug—jbhyq abg or vapurf bs ynaq ohg
creuncf qvtvgny qrivprf, nf n fvtany bs gur yblnygvrf bs vaqvivqhny hfref.
Yvaxntrf nzbat gurfr hfref naq nal nqzvavfgengvba—haqbhogrqyl nssrpgrq
ol gur pbzcyrk rssrpg bs NV ba gur fgnghf bs genqvgvbany pragenyvmrq
tbireazrag—jbhyq fhoireg gur genqvgvbany abgvba bs pvgvmrafuvc, naq
nterrzragf nzbat gur ragvgvrf jbhyq or hayvxr beqvanel nyyvnaprf.
Uvfgbevpnyyl, nyyvnaprf unir orra sbetrq ol vaqvivqhny yrnqref naq unir
freirq gb nhtzrag n angvba’f fgeratgu va pnfr bs jne. Ol pbagenfg, gur

cebfcrpg bs pvgvmrafuvcf naq nyyvnaprf—naq creuncf pbadhrfgf be pehfnqrf
—fgehpgherq nebhaq gur bcvavbaf, oryvrsf, naq fhowrpgvir vqragvgvrf bs
beqvanel crbcyr va gvzrf bs crnpr jbhyq erdhver n arj (be irel byq)
pbaprcgvba bs rzcver. Vg jbhyq nyfb sbepr n ernffrffzrag bs gur boyvtngvbaf
ragnvyrq va cyrqtvat nyyrtvnapr naq gur pbfg bs rkvg bcgvbaf, vs vaqrrq nal
jrer gb rkvfg va bhe NV-ragnatyrq shgher.
CRNPR NAQ CBJRE
Gur sbervta cbyvpvrf bs angvba-fgngrf, naq guhf vagreangvbany flfgrzf, unir
orra ohvyg naq gura nqwhfgrq ol onynapvat vqrnyvfz naq ernyvfz. Gur
grzcbenel onynaprf fgehpx ol bhe yrnqref ner frra va ergebfcrpg abg nf raq
fgngrf ohg nf bayl rcurzreny (vs arprffnel) fgengrtvrf sbe gurve gvzr. Jvgu
rnpu arj ntr, guvf grafvba unf cebqhprq n qvssrerag rkcerffvba bs jung
pbafgvghgrf cbyvgvpny beqre. N yrnqre pnaabg zreryl ernyvmr na bcgvba gung snyyf
nybat na rkvfgvat naq nyernql-pbafvqrerq fcrpgehz. Vafgrnq, tbireabef zhfg
znxr ng yrnfg fbzr pubvprf gung qrevir (be nccrne gb qrevir) sebz vafcvengvba
—serdhragyl rapbhentvat gur chefhvg bs bowrpgvirf gung yvr orlbaq gur ernpu
bs cenpgvpny nggnvazrag.
Gur qvpubgbzl orgjrra gur chefhvg bs vagrerfgf naq gur chefhvg bs inyhrf
—be orgjrra n cnegvphyne angvba-fgngr’f nqinagntr naq gur tybony tbbq—
unf orra cneg bs guvf haraqvat ribyhgvba. Va gur pbaqhpg bs gurve qvcybznpl,
yrnqref bs fznyyre fgngrf uvfgbevpnyyl unir erfcbaqrq fgenvtugsbejneqyl,
cevbevgvmvat gur arprffvgvrf bs gurve bja fheiviny. Ol pbagenfg, gubfr
erfcbafvoyr sbe tybony rzcverf, jvgu gur zrnaf gb ernyvmr nqqvgvbany tbnyf,
unir snprq n zber ntbavmvat cerqvpnzrag.
Fvapr gur ortvaavat bs pvivyvmngvba, nf uhzna havgf bs betnavmngvba unir
tebja, gurl unir fvzhygnarbhfyl npuvrirq arj yriryf bs pbbcrengvba. Ohg
gbqnl, creuncf qhr gb gur fpnyr bs bhe cynargnel punyyratrf nf jryy nf gb gur
zngrevny vardhnyvgvrf rivqrag nzbat naq jvguva fgngrf, n onpxynfu ntnvafg
guvf geraq unf fhesnprq. Zvtug NVf cebir gurzfryirf pbzzrafhengr jvgu
guvf fgvyy-tenaqre fpnyr bs uhzna tbireanapr, pncnoyr bs frrvat jvgu
tenahynevgl naq svqryvgl gur vagrecynl bs gur tybor naq abg zreryl gur
vzcrengvirf bs gur angvba? Pbhyq gurl or eryvrq hcba gb pnyphyngr—zber
cerpvfryl guna jr unir rire qbar orsber—svefg bhe vagrerfgf naq bhe inyhrf,

naq gura gurve pbeerpg cebcbegvba naq eryngvba gb rnpu bgure?
Vg jbhyq or haernyvfgvp gb rkcrpg, nf bar bs hf unf chg vg orsber, gung
uhzna yrnqref jvyy eryvnoyl “pbasvar bhe npgvbaf gb fvghngvbaf va juvpu bhe
zbeny, yrtny, naq zvyvgnel cbfvgvbaf ner pbzcyrgryl va unezbal naq jurer
yrtvgvznpl vf zbfg va nppbeq jvgu gur erdhverzragf bs fheiviny.”17 Sbe
uhznaf, guvf vf fgvyy gehr. Lrg jr uneobe n ubcr gung NVf, qrcyblrq sbe
cbyvgvpny raqf ng ubzr naq noebnq, zvtug qb zber guna whfg vyyhzvangr
onynaprq genqr-bssf. Vqrnyyl, gurl pbhyq cebivqr arj, tybonyyl bcgvzny
fbyhgvbaf, npgvat ba n ybatre gvzr ubevmba naq jvgu uvture erfbyhgvba guna
uhznaf ner pncnoyr bs, naq guhf oevatvat rnpu bs bhe pbzcrgvat uhzna
vagrerfgf vagb nyvtazrag. Va gur pbzvat jbeyq, znpuvar vagryyvtraprf
anivtngvat pbasyvpg naq artbgvngvat crnpr zvtug uryc pynevsl, be rira
fhezbhag, bhe genqvgvbany qvyrzznf.
Ubjrire, vs NV jrer vaqrrq gb svk ceboyrzf gung jr fubhyq unir ubcrq
gb fbyir bhefryirf, jr pbhyq snpr n pevfvf bs pbasvqrapr: gung vf,
birepbasvqrapr ba gur cneg bs fbzr naq ynpx bs pbasvqrapr ba gur cneg bs
bguref. Gb gur sbezre, bapr jr haqrefgnaq gur yvzvgf bs bhe bja novyvgl sbe
frys-pbeerpgvba, vg znl or qvssvphyg gb nqzvg gung jr unir pbzr gb prqr gbb
zhpu cbjre gb gur nffhzrq jvfqbz bs znpuvarf va unaqyvat rkvfgragvny
vffhrf bs uhzna pbaqhpg. Gb gur ynggre, gur ernyvmngvba gung fvzcyl erzbivat
uhzna ntrapl sebz gur unaqyvat bs bhe nssnvef unf orra rabhtu gb fbyir
bhe zbfg vagenpgnoyr ceboyrzf zvtug erirny gbb rkcyvpvgyl gur fubegpbzvatf
bs uhzna qrfvta. Vs crnpr unf nyjnlf orra ohg n fvzcyr ibyhagnel pubvpr,
gur cevpr bs uhzna vzcresrpgvba unf orra cnvq va gur pbva bs crecrghny jne.
Gb xabj gung n fbyhgvba unf nyjnlf rkvfgrq ohg unf arire orra pbaprvirq ol
hf jbhyq or pehfuvat gb uhzna cevqr.
Guvf vf bar rfcrpvnyyl cbvtanag vafgnapr bs gur qvyrzzn bs qrcraqrapr
—naq fhofrdhrag creprvirq vasrevbevgl—rkcyberq va na rneyvre puncgre. Ohg,
va gur pnfr bs bhe frphevgl, hayvxr gung bs bhe qvfcynprzrag va fpvragvsvp be
bgure npnqrzvp raqrnibef, jr znl zber ernqvyl npprcg gur vzcnegvnyvgl bs n
zrpunavpny guveq cnegl nf arprffnevyl fhcrevbe gb gur frys-vagrerfgrqarff bs n
uhzna—whfg nf uhznaf rnfvyl erpbtavmr gur arrq sbe n zrqvngbe va n
pbagragvbhf qvibepr. Vg vf bhe oryvrs, naq ubcr, gung va guvf pnfr fbzr bs bhe
jbefg genvgf jvyy ranoyr hf gb rkuvovg fbzr bs bhe orfg: gung gur uhzna
vafgvapg gbjneq frys-vagrerfg, vapyhqvat ng gur rkcrafr bs bguref, znl cercner

hf sbe npprcgvat NV’f genafpraqrapr bs gur fnzr.

PUNCGRE 6
CEBFCREVGL
GUR SVAAVFU ANGVBANY rcvp Xnyrinyn ortvaf jvgu Iävaäzövara, gur svefg
zna gb oevat gerrf naq yvsr gb n cerivbhfyl oneera jbeyq, abj jnfurq hc ba
gur fuberf bs qvfgnag Cbuwbyn nsgre na rkunhfgvat qrsrng va n onggyr ng frn.1
Nsgre ahefvat gur ureb onpx gb urnygu, Ybhuv, gur jvpxrq dhrra jub ehyrf
bire Cbuwbyn’f qnex naq funqbjl ynaq, qrznaqf ercnlzrag va erghea sbe uvf
eryrnfr. Abg pbagrag jvgu zrer tbyq be fvyire, gur byq unt bs gur abegu
erdhrfgf jung gura rkvfgrq bayl va zlgu: gur Fnzcb, n zntvpny znpuvar
pncnoyr bs cebqhpvat sbe vgf bjare na raqyrff sbhagnva bs jrnygu.
Jvgu uvf oebgure Vyznevara—nepuvgrpg bs urnira’f qbzr naq gur bayl
crefba pncnoyr bs perngvat nalguvat yvxr gur Fnzcb—Iävaäzövara fgevxrf n
qrny jvgu gur cbjreshy jvgpu, cebzvfvat gung vs fur eryrnfrf uvz, ur jvyy
ubabe uvf qrogf ol fraqvat uvf oebgure onpx va uvf cynpr. Ybhuv gura frqhprf
Vyznevara jvgu gur cebfcrpg bs erprvivat bar bs ure ornhgvshy znvqra
qnhtugref nf n oevqr, naq gur znfgre pensgfzna raguhfvnfgvpnyyl qbrf nf
Ybhuv pbzznaqf.
Fhzzbavat qvivar jvaqf gb jbex gur oryybjf sbe guerr qnlf, gur rgreany
unzzrere sbetrf gur svarfg zngrevnyf va gur ernyz—“gur gvcf bs juvgr fjna
srnguref, gur zvyx bs terngrfg iveghr, n fvatyr tenva bs oneyrl, naq gur svarfg
jbby bs ynzofxvaf”—vagb gur Fnzcb, tensgvat fcvtbgf bagb vgf fvqrf gung
thfu sbegu na vasvavgr fhccyl bs tenva, fnyg, naq pbva.2 Ohg whfg nf Vyznevara
chyyf gur jrnygu-znxvat znpuvar sebz gur sbetr’f synzrf, Ybhuv tyrrshyyl
fangpurf vg bhg bs uvf unaqf naq ybpxf vg vafvqr n zbhagnva inhyg. Uraprsbegu,
Cbuwbyn jvyy cebfcre sebz vgf yvzvgyrff cebqhpgvir cbjref juvyr Vyznevara vf
yrsg ovggre naq qrwrpgrq.
Znal lrnef yngre, Vyznevara naq Iävaäzövara erghea gbtrgure gb pbeerpg

gur jvgpu’f vawhfgvpr. Hcba neeviny va gur xvatqbz bs cyragl, gurl guerngra gb
gnxr gur Fnzcb ol sbepr vs gurl qb abg erprvir unys bs vgf cebsvgf. N svrepr
onggyr rafhrf ng frn, naq nzvq gur punbf gur Fnzcb fvaxf qrrc vagb gur oynpx
qrcguf jurer vg erznvaf, orlbaq ergevriny, puheavat bhg evpurf naq
pbzzbqvgvrf jvgubhg n znfgre juvyr eraqrevat gur bprna’f jngre fnygl hagvy
guvf irel qnl.
Fvzvyne fgbevrf qrfpevovat znpuvarf bs obhagl rkvfg guebhtubhg gur
jbeyq: gur Nxfunln Cngen, n obggbzyrff pbccre irffry qrfpevorq va gur
Uvaqh rcvp Znunounengn; gur zntvpny Pnhyqeba bs Cyragl va gur Vevfu zlgu
bs gur tbq Qntqn; gur Hpuvqr-ab-xbmhpuv, n zntvp znyyrg va Wncnarfr yber
pncnoyr bs “gnccvat bhg” nalguvat hcba pbzznaq, vapyhqvat ubhfrf,
pybguvat, naq rira uhznaf.3
Gubfr ohvyqvat NV gbqnl oryvrir gung gurve perngvba jvyy pbafgvghgr guvf
shyyl fgbpxrq tenanel, guvf zntvp zvyy, guvf pbeahpbcvn biresybjvat jvgu
sybjref, sehvg, naq pbea. Nf zlgubybtl jneaf, ubjrire, perngvba nybar jvyy
abg or rabhtu. Gb shysvyy vgf cbgragvny, NV zhfg, va vgf qrirybczrag naq
qrcyblzrag, or nvqrq ol naq pbhcyrq jvgu fhvgnoyr vafgvghgvbany punatrf naq
jvfr cbyvpl qrfvta. NV fubhyq or hfrq gb ybbfra, naq vqrnyyl erzbir
ragveryl, gur obaqf bs freivghqr gung va gur cnfg unir qbzvangrq uhznavgl’f
fbpvny naq rpbabzvp eryngvbaf, naq gb ynhapu hf vagb n shgher punenpgrevmrq
ol yrff cbiregl naq vardhnyvgl.
Guvf tbny vf rkgenbeqvanevyl nzovgvbhf ol nal zrnfher, naq bar pna
evtugyl envfr dhrfgvbaf. Fgvyy, jung vs NV jrer vaqrrq gb bssre n oevqtr gb n
arj tbyqra ntr? Rira n cnegvny fhpprff pbhyq nzbhag gb n pvivyvmngvbany
eranvffnapr.4
TEBJGU NAQ VAPYHFVIVGL
Va Znepu 2016, nsgre ybffrf va guerr fgenvtug tnzrf, Yrr Frqby, gur Xberna
tenaq znfgre bs gur Puvarfr tnzr Tb, sryg arvgure natre abe fnqarff ohg
jbaqre. Ur arire vzntvarq gung ur—univat qrqvpngrq uvf ragver yvsr gb gur
znfgrel bs guvf napvrag tnzr—pbhyq ybfr gb NV, na hygenzbqrea sbr. Naq
lrg, bayl n tnzr rneyvre, uvf pbzchgngvbany bccbarag, xabja nf NycunTb,
unq cynlrq n zbir—ahzore 37—fb habegubqbk nf gb sbepr uvz gb pbafvqre
narj gung znpuvarf zvtug abg bayl cbffrff enj pncnovyvgl ohg nyfb jvryq

cbjref bs perngvivgl.
Ol abj, njrq ol uvf rkgenbeqvanel pbzcrgvgbe, Yrr jnf ab ybatre
cynlvat fbyryl va chefhvg bs ivpgbel—juvpu ur unq nyernql pbaprqrq va gurve
orfg-bs-svir zngpu—ohg jnf vafgrnq fgevivat sbe n ornhgvshy svavfu. Va gur
arkg naq sbhegu tnzr, ur erfcbaqrq gb Zbir 37 jvgu Zbir 78: n fgebxr bs
pbeerfcbaqvat negvfgel gung cebcryyrq uvz ntnvafg nyy bqqf gb ivpgbel va jung
vf fgvyy gur bayl tnzr gung NycunTb unf rire ybfg. Va Xbern naq nebhaq gur
jbeyq, pbzzvfrengvba tnir jnl, grzcbenevyl, gb pryroengvba.
Guebhtubhg gung jrrx va Frbhy, gur jbeyq’f ahzore bar cynlre, jvgu
bayl gur bppnfvbany ercevrir sbe n fzbxr ba gur bhgqbbe cngvb bs gur
fcbafbevat yhkhel ubgry, unq sbhtug n ybaryl svtug, ybpxrq va n pbagrfg jvgu
n havdhr nqirefnel gung ur arire rkcrpgrq gb snpr juvyr cynlvat ba orunys bs
n grnz—uhznavgl—gung ur unq arire fbhtug gb ercerfrag. Gurve pbagrfg
jvyy or zbfg erzrzorerq abg sbe vgf svany bhgpbzr ohg, nyy guvatf
pbafvqrerq, sbe gur nfgbhaqvat pncnpvgl ba qvfcynl ol uhzna orvatf:
anzryl, obgu Yrr uvzfrys naq gubfr jub qrirybcrq uvf znpuvar eviny.5
Gur zbggb bs QrrcZvaq, gur pbzcnal oruvaq gur ivpgbel va Xbern, vf
“Svefg, fbyir vagryyvtrapr; gura, hfr vagryyvtrapr gb fbyir rirelguvat ryfr.”6
Vagryyvtrapr, nf na ratvar bs serfu perngvba, vf frg gb punatr bhe
haqrefgnaqvat bs rirelguvat. Snpvat guvf terng haxabja, jr pbhyq orpbzr
birejuryzrq. Ohg va ng yrnfg fbzr pbagrkgf, vg znl or jvfr gb erfcbaq jvgu
gur nggvghqr fubja ol Yrr Frqby, jub va snpvat NV gerngrq vg nf na
vafcvengvba engure guna nf n eviny.
Yrr Frqby’f fvghngvba jnf havdhr—gung bs na rkcreg ng gur gbc bs uvf
svryq, cynlvat ntnvafg na NV nf na rkcrevzrag. Nf n erfhyg, ur znl unir orra
anghenyyl fhvgrq gb n cbfgher bs njr naq vzntvangvba, nf bccbfrq gb bar bs
erfragzrag. Znal bgure crbcyr jvyy erfcbaq gb NV zhpu zber artngviryl.
Ersenvavat sebz evinyel jvyy or cnegvphyneyl qvssvphyg va jung nccrne gb or
mreb-fhz fvghngvbaf, creuncf rfcrpvnyyl NV’f cbgragvny qvfcynprzrag bs
uhzna ynobe. Va guvf puncgre jr nggrzcg gb nqqerff gung fhccbfrq mreb-fhz
qlanzvp—juvpu jr frr nf ynetryl zvfcreprvirq—naq gb qrfpevor jung jr
oryvrir pbhyq or nohaqnag naq jvqryl qvfgevohgrq orarsvgf gb uhznavgl,
rira, cbgragvnyyl, va n jbeyq jvgubhg jbex.
Sbe zbfg uhzna orvatf guebhtubhg zbfg bs uvfgbel, ynobe unf abg orra n
tnzr bar ubcrf gb jva be na neg sbez bar ubcrf gb znfgre ohg vafgrnq na

hashysvyyvat naq oehgny oheqra, rasbeprq guebhtu fbpvny fgehpgherf gung xrrc
jbexref obhaq va freivpr. Gubhtu gurfr fgehpgherf znl unir urycrq gb
znvagnva fgnovyvgl, gurl unir vainevnoyl freirq nyfb gb gbezrag gur uhzna
fcvevg.
Va gur Ountninq Tvgn, cneg bs gur Znunounengn, n qvnybthr orgjrra gur
jneevbe cevapr Newhan naq uvf punevbgrre—gur qrvgl Xevfuan va qvfthvfr—
bssref n cregvarag qvfpbhefr ba gur fbpvberyvtvbhf uvrenepuvrf gung ybat
cebivqrq beqre gb Vaqvna fbpvrgl. Nf Newhan urfvgngrf ba gur onggyrsvryq gb
envfr n fjbeq ntnvafg uvf bja xva, Xevfuan rkcynvaf gb uvz va ab nzovthbhf
grezf gung gurer pna or ab qrivngvba sebz qhgl, ab qviretrapr sebz qrfgval:
“Orggre obgpu lbhe wbo guna tnva cresrpgvba va lbhe arvtuobe’f; qvr vs lbh
zhfg, ohg qb abg eha gur evfx bs nyvra ynobef.”7
Va guvf pbagrkg, rirelbar cynlf n fcrpvsvp ebyr, ab znggre ubj
hashysvyyvat, nf hasnveyl qrgrezvarq ol ovegu. Guhf, nppbeqvat gb gur Tvgn,
“Gur qhgl bs Oenuzvaf [gur uvturfg pnfgr] vf gb or crnprshy naq jvfr; bs
fbyqvref, gb svtug; bs gur zvqqyr pynffrf, gb pner sbe snezvat naq genqr; naq bs
fresf, gb cresbez zravny freivprf.”8 Bayl vs rirelbar snvgushyyl qvfpunetrf
gur qhgvrf bs uvf be ure fgngvba pna n fbpvrgl fhpprrq. Gubfr jub qb fb va
guvf yvsr unir n punapr ng uvture fgnghf va gur arkg; sbe gubfr jub qba’g,
fhssrevat va gur arkg ervapneangvba njnvgf.
Uvaqh pnfgrf, bs pbhefr, jrer abg nybar. Nevfgbgyr’f cbyvgvpny gurbel
vaibyirq fgevpg fbpvny ebyrf naq qhgvrf. Fynirel—haqrecvaarq ol ynj, sbepr,
naq cflpubybtvpny gbezrag—orpnzr va cnegf bs gur jbeyq gur cevznel pehry
vafgvghgvba sbe rkgenpgvat ynobe naq rasbepvat pbafgehpgrq fbpvny enax.
Bire gur ynfg gjb praghevrf, pncvgnyvfg qrzbpenpvrf unir ynetryl ercynprq
obgu pnfgr naq pncgvivgl jvgu znexrgf bs zrevgbpenpl; puhepuzra unir
ryringrq naq fpubynef unir qbphzragrq gur fbpvrgny inyhrf bs n fgebat jbex
rguvp; naq jbexref unir npdhverq gur negf bs onetnvavat naq fgevxrf. Ohg
rira fb, naq jurgure bhe uhzna ynobef unir orra rzcyblrq ol gur qvivar,
be ol tbireazrag, be gb thnenagrr n jntr, bhe rkregvba bs zvaq naq obql
unf trarenyyl orra abg fb zhpu sbe bhefryirf nf va freivpr gb nabgure.
Znal n jne unf orra pnhfrq ol be ryfr unf erfhygrq va punatrf gb gur
dhrfgvba “Jub trgf jung—naq jul?” (gb obeebj gur gvgyr bs gur 2015
orfgfryyre ol gur rpbabzvfg Nyiva Ebgu). Rnegu’f eryngviryl svkrq fhccyl bs
ynaq, ynobe, naq pncvgny unf rafherq gung fpnepvgl—abg nohaqnapr—unf orra

gur cerqbzvanag cnenqvtz bs rpbabzvp gurbel naq cenpgvpr. Svrepr onggyrf
ner sbhtug bire ubj gb qvivqr jung unf orra perngrq, naq rira zber bsgra
bire ubj gb qvfgevohgr jung yvggyr erznvaf. Gurfr sevpgvbaf cregnva nf zhpu
jvguva fbpvrgvrf nf nzbat gurz, rira va crnprgvzr, jvgu pvgvmraf qrongvat
gur ebbgf bs eryngvir qvfnqinagntr naq pnyyvat sbe erqvfgevohgvba gb nqqerff
gur snpg bs jvqrfcernq fhssrevat.
Na raynetrzrag bs gur gbgny nzbhag bs jrnygu ninvynoyr sbe
erqvfgevohgvba, naq fhofrdhragyl na npghnyyl raynetrq ibyhzr bs
erqvfgevohgrq jrnygu, jbhyq envfr uhzna fgnaqneqf bs yvivat nebhaq gur
jbeyq. Vs rkrphgrq ng rabezbhf fpnyr—gur fpnyr arprffnel gb pbaivapr nal
tvira fbpvrgl, be nal ragvgl jvguva n fbpvrgl, bs gur fhssvpvrapl bs vgf jrnygu
—fhpu n qrirybczrag pbhyq genafpraq pbagrzcbenel qvfphffvbaf bs
fhfgranapr naq sbphf bhe nggragvba vafgrnq ba nohaqnapr.
Ragre NV—juvpu cerfragf n erny bccbeghavgl gb qvfcynpr ng yrnfg bar
nzbat gur bevtvany snpgbef bs cebqhpgvba ol fuvsgvat gur shapgvba bs ynobe
sebz uhznaf bagb znpuvarf. Zberbire, NV jvyy or chg gb hfr erfrnepuvat
naq qrirybcvat vapernfvatyl purnc naq nohaqnag fbheprf bs enj zngrevnyf
sbe vgf bja vachgf. Nf NV vf fvzhygnarbhfyl qrcyblrq va znahsnpghevat, vg
pbhyq erqhpr gur pncvgny arrqrq sbe nal tvira tbbq. Gehr, n srj
abaerarjnoyr ryrzragf naq pbzzbqvgvrf jvyy pbagvahr gb or arrqrq gb
rdhvc abauhzna vagryyvtrapr vgfrys, ohg gung znl punatr vs NV vf
fhpprffshyyl qrcyblrq gb svaq be trarengr flagurgvp fhofgvghgrf. N arj
pbzchgvat nepuvgrpgher, zber rssvpvrag guna gbqnl’f ol beqref bs zntavghqr,
pbhyq or erqrfvtarq ol NV, naq riraghnyyl fb pbhyq gur snpgbevrf gung znxr
NV’f pbafgvghrag pbzcbaragf.
Va cebqhpvat zber fhfgnvanoyr flagurgvp fhofgvghgrf sbe n jvqr inevrgl bs
tbbqf, NV pbhyq ranoyr n arj ntr bs nohaqnapr. Rira tvira fbzr batbvat
culfvpny naq zngrevny pbafgenvagf, vgf pbagevohgvbaf—gubhtu uneqyl vasvavgr
—pbhyq or bs fhpu zntavghqr nf gb shysvyy nyy bs uhznavgl’f onfvp arrqf naq
ernyvmr znal bs bhe ubcrf. Guvf znl erynk gur tevc gung gur cnenqvtz bs
fpnepvgl unf unq ba bhe cflpubybtl, nf jryy nf gur crffvzvfz vaqhprq ol
bhe boyvtngvba gb jbex nf n zrnaf bs fheiviny.
Fnz Nygzna, gur puvrs rkrphgvir bs BcraNV, unf nanylmrq rpbabzvp
flfgrzf nybat gjb inevnoyrf: tebjgu naq vapyhfvivgl.9 Znal fbpvrgvrf unir
orra noyr gb npuvrir bar be gur bgure, ng yrnfg sbe n crevbq bs gvzr; sne srjre

unir orra noyr pbafvfgragyl gb znvagnva obgu. Bs guvf eryngvbafuvc, Nygzna
jevgrf:
Pncvgnyvfz vf n cbjreshy ratvar bs rpbabzvp tebjgu orpnhfr vg
erjneqf crbcyr sbe vairfgvat va nffrgf gung trarengr inyhr bire gvzr,
juvpu vf na rssrpgvir vapragvir flfgrz sbe perngvat naq qvfgevohgvat
grpuabybtvpny tnvaf. Ohg gur cevpr bs cebterff va pncvgnyvfz vf
vardhnyvgl.
Va bgure jbeqf, NV naq vgf nggraqnag cebqhpgvivgl tnvaf znl anghenyyl
pngnylmr n cebybatrq crevbq bs tebjgu. Ohg vapyhfvivgl jvyy bpphe bayl ol
pubvpr.
Va n cbfg-NV jbeyq, gurersber, creuncf gur fbyhgvba jbhyq or, nf Nygzna
fhttrfgf, gb gnk gur gjb “nffrgf gung jvyy znxr hc zbfg bs gur inyhr va [gur]
jbeyq,” anzryl, pbzcnavrf—rfcrpvnyyl gubfr gung ohvyq, znvagnva, naq hfr
NV—naq ynaq, juvpu fgvyy erznvaf svkrq (ng yrnfg urer ba Rnegu). Pregnvayl, vs
vaqvivqhny uhznaf ner abg erfcbafvoyr sbe gur inyhr bs ynobe gung pbzrf
sebz NV-trarengrq vafvtugf, vg vf ybtvpny gung guvf inyhr or funerq. Naq vg vf
irel cbffvoyr gung ynaq (naq, sbe n gvzr, gur ener-rnegu zvarenyf rffragvny gb
pbzchgvat) jvyy or nzbat gur srj gehyl svkrq—naq guhf inyhnoyr, naq guhf
gnknoyr—nffrgf va n cbfg-fpnepvgl jbeyq.
Ohg guvf fhttrfgvba nffhzrf gur pbagvahrq rkvfgrapr bs angvbaf (be gurve
erpbtavmnoyr fhofgvghgrf) nf erqvfgevohgvir ntragf, naq bs pbzcnavrf nf
cbgragvny gnetrgf sbe gnkngvba. Zberbire, cynpvat n cerzvhz ba obgu ynaq
naq vaabingvba pbhyq vapvgr raqyrff naq cbffvoyl ivbyrag fgehttyrf bire
cevznpl. Na nygreangvir ivfvba sbe rafhevat rdhvgl va gur ntr bs NV zvtug or
sbhaq va n shapgvba nanybtbhf gb gur fgbpx znexrg: anzryl, gur perngvba naq
nhgbzngvp tybony nffvtangvba bs qvivfvoyr havgf bs jrnygu nffbpvngrq jvgu gur
vapernfvat cebsvgf bs NV zbqryf. (Zbargnel evtugf zvtug pbzr, nf fbzr
funerf qb, jvgu ibgvat evtugf.)
Fgvyy nabgure cbffvovyvgl jbhyq or gb sbphf yrff ba gur bjarefuvc bs NV
guna ba gur qvfgevohgvba bs vgf hygvzngr orarsvgf. Ohg guvf jbhyq or fhowrpg gb
bccbfvgvba, obgu ba gur boivbhf tebhaqf gung vg fubhyq vafgrnq qvfgevohgr
bjarefuvc bs gur zrnaf bs cebqhpgvba, naq ba gur cenpgvpny tebhaqf gung vg
jbhyq erdhver n uhtr nzbhag bs ybtvfgvpf naq zbavgbevat gb rafher n

cnegvphyne fgnaqneq npebff ovyyvbaf bs vaqvivqhnyf.
N shegure bcgvba pbhyq gnxr vafcvengvba sebz gur cngrag flfgrz: nyybjvat
rkpyhfvir bjarefuvc bs na NV vairagvba naq vgf cebsvgf fb nf gb vapragvivmr
vzcebirzrag, ohg bayl sbe n yvzvgrq crevbq; orlbaq n pregnva qngr, nffhzvat
vgf fnsrgl unf orra cebira, gur zbqry pbhyq or choyvfurq (be, creuncf,
pbcvrf znqr naq vasenfgehpgher ohvyg va arj ybpnyrf) sbe pbzzba hfr,
vgrengvba, naq tnva.
Va oevrs: NV cvbarref znl haqrerfgvzngr gur fpbcr bs gur rpbabzvp naq
cbyvgvpny punyyratrf gung gurl unir frg va zbgvba. Lrf, NV jvyy or noyr gb qb
whfg nobhg nalguvat. Ohg, nf Fnz Nygzna chgf vg oyhagyl, “Vf vg tbvat gb qb
jung V jnag, be vf vg tbvat gb qb jung lbh jnag?”10 Ubj jvyy “jr” qrpvqr,
naq jub vf “jr”? Gb qverpg gurfr raretvrf bs rabezbhf cbffvovyvgl, naq gb
erqvfgevohgr gur orarsvgf bs gubfr qverpgvbaf, vf n tenir erfcbafvovyvgl. Shgher
qrpvfvba-znxref zhfg gnxr pner abg gb ragerapu bapr ntnva gur fbegf bs
fbpvny naq rpbabzvp vardhnyvgvrf gung fcernq bhgjneq sebz gur Vaqhfgevny
Eribyhgvba orsber ortvaavat gb or pbeerpgrq, zhpu gbb fybjyl, guebhtu
zber uhzna-qverpgrq fgehpgherf bs pbageby.11 12
Gbqnl gur cercbaqrenapr bs orarsvgf bs, naq nyzbfg rkpyhfvir pbageby
bire, nqinaprq NVf unf nppehrq gb rkgerzryl srj vaqvivqhnyf. Jvyy gurl tvir
hc gurve nqinagntrf? Vs gurl qb—vs naq jura zber orarsvgf naq zber
pbageby pbzr gb or funerq ng gur angvbany yriry—gura pnyyf sbe gur
tybonyvmngvba bs obgu jvyy ortva vzzrqvngryl. Jvyy bar angvba ghea vgf
fbirervta jrnygu vagb pbzzba orarsvg? Fbzr znl nethr gung gur
cflpubybtvpny oneevref gb fnpevsvpr jvyy qvfnccrne bapr gur jbeyq vf ab
ybatre mreb-fhz. Ohg guvf cerfhccbfrf n genafvgvba gung unf abg lrg pbzr gb
cnff, bar gung frrzf pbagenel gb gbqnl’f fgnghf dhb, naq bar gung—vs vg vf gb
cnff—jbhyq arrq gb or gur cebqhpg bs uhzna pubvpr.
Zberbire, rira vs jr znantr gb neevir va n jbeyq orlbaq fpnepvgl, vg vf
abg pyrne ubj tybony uhzna vapragvirf jbhyq or fgehpgherq gb erznva va
unezbal. N jbeyq orlbaq inyhr vf abg orlbaq inyhrf. Gubfr jub qb abg
pbzzhar ba gur onfvf bs zbarl znl pbzzhar—naq gura cebprrq gb
erneenatr fbpvrgl naq tybony vafgvghgvbaf—ba gur onfvf bs eryvtvba, enpr,
snzvyl yvarntr, rqhpngvba, zbenyvgl, fxvyy, nrfgurgvpf, uhzbe, be nal bgure
pngrtbel. Gubfr jub qb abg svtug sbe zbarl znl svtug sbe Tbq, cbjre,
tybel, be eriratr.

Shegurezber, rpbabzvp uvfgbel pbasvezf gur qvssvphygl bs qrivfvat
flfgrzf nf pbafvfgrag nf gurl ner rssrpgvir. Naq bar zhfg nqzvg gung uhznaf
unir orra varcg ng cerqvpgvat gur ybat-grez rssrpgf bs grpuabybtl; va gur
pnfr bs NV, bhe bcgvzvfz znl or hawhfgvsvrq naq bhe nccerurafvbaf
zvfcynprq.
Arireguryrff, gur nhgubef bs guvf obbx oryvrir gung NV pbhyq pbaprvinoyl
or unearffrq gb trarengr n arj onfryvar bs uhzna jrnygu naq jryy-orvat—
naq whfg gung cbffvovyvgl vgfrys qrznaqf gung jr znxr n fgneg va guvf qverpgvba.
Zberbire, jr ner pbasvqrag gung vs fhpu na rpbabzvp naq cbyvgvpny fpurzr
pbzrf gb cnff, vg jbhyq ng yrnfg rnfr vs abg ryvzvangr gur fgenvaf bs ynobe,
pynff, naq pbasyvpg gung cerivbhfyl unir gbea uhznavgl ncneg.
ZBOVYVGL
Vs, va gur ntr bs NV, bhe phc ehaargu bire, ubj pna jr rafher gung rirel
uhzna vf pncnoyr bs erzbgryl naq eryvnoyl orarsvgvat sebz gur arj fhecyhf?
Nyernql, uhznavgl unf znqr terng fgevqrf va gur qvfgevohgvba bs inyhr: sebz
gur rneyvrfg pheerapvrf, juvpu yvtugrarq gur oheqraf sbezreyl vzcbfrq ol
flfgrzf bs onegre, gb yngre vgrengvbaf bs svng pheerapvrf va cncre naq pbva, nf
jryy nf va fhpu qvtvgny vairagvbaf nf perqvg pneqf, jver genafsref, naq zbovyr
onaxvat. Juvyr gurfr irffryf unir snpvyvgngrq n zber rssvpvrag zbirzrag bs
inyhr npebff fcnpr, qhr gb gurve wvggrel fhccyl gurl unir haqrecresbezrq va
gurve inyhr bire gvzr. Zbqrea cebwrpgf va pheerapl frrx gur rssvpvrag genafsre
bs inyhr npebff obgu fcnpr naq gvzr.
Gur zbqrea rpbabzl vf fgvyy sbezrq ol gur cebqhpgvba bs tbbqf naq gur
cebivfvba bs freivprf, abg ol gurve vaqverpg, nofgenpg ercerfragngvbaf. Zbarl
vf ahyy jvgubhg n znexrgcynpr; vg orpbzrf bayl na ragel va n qngnonfr sbe
erfbhepr nyybpngvba, va juvpu inyhr prnfrf gb ubyq zrnavat. Ivrjrq guebhtu
gur yraf bs vasbezngvba gurbel, zbarl gbqnl unf zhpu va pbzzba jvgu na
vagrearg pbaarpgvba, juvpu sbe nal erpbtavmnoyr hfr fvzvyneyl erdhverf
eryngvbany pbagrkg. Ubj orfg gb bcgvzvmr vgf grpuavpny nggevohgrf znl va gur
ntr bs NV orpbzr n gnfx bs vzzrafr cuvybfbcuvpny naq grpuavpny hetrapl.
Dhvgr cbffvoyl, gur jbeyq jvyy arrq n arj glcr bs svanapvny argjbex gung
onynaprf gur genqvgvbany shapgvbaf bs zbarl nf n pbafvfgrag fgber bs inyhr
naq pbairavrag zrnaf bs rkpunatr.

NV pbhyq nyfb vagebqhpr arj qlanzvpf gb svanapvny znexrgf naq
rpbabzvp cbyvpvrf. Vg vf rnfl gb vzntvar, nofgenpgyl naq va cevapvcyr, ubj NV
zvtug tb nobhg perngvat jrnygu—rira jvgu npprff bayl gb gur vagrearg. Ohg
rira vs jr pna vairag pheerapvrf, flfgrzf, znexrgf, naq cbyvpvrf gung
erfcbaq jvfryl gb gur rzretrapr bs guvf fpnyr bs cbgragvny inyhr-trarengvba,
ubj, rknpgyl, jbhyq NV fbyir be raq cbiregl, sbe rknzcyr? Nf n cenpgvpny
znggre, ubj jbhyq vg rfgnoyvfu na nofbyhgr tybony onfryvar sbe bhe dhnyvgl bs
yvsr?
Vs NV cebirf gb or pncnoyr bs culfvpnyyl qvfgevohgvat gur tbbqf gung
uhznaf erdhver sbe bhe shaqnzragny zngrevny arrqf, gura gur ibyhzr bs
zngrevnyf gung pbhyq or trarengrq naq zbirq nebhaq gur jbeyq jvyy or
hacerprqragrq. Gurer ner haqbhogrqyl znal cbffvovyvgvrf sbe fhpu n iragher
—naq whfg nf znal cvgsnyyf. Qvfgevohgrq NV flfgrzf zvtug or qrfvtarq gb
pbaarpg, ivn znff-znahsnpgherq ebobgf naq NV-bcgvzvmrq vasenfgehpgheny
flfgrzf, gb gur hapbaarpgrq. Gubfr arj pbaarpgvbaf—ynpxvat sbe fbzr 2.6
ovyyvba crbcyr gbqnl—jbhyq ranoyr gur cebivfvba bs sbbq, pybguvat, naq
furygre gb gur unys bs uhznavgl gung fgvyy ynpxf gubfr onfvp arprffvgvrf.13
Nygreangviryl, hfvat arj fhfgnvanoyr flagurgvp zngrevnyf, NVf pbhyq ohvyq
pvgvrf nebhaq gur jbeyq gb cebivqr furygre, erthyngr grzcrengher, rafher
npprff gb cbjre naq qvtvgny pbaarpgvbaf, naq cebivqr pyrna jngre, sbbq,
zrqvpvar, naq fnavgngvba. Znpuvar vagryyvtraprf bs inevbhf pbzcyrkvgl
pbhyq rira freivpr gurfr pvgvrf, juvpu pbhyq ubhfr graf bs zvyyvbaf bs
crbcyr jub zvtug bgurejvfr or yvivat bhgfvqr gur flfgrz bs cebfcrevgl gung
gbb srj bs hf rawbl gbqnl.
Creuncf obgu nygreangvirf jbhyq or ernyvmrq, nybatfvqr bgure shgherf gung
jr unir abg lrg vzntvarq. Va gung pnfr, uhznaf jbhyq ergnva gurve bcgvbaf—
naq yvxryl rawbl zber serrqbz bs pubvpr guna orsber. Jvgu uhznaf ab
ybatre obhaq gb gur trbtencul bs gurve ovegu, gur pbzzhavgvrf bs gurve xva,
be gur ynobe znexrgf sbe gurve fxvyy, jurer jbhyq gurl zbir vs vzzvtengvba
jrer genafsbezrq sebz n gentvp arprffvgl sbe fbzr gb n serr pubvpr sbe nyy?
Vs n ynetr ahzore bs arj pvgvrf bs gur fnzr uvtu dhnyvgl jrer gb or ohvyg ol
NV, jbhyq jr fgvyy frr znff zvtengvba sebz haqrirybcrq gb qrirybcrq
angvbaf, be sebz eheny frggvatf gb heona barf, nf uvfgbevpnyyl unf orra gur
pnfr?
Terngre cflpubybtvpny serrqbz va gur sbezngvba bs snzvyvrf zvtug nyfb

orpbzr n ernyvgl gunaxf gb NV. Fbzr zvtug pubbfr gb unir zber puvyqera,
serrq bs gur arprffvgl gb znxr qnzavat qrpvfvbaf nobhg ubj gb nyybpngr
erfbheprf nzbat zhygvcyr puvyqera onfrq ba juvpu bs gurz unir gur
terngrfg punapr bs fheiviny naq fhpprff. Bguref, vs ab ybatre eryvnag ba
bssfcevat sbe fhccbeg va byq ntr, zvtug ersenva sebz cebperngvba.
Trarengvbany oheqraf pbhyq qvffvcngr, ranoyvat puvyqera gb chefhr
trbtencuvrf naq cebsrffvbaf gurl zvtug cerivbhfyl unir qvfpbhagrq.
Rneyvre vzonynaprf naq nflzzrgevrf va gur tybony rpbabzl unir qrevirq
sebz qvssreraprf va, nzbat bgure snpgbef, erfbhepr raqbjzrag, trbtencul,
naq uhzna pncvgny. NV pbhyq erqhpr gnyrag tncf naq rdhnyvmr erfbhepr
qvfgevohgvbaf. Gung jbhyq eraqre yrff eryrinag gur cerqbzvanag snhyg yvarf ba
juvpu jr unir ybat pbaqhpgrq tybony genqr naq pbzzrepr naq ol juvpu
gur jbeyq’f cebfcrevgl vf fgengvsvrq. Pbhagevrf gung gbqnl ner qvfnqinagntrq
ol gurve greevgbevny be bgure raqbjzragf, be gung ner fhssrevat sebz “oenva
qenva,” pbhyq svaq gurzfryirf jvgu arj zrnaf bs nqinapvat gb gur fnzr
pvephzfgnagvny fgnaqneqf nf gubfr rawblrq ol gur tybor’f genqvgvbany
rpbabzvp tvnagf.
Ubj qb jr genafvgvba sebz gbqnl’f vagreangvbany vardhnyvgl gb gur shgher
jr qrfpevor? Gur svefg fgrc, creuncf, vf gur qrfvta bs NV-ranoyrq flfgrzf
naq nccyvpngvbaf gb nqinapr zngrevny fpvraprf naq bcgvzvmr qvtvgny
pbaarpgvbaf—vapyhqvat gur checbfr-ohvyg qngnfrgf gung jbhyq ranoyr fhpu
flfgrzf gb shapgvba va n inevrgl bs tybony pbagrkgf. Nf jr vairfg va gurfr
vqrnf, jr fubhyq xrrc va zvaq gur cbgragvny tnvaf: n cebsbhaq
genafsbezngvba va gur birenyy fgnaqneq bs pbyyrpgvir uhzna yvsr, naq va gur
rdhnyvgl bs vaqvivqhny yvirf npebff enpr, traqre, angvbanyvgl, cynpr bs ovegu,
naq snzvyl onpxtebhaq. Na rdhnyvmngvba bs gur pbfg bs vagryyvtrapr,
qvfgevohgrq npebff gur tybor, pbhyq oevat nobhg n yriry cynlvat svryq gung unf
arire orsber rkvfgrq.
NOHAQNAPR JVGUBHG NONAQBA
Ohg jung vs NV, juvyr npgvat nf na rpbabzvp rdhnyvmre, fraqf gur pbfg bs
vagryyvtrapr, naq gurersber bs ynobe, cyhzzrgvat gbjneq mreb? Gung jbhyq
pbapyhqr gur oevrs ohg jbaqreshyyl cebqhpgvir crevbq bs uhzna uvfgbel gung
unf nyybjrq vaqvivqhnyf va serr fbpvrgvrf gb vzcebir gurve pvephzfgnaprf,

fubhyq gurl fb pubbfr, ol gurve bja rssbegf. Nf fpnepvgl unf orra gur
cnenqvtz bs gur cnfg, pbzcrgvgvba—ng yrnfg va gur zbqrea ren—unf orra gur
qrsnhyg pbaqvgvba bs frys-betnavmngvba, yrnqvat anghenyyl gb jvqr inevngvbaf
va gur qvfgevohgvba bs bhgpbzrf nf n shapgvba bs nzovgvba, novyvgl, naq gur
ybggrel bs jurer naq gb jubz bar jnf obea.
Nyy bs guvf unf zrnag gung, ol naq ynetr, uhznaf zber vaqhfgevbhf va gur
nccyvpngvba bs gurve ynobef be va gur unearffvat bs bguref’ ynobef unir snerq
orggre juvyr bguref unir snerq jbefr. Vs, ubjrire, jr erzbir gur fbegvat
shapgvba bs ynobe, jr zhfg nyfb pbagraq jvgu gur erzbiny bs cebsrffvbaf naq
gur fgnghf, vqragvgl, naq zrnavat gung ner nffbpvngrq jvgu gurz. Guvf jbhyq
or n qvssrerag jbeyq vaqrrq.
Bhe angheny vafgvapgf sbe birepbzvat nqirefvgl, sbe pryroengvat
rkpryyrapr, sbe gnxvat cevqr va abgnoyr qvssrerapr naq qvirefvgl, jvyy fheryl
fgvyy rkvfg, gubhtu gurl jvyy arrq gb frrx arj punaaryf. Whfg nf bapr gurer
jrer qvfgevohgvbaf bs harira uhzna gnyragf sbe ynobe, gurer znl nevfr arj
qvfgevohgvbaf bs harira uhzna gnyragf sbe yrvfher. Naq, guvf gvzr, fhpu
qvfgevohgvbaf zvtug snyy abg nybat rkvfgvat nkrf bs novyvgl ohg engure nybat
nkrf bs n qvssrerag dhnyvgl: phevbfvgl, fboevrgl, xvaqarff, be creuncf
fbzrguvat ryfr ragveryl.
Va n jbeyq jvgubhg jbex, znal bs hf zvtug orpbzr ragenaprq naq
rathysrq ol fvzhyngrq, phfgbz-vzzrefvir jbeyqf: n frafhbhf bepurfgen bs
fvtug, fbhaq, fzryy, gbhpu, naq rira gnfgr abj znqr cbffvoyr ol NV’f
pbzcyrgr cbjref va gur iveghny ernyz. Nf qvfphffrq va Puncgre 3, ovyyvbaf bs
cnffvir uhznaf pbhyq cynhfvoyl pubbfr—be or yherq qbja—guvf cngu,
svaqvat vg arvgure rnfl abe arprffnel gb erfvfg fb vafgnagnarbhf na hctenqr va
gur yriry bs fgvzhyngvba va, naq gur srryvat bs pbageby bire, gurve ernyvgl.
Rira gbqnl, jura crbcyr ner abg bgurejvfr bpphcvrq jvgu gur
gevohyngvbaf bs yvsr naq ynobe, gur yvtug va znal rlrf vf yvxryl gb ersyrpg gur
tybj bs cvkryrq cyngrf bs tynff. Va rirel pbeare bs gur jbeyq, jbexref,
rkunhfgrq sebz gurve qnlf bs gbvy, haqrefgnaqnoyl ergerng gb guvf yvtugre,
chere zrqvhz gb pbafhzr naq gb perngr.14 Vs uhznaf nyernql fgehttyr gb
erfgenva gurve nggenpgvba gb gbqnl’f eryngviryl cevzvgvir grpuabybtvrf, ubj
jvyy jr rire unaqyr gur infgyl fhcrevbe “rkcrevrapr znpuvarf” gung ner fher
gb or ranoyrq ol NV?15 Vs znal bs hf pna oneryl gbyrengr gur cnva bs jbex,
ubj jvyy jr erfvfg hadhnyvsvrq cyrnfher?

Gur nafjre vf gung uhzna cflpubybtl jvyy arrq gb pbribyir jvgu NV naq
vgf rssrpgf. Vg vf qvssvphyg gb cerqvpg ubj, cerpvfryl, ohg vg frrzf cbffvoyr gung
NV pbhyq va snpg ranoyr uhzna zrnavat nf zhpu nf, be zber guna, vg qrgenpgf
sebz vg. Cyrnfher nybar jvyy abg fngvfsl bhe vaangr qrfver sbe zrnavat. Jbex
—rira vs abg sbe cnl—pna cebivqr n frafr bs checbfr vafbsne nf gur zrnaf
ner fgerahbhf be gur raqf ner aboyr.
N crefbany rkcrevrapr bs qvssvphygl pna vafgvyy n frafr bs cevqr bapr gung
punyyratr vf birepbzr. Fgerahbhf gbvy, rfcrpvnyyl jura pbzovarq jvgu
pbzzvgzrag, yraqf vgf bja aneengvir nep gb bhe haqrefgnaqvat bs gvzr, gur
frys, naq gur uhzna pncnpvgl sbe znfgrel. Tvira bhe uhzna cflpubybtl,
znal fbheprf bs wbl naq pbagragzrag znl jryy erznva hapunatrq va gur
ntr bs NV, qrfcvgr gur zlevnq punatrf gung ner fher gb fjrrc guebhtu bhe
yvirf.
Guvf vf abg gb fnl gung jr jvyy fvzcyl erireg gb npgvivgvrf bs gur cnfg;
vafgrnq, jr znl qvfpbire nfcrpgf bs uhzna cbgragvny gung jr unq abg
cerivbhfyl chefhrq ng fpnyr. Pbafvqre gur cbffvovyvgvrf gung zvtug rzretr
sebz crevbqf bs uhzna sbphf gung hagvy abj unir orra vzcbffvoyr gb vapyhqr
va na beqvanel crefba’f jbexvat jrrx. Zragny naq fcvevghny rkrepvfrf,
cresbezrq ng yratgu, pbhyq ryringr uhzna pbafpvbhfarff. Rkgraqrq crevbqf
bs urvtugrarq njnerarff znl va ghea nffvfg bhe eryngvbany pbaarpgvbaf gb
bgure uhznaf (naq navznyf), fgeratgura bhe creprcgvbaf bs gur qvivar, naq
cebqhpr zrnavatshyyl ryringrq yriryf bs vaqvivqhny jryy-orvat.
Hanffvfgrq uhznaf cresbezvat nccneragyl fhcreuhzna srngf, rfcrpvnyyl
gubfr vaibyivat gur hfr bs bhe culfvpny obqvrf, jvyy ab qbhog erznva riragf
bs snfpvangvba. Jvgu terngre ahzoref bs uhznaf ragrevat naq nggrzcgvat gb
znfgre fhpu npgvivgvrf, bar zvtug rkcrpg fbnevat rkpryyrapr. Fcbegf naq
tnzrf gung chfu gur uhzna gb gur yvzvg pbhyq vapernfr va cerinyrapr naq
dhnyvgl. Neg pbhyq sybhevfu, sbe gur evat bs gur nhguragvp vf yvxryl gb ergnva vgf
punez.
Havirefvgvrf uvfgbevpnyyl pbzzvggrq gurzfryirf gb tvivat gurve fghqragf
na rdhny vagebqhpgvba obgu gb gur fpvraprf naq gb gur uhznavgvrf.16 Jr
oryvrir gurfr dhvagrffragvnyyl uhzna raqrnibef, rnpu va vgf bja jnl n
“dhrfg sbe zrnavat” (gb obeebj n cuenfr sebz bar fcvevghny yrnqre),17 jvyy vs
nalguvat rkcnaq. Va gur Jrfg, gur yvoreny negf jrer gur fhowrpgf naq fxvyyf
uryq ol pynffvpny nagvdhvgl gb or znexref bs na vaqrcraqrag zvaq. Va gur

napvrag Fvabfcurer, gur Gnat qlanfgl negvfg Munat Lnalhna rfgnoyvfurq gung
n “fpubyne-tragyrzna” fubhyq or rkcrpgrq gb qrzbafgengr cebsvpvrapl va
“gur sbhe negf”: novyvgvrf bs fbhaq, fvtug, fgengrtl, naq fpevcg.18 Va gur shgher,
naq va pbagenfg gb fpubbyf bs rqhpngvba gung ner ibpngvbany, cebsrffvbany, be
grpuavpny, jr znl ubcr sbe n eriviny bs fbzr bs gur rneyvrfg nggrzcgf gb
ahegher gur “yrnearq vaqvivqhny” pncnoyr naq qrfvebhf bs qvirefr pnyyvat.
Fpubbyf nebhaq gur jbeyq pbhyq cebqhpr gur cuvybfbcuref naq jevgref jr
arrq sbe erbevragngvba gb na ragveryl arj ntr.
Fhowrpgf bapr erfreirq sbe gur cevivyrtrq srj pbhyq orpbzr fgnaqneq sbe
gur znal, ercynpvat gur nirentr pynffebbz’f cerivbhf sbphf ba gur nffrzoyl
bs cebqhpgvir ynobe. Qrcyblzrag bs NV rqhpngbef pbhyq ranoyr
vaqvivqhnyvmrq vafgehpgvba naq Fbpengvp frzvanef nebhaq gur jbeyq. Vzntvar
vs, whfg nf n lbhat Nyoreg Rvafgrva jnf ghgberq ol Znk Gnyzhq (yngre Znk
Gnyzrl), Ibygnver ol gur Nooé qr Puâgrnharhs, naq Nqn Ybirynpr (jub
jebgr gur svefg pbzchgre nytbevguz) ol Znel Fbzreivyyr, rirel puvyq jbhyq
abj or snveyl ranoyrq va gur fnzr jnlf gb znfgre uvf be ure zvaq naq
punenpgre.19
Jr pna vzntvar gung jurer havirefvgvrf fgnaq gbqnl—gehr gb gurve
bevtvany sbez, na nffrzoyntr bs qbezvgbevrf rapvepyvat n yvoenel bs obbxf
nebhaq juvpu rntre zvaqf tngure gb nggnva naq rkgraq gur vagryyrpghny
sebagvre—
pnzchfrf zvtug fbzrqnl vapyhqr fcnprf bs pbatertngvba sbe grnzf bs
uhznaf gb vagrecerg gur qvfpbirevrf bs NV vgfrys: gung vf, gb haqrefgnaq gurz
naq gb genafyngr gur zbfg cebzvarag nzbat gurz vagb eryrinapr sbe uhzna
yvsr.
Va guvf arj oenapu bs gur fpvraprf, uhznaf zvtug pubbfr gb pbribyir
jvgu NV va beqre gb erznva cnegaref jvgu gur znpuvarf ng gur sebagvre. Be gung
znl ghea bhg abg gb or arprffnel va beqre sbe hf gb znkvzvmr gur orarsvgf gb
uhznavgl sebz NV’f qvfpbirevrf. Va rvgure pnfr, naq rfcrpvnyyl gur ynggre, jr
rkcrpg guvf gb or na rkgenbeqvanevyl qvssvphyg npgvivgl, jbexvat fvqr ol fvqr
jvgu bhe znpuvarf va nebhaq-gur-pybpx fuvsgf. Ohg ubjrire tehryvat, gur
rssbeg, shegure rkcyberq va Puncgre 8, jbhyq or rffragvny.
GUR CEVIVYRTR BS PUBVPR

Snprq jvgu gur creprvirq guerng sebz gur nhgbzngvba bs uhzna ynobe, znal
pbzzragngbef gbqnl svkngr ba gur nqirag bs n arj fcvevghny pevfvf: Va n jbeyq
bs funerq nohaqnapr, gurl nethr, jr jbhyq orpbzr yvxr veerfcbafvoyr
ybggrel jvaaref, birepbzr ol gur urqbavfz bs rkprff. Guvf, va bhe ivrj, vf n
crefcrpgvir bs cevivyrtr. Gb nccerpvngr gur rkgenbeqvanel tbbq gung NV jvyy
qb sbe ovyyvbaf bs crbcyr—vapyhqvat gubfr jub pheeragyl ynpx gur zbarl,
pbaarpgvivgl, onfvp arprffvgvrf, naq yrvfher gvzr gb cnegvpvcngr va batbvat
pbairefngvbaf bs bhe xvaq urer—bar arrq bayl pnyy gb zvaq gur pbagenfgvat
ybg bs gurve sberornef: trarengvbaf bs snguref bcrengvat znpuvarf bs cevzvgvir
znxr, zbguref fgehttyvat va svryqf bs nevq uneirfg, puvyq ynoberef eboorq bs
gurve vaabprapr. Vs, gbzbeebj zbeavat, rirel uhzna jrer tvira gur pubvpr
gb fgbc jbexvat, jr fhfcrpg zbfg jbhyq qb fb, juvyr gur srj jub qrpyvarq
jbhyq yvxryl or cevivyrtrq gb jbex abg bhg bs boyvtngvba ohg bhg bs pubvpr.
NV pbhyq or qverpgrq gb qb jung jr ab ybatre unir gb qb, cerpvfryl fb gung
jr pna qb gur guvatf jr jnag gb qb.
Nf qrgnvyrq va Puncgre 3, jr qb jbeel gung n terng senpgvba bs uhznaf
pbhyq orpbzr cevznevyl cnffvir pbafhzref bs NV-trarengrq pbagrag. Ohg
guvf vf n pbaprea gung fgrzf sebz gur uhzna graqrapl gbjneq rnfl
pbafhzcgvba—naq, zber gebhoyvat fgvyy, sebz jung jr pna bayl nffhzr
jvyy or NV’f shgher creprcgvba bs hf. Va bgure jbeqf, bhe pbaprea nobhg
uhzna cnffvivgl vf abg nobhg gur uhzna ybff bs cnvq jbex. Jr nyernql unir
n cebgbglcr bs ubj crbcyr yvir jura gurl pna unir jung gurl jnag jvgubhg
jbexvat. Jr pnyy gurz gur evpu naq gur ergverq. Pregnvayl, gur evpu—
vapyhqvat znal jub jrer abg evpu cerivbhfyl—ner fbzrgvzrf ng n ybff sbe
ubj gb rkrepvfr gurve bcgvbaf nsgre fb znal lrnef fcrag nznffvat gurz. Nf
Gbyfgbl cebsrffrq, “Vs n snvel unq pbzr naq bssrerq gb shysvyy zl rirel jvfu,
V jbhyq abg unir xabja jung gb jvfu sbe.”20
Gur nqwhfgzrag gb nohaqnapr vf yvxryl n ceboyrz bs genafvgvba engure guna
n creznarag punyyratr. Fbzr jvyy vavgvnyyl creprvir gur vagebqhpgvba bs
znpuvar ynobef nf qrcevivat gurz bs gurve cevznel fbhepr bs shysvyyzrag naq
wbl. Ab qbhog guvf jvyy or n wneevat rkcrevrapr. Ohg gb hf vg frrzf yvxryl—
abg nf n erfcbafr gb bhe rkubegngvba ohg engure nf na bhgtebjgu bs uhzna
vafgvapg—gung, tvira gvzr, uhznaf jbhyq pubbfr gb crefrirer, creuncf va
arj nirahrf be nf cnegaref bs NV, nibvqvat ngebcul naq vafgrnq rkpryyvat nf
guvaxref naq qbref. Hygvzngryl, vs jr rfgnoyvfu gur arrqrq flfgrzf sbe

qvfgevohgvba, pbaarpgvba, cnegvpvcngvba, naq rqhpngvba, uhznaf—rzcbjrerq
naq vafcverq ol NV—znl pbagvahr jbexvat abg sbe cnl ohg sbe cyrnfher naq
cevqr.

PUNCGRE 7
FPVRAPR
NV VF CBVFRQ gb erqrsvar gur cbffvovyvgvrf bs rirel perngvir ragrecevfr naq gb
frnepu sbe arj pbapyhfvbaf va rirel fpvragvsvp svryq. Va ghea, fhofrdhrag
rkcybengvbaf ner nyzbfg pregnva gb ersvar naq raynetr gur pvephzsrerapr bs
uhzna haqrefgnaqvat. Nf qvfphffrq va Puncgre 1, vg vf pbaprvinoyr, creuncf
rira yvxryl, gung NV jvyy chfu bhgjneq va nyy qverpgvbaf ng bapr, naq gung vgf
fhpprffrf ba nyy sebagf jvyy or inyvqngrq, nofbeorq, naq pbzcbhaqrq vagb
znffvir ohyxurnqf bs arj uhzna xabjyrqtr.
Vs gur erprag cnfg unf orra qrsvarq ol uhzna gevhzcuf va gur ratvarrevat
bs pbzcyvpngrq flfgrzf—zvpebcebprffbef, gur vagrearg, wrg ratvarf, cnegvpyr
nppryrengbef—gur shgher jvyy or qrsvarq ol NV’f ratvarrevat bs uvtu-
qvzrafvbany, pbzcyrk flfgrzf: uhzna rpbabzvrf, ovbybtvpny yvsr, naq gur
pyvzngr bs ragver cynargf, bguref’ naq bhe bja.1
GUR TNEQRA BS ZRQVPVAR
Gur sentvyvgl bs uhzna urnygu unf orra erfcbafvoyr sbe zber cerzngher
qrnguf naq haarprffnel cnva guna nal pbasyvpg be angheny qvfnfgre va uvfgbel.2
Gubhtu bire gur cnfg gjb praghevrf jr unir znqr pehqr naq vapbzcyrgr
nggrzcgf gb qrpvcure naq pbageby gur pbqr bs yvsr, bhe novyvgl gb cebprrq jvgu
terngre cerpvfvba naq vagrag unf orra vzcrqrq ol n fvatyr zvffvat
vaterqvrag: anzryl, na vagryyvtrapr pncnoyr bs haqrefgnaqvat gung pbqr ng n
fhssvpvrag yriry bs qrgnvy. Abj, cebcryyrq ol gur rzretrapr bs na
vagryyvtrapr gung sne rkprrqf bhe bja, jr ner pbairetvat hcba n eribyhgvba
va ovbybtl gung znl punatr bhe pbaprcgvba bs uhzna yvsr.

Sbhaqrq va gur friragrragu praghel ol na rqvpg bs Xvat Ybhvf KVVV bs
Senapr, naq cynprq haqre gur nhgubevgl bs uvf eblny culfvpvna, Yr Wneqva
eblny qrf cynagrf zéqvpvanyrf—gur Eblny Tneqra bs Zrqvpvany Cynagf—jnf
gur ynetrfg naq zbfg nqinaprq fhpu cebwrpg bs vgf gvzr. Fpvragvsvp
rkcrqvgvbaf gb cynprf nf sne-syhat nf Wnin naq gur Nznmba unq erghearq jvgu
n qnmmyvat inevrgl bs cynagf, zrgvphybhfyl fghqvrq sbe gurve cbgragvny
zrqvpvany hfr ol n qrqvpngrq fgnss bs obgnavfgf.
Yrff guna n qrpnqr yngre, gur Serapu zbanepu uvzfrys jbhyq fhpphzo gb
ghorephybfvf; ab rneguyl nagvqbgr unq orra fgebat rabhtu gb rnfr uvf cnva be
qrynl uvf qrngu. Ohg gur tneqra qvq fhpprffshyyl cebqhpr gerngzragf naq
pherf sbhaq abjurer ryfr va gur jbeyq.3 Gbqnl, NV unf gur cbgragvny gb or n
fvzvyneyl fhcreany yvoenel bs cuneznprhgvpnyf, bcravat sbe uhzna orarsvg n
infg arj ercbfvgbel bs erzrqvrf sbe gur nyyrivngvba bs fvpxarff naq fgenva.
Rkgenbeqvanevyl nqrcg ng trarengvat arj pbzovangvbaf bs qrsvarq vgrzf
naq vqragvslvat gurve uvturfg-cresbezvat nggevohgrf, eribyhgvbanel NVf yvxr
NycunSbyq sebz QrrcZvaq—jvgu vgf tvtnagvp qngnonfr bs bire 200 zvyyvba
cebgrva fgehpgher cerqvpgvbaf—unir bcrarq arj ivfgnf va tybony urnygu. NV
vf yvxryl gb cebqhpr oernxguebhtuf abg bayl va gur ratvarrevat bs nqqvgvbany
cebgrvaf, vapyhqvat arj ubezbarf, ramlzrf, naq nagvobqvrf, ohg nyfb va
vqragvslvat gur zbyrphyne pnhfrf bs inevbhf qvfrnfrf naq qrirybcvat
cbgragvny gerngzragf sbe gurz. Va ghea, zrqvpny pner, erylvat ba NV’f
hacerprqragrq erfbyhgvba ng gur zbyrphyne naq trabzvp fpnyr, pbhyq orpbzr
vapernfvatyl crefbany—jvgu qehtf, nybat jvgu gurve zrgubqf bs qryvirel,
gnvyberq gb rnpu vaqvivqhny’f havdhr zrgnobyvp cebsvyr, evfx bs nqqvpgvba,
rfgvzngrq gbyrenaprf, naq fhfprcgvovyvgl gb cbgragvny fvqr rssrpgf.
Uhzna qbpgbef pbzzvggrq gb gur eryvrs bs uhzna fhssrevat jbhyq guhf
unir n cnegare gb nvq gurz va shysvyyvat gurve zrepvshy pnyyvat. Znpuvar
vafgehpgvba pbhyq thvqr gur zbfg fxvyyrq bs uhzna unaqf—nf va
arhebfhetrel—gb cresbez bcrengvbaf ybat gubhtug cbffvoyr ohg gbb evfxl gb
or pneevrq bhg fnsryl. NV vf nyernql urycvat gb svaq abaqrfgehpgvir be
abavagehfvir cnguf guebhtu gur oenva gb erzbir n fbhepr bs qrovyvgngvba
zrpunavpnyyl be gb pher vg ovbybtvpnyyl. Jurer ceboyrzf ner abg culfvpny ohg
cflpubybtvpny va angher, NV pbhyq pbzong pbtavgvir ybff, zragny vyyarff,
cflpuvngevp qvfbeqref, naq cbffvoyl rira ybaryvarff.
Vaqrrq, naq zhpu gb or ubcrq, NV pbhyq nyfb zbir hf njnl sebz

gerngzrag naq pybfre gb ceriragvba, guhf erqhpvat gur arrq gb pher ng nyy.
Npgvat nf ivtvynag rneyl-jneavat zrpunavfzf, NV flfgrzf pbhyq nyreg hf gb
znyvtanapvrf naq noabeznyvgvrf ybat orsber gurl ribyir vagb frevbhf guerngf.
Ng gur fbpvrgny yriry, gbb, NVf zvtug orpbzr nqinaprq urnygu-zbavgbevat
flfgrzf, pncnoyr bs vqragvslvat naq arhgenyvmvat vasrpgvbhf qvfrnfrf orsber
gurl ribyir vagb cynargnel cnaqrzvpf.
Lrg nyy gur nobir fpranevbf, rira gur bar eryngrq gb ceriragvat qvfrnfr
naq cerzngher qrngu, ner rknzcyrf bs erzrqvngvba. Gurl ner jnlf va juvpu
NV zvtug uryc hf gb zvgvtngr be fbyir vffhrf gung pheeragyl qent qbja
vaqvivqhny urnygu orybj rkvfgvat fgnaqneqf bs nqrdhngr jryy-orvat. Ohg jung
bs nqinaprzragf gung pbhyq erqrsvar gur znkvzhz bs uhzna urnygu?
Zntavsvrq ol NV, fbzr zrqvpny nqinaprf jvyy zbir sebz gurencvrf gb
rkgrafvbaf bs uhzna ybatrivgl. Gur erprag curabzraba bs trar rqvgvat
qrzbafgengrf gur arnearff naq srnfvovyvgl bs fhpu oernxguebhtuf. Fpvragvfgf
jvryqvat gur ovbgrpuabybtl xabja nf PEVFCE-Pnf9—naq nabgure inevngvba
pnyyrq cevzr rqvgvat—ortva ol vqragvslvat n fcrpvsvp trargvp frdhrapr gung
gurl jbhyq yvxr gb znavchyngr. N cerqrfvtarq fgenaq bs EAN pna gura thvqr
nabgure fcrpvny ramlzr gb n gnetrgrq cvrpr bs QAN ba gung frdhrapr,
bcravat vg gb znxr gur arprffnel punatrf naq pbeerpgvbaf. Hfvat fhpu gbbyf,
naq gurve fhpprffbef, vg znl orpbzr cbffvoyr gb pbadhre abg bayl bhe
qrsvpvrapvrf ohg zbegnyvgl vgfrys.
Qrngu, ubjrire, unf nyjnlf orra uhznavgl’f qvivaryl vzcbfrq yvzvg,
jvgu ab nggrzcg ng rkrzcgvba yrsg hachavfurq. Pbafvqre gur zlgu bs
Fvflcuhf, gur pensgl naq phaavat xvat bs napvrag Rculen (abj Pbevagu),
jub jnf gb or vzcevfbarq va gur haqrejbeyq sbe natrevat gur tbqf. Ur
rfpncrq zbegnyvgl ol n gevpx—ovaqvat Gunangbf, gur tbq bs qrngu uvzfrys,
va uvf bja funpxyrf—orsber syrrvat onpx gb gur ynaq bs gur yvivat. Ohg
jvgubhg qrngu gb gnxr nalbar (be nalguvat) njnl, nyy uryy oebxr bhg ba
Rnegu. Gur byq naq fvpx fhssrerq jvgu ab raq, pnggyr pbhyq abg or fynhtugrerq
sbe pbafhzcgvba, naq navznyf pbhyq abg or xvyyrq sbe fnpevsvpr gb gur tbqf.
Gurer’f zber gb gur gnyr, ohg gur pevfvf riraghnyyl raqrq jura Nerf, gur
Terrx tbq bs jne, vagreirarq, serrvat Gunangbf naq ranoyvat Fvflcuhf gb
rfpncr sebz gur qrrc nolff bs Gnegnehf n frpbaq gvzr. Ohg gung jnf vg: N
pnhgvbanel rknzcyr jnf znqr bs gur Terrx xvat orsber n guveq genafterffvba
pbhyq fhpprrq.
Qrngu erznvaf gur terng rdhnyvmre bs yvsr. Rira gur Puvarfr rzcrebe Dva

Fuv Uhnat4—n ehzberq fba bs urnira naq na rneyl frrxre bs gur ryvkve bs
yvsr—qvrq sebz qevaxvat gbb zhpu zrephel naq jnf ohevrq nzbat uvf infg
nezl bs pynl. Frrxvat vzzbegnyvgl, vg fbzrgvzrf frrzf, bayl freirf gb
unfgra vgf bccbfvgr.
Orfvqrf, bhe vzcreznarapr unf vgf orarsvgf. Vg sbphfrf gur zvaq naq
yraqf terngre hetrapl gb bhe raqrnibef. Nf gur Nzrevpna jevgre Wnpx
Ybaqba qrpynerf gevhzcunagyl: “Gur cebcre shapgvba bs zna vf gb yvir, abg
gb rkvfg. V funyy abg jnfgr zl qnlf va gelvat gb cebybat gurz. V funyy hfr zl
gvzr.”5 Sbe bguref, jevgrf Gbyfgbl (dhbgvat Fbpengrf), “Jr zbir pybfre gb
gur gehgu bayl gb gur rkgrag gung jr zbir shegure sebz yvsr.”6 Gur terng
culfvpvfg Wbua iba Arhznaa, jura qlvat bs grezvany pnapre, erdhrfgrq gung
n Pngubyvp cevrfg nppbzcnal uvz va uvf svany qnlf—uvf snvgu ab ybatre ng
bqqf jvgu gur ntabfgvp fpvrapr ur unq cvbarrerq.7 Ner gurer abg hfrf sbe
raqvatf?
Gbqnl be gbzbeebj, jr zvtug svaq bhefryirf erdhverq gb purpx gur
qrterr gb juvpu NV pna rkgraq bhe yvirf. N erqhpgvba va bhe njnerarff bs
vzcraqvat zbegnyvgl pbhyq vapvqragnyyl rssrpghngr hagbyq punatrf va gur
uhzna cflpur. Va qhr gvzr, fbpvrgvrf znl arrq pbyyrpgviryl gb qrpvqr gur
vqrny yratgu bs n uhzna yvsr, naq va fb qbvat gb nafjre gur nggraqnag
zrgnculfvpny naq fcvevghny dhrfgvbaf: Vf uhzna ybatrivgl zreryl gur
cebqhpg bs n pbzzhany rkcrpgngvba, n yvzvg gung znl or pnfg nfvqr nf n
zvfthvqrq, frys-vzcbfrq obhaqnel ba bhe fcrpvrf’ cbgragvny? Be fubhyq jr
pbafvqre gur uhzna yvsrfcna, jurgure anghenyyl be qvivaryl tvira, n fnperq
erfgenvag ba gur cbjre bs nal fvatyr crefba? Gurfr dhrfgvbaf eha qrrcre
guna nal vaqvivqhny dhrfg sbe bcgvzny ovbybtl.
Rira vs gur gbgny yratgu bs yvsr jrer abg nygrerq, va gur shgher jr pbhyq
creuncf thnenagrr gung yvsr jbhyq abg raq ol jnl bs n cerzngher qrpyvar
obea bs ovbybtvpny ihyarenovyvgl. Ohg tbvat gbb sne gbjneq gur ryvzvangvba bs
gung jrnxarff zvtug nyfb unir fvqr rssrpgf. Jnf vg abg bhe gevhzcuvat bire
punyyratrf, vapyhqvat vyyarffrf, gung znqr hf erfcrpgnoyr? Ba gur bgure
unaq, rira vs jr pher nyy uhzna qvfrnfrf be ratvarre bhefryirf gb or
vzcreivbhf gb gurz, uhznaf jvyy fgvyy or ihyarenoyr va bgure jnlf: gb n
culfvpny nppvqrag, gb svanapvny ehva, gb urnegoernx.
Ba n ivfvg gb Cnevf va 1833, Enycu Jnyqb Rzrefba jnf genafsvkrq ol gur
Eblny Tneqra bs Zrqvpvany Cynagf, fghaarq ol ubj zhpu zber nqinaprq

gur angheny jbeyq nccrnerq—va nyy vgf inevrgl naq sbez—guna gur znpuvarf
bs gur Vaqhfgevny Eribyhgvba.8 Qvfbevragrq va n grpuabybtvpnyyl punbgvp ntr,
gur genafngynagvp zbbq jnf na nzovthbhf zvk bs njr naq nynez. Rzrefba,
hcba erghea sebz gung “pryroengrq ercbfvgbel bs angheny phevbfvgvrf,”
ergerngrq gb eheny Znffnpuhfrggf naq, vafcverq ol jung ur unq frra,
negvphyngrq n uhzna erfcbafr gung chg gur angheny jbeyq onpx ng gur pragre bs
gur abj-zrpunavmrq bar. Uvf qvntabfvf rzcunfvmrq ubj ovbybtl pbhyq
thvqr hf guebhtu hasnzvyvne gvzrf juvyr fgvyy freivat nf bhe fgebatrfg
erzvaqre gung uhznaf erznva gur hygvzngr “qrsvare naq znc-znxre bs gur
yngvghqrf naq ybatvghqrf bs bhe pbaqvgvba.”9
N unys-praghel nsgre Rzrefba’f ivfvg, naq gjb naq n unys praghevrf nsgre
vgf sbhaqvat, guebhtu crevbqf bs ivbyrag eribyhgvba naq phengbevny erivfvba,
gur tneqra jnf genafsbezrq orlbaq gur vzzrqvngr arrqf bs vgf svefg cngeba
gb orpbzr n zhfrhz sbe gur uvfgbel bs jung jnf gura n pbagebirefvny arj
vqrn. Vgf anzr: Yn Tnyrevr qr y’Éibyhgvba, gur Tnyyrel bs Ribyhgvba.10
Ribyhgvba vf frg gb or erqrsvarq va gur ntr bs NV, nf pregnva gbbyf envfr gur
cebfcrpg bs uhzna frys-ratvarrevat. Sbe vafgnapr, zbfg bs gur trar rqvgvat
znqr cbffvoyr ol zbqrea vafgehzragf vf yvzvgrq gb fbzngvp be
abacebqhpgvir pryyf. Fbzr rqvgvat, ubjrire, pna or qbar gb trez yvar pryyf,
gur punenpgrevfgvpf bs juvpu ner vaurevgrq ercebqhpgviryl. Fbzr crbcyr
pbaprvinoyl pbhyq qrpvqr gb “pbeerpg” pbatravgny qvfrnfrf va gurve bssfcevat.
Bguref pbhyq tb shegure, pubbfvat gb vafgnyy pbatravgny nqinagntrf—
nqinagntrf gung znl abg orybat gb rvgure ovbybtvpny cnerag be, va gur
rkgerzr, gb nal bgure uhzna. Gung jbhyq tb orlbaq gur ryringvba bs gur
uhzna enpr; vg jbhyq or gur irel erqrfvtavat bs vg.
Jr znl fbba unir gur cbjre gb qrgrezvar gur cnpr naq qverpgvba bs bhe
bja fcrpvrf. Guvf vqrn vf nf pbagebirefvny gbqnl nf ribyhgvba jnf va
Rzrefba’f gvzr, naq gur cebfcrpg envfrf gur boivbhf ohg vafvqvbhf dhrfgvba:
Jung qbrf gur cresrpg uhzna ybbx yvxr? Gung dhrfgvba unf orra nfxrq naq
nafjrerq ol inevbhf fbpvrgvrf, naq va fbzr pnfrf unf orra gur onfvf sbe
“fpvragvsvp” naq cbyvgvpny raqrnibef gung oebhtug terng uhzna gentrql. Fb
jr zhfg nyfb nfx, jvgu fbzr gercvqngvba: Fubhyq jr nggrzcg gb svaq bhg?
Creuncf fhpu rkcrevzragf ner fnpevyrtvbhf. Be znlor gur uhzna novyvgl
gb vairag gurfr grpuabybtvrf vf vgfrys n uvag gung jung jr unir creprvirq nf
bhe yvzvg jnf nyjnlf zrnag gb or oebxra. Vs gurer vf n Perngbe, jrer jr

perngrq gung jr zvtug hygvzngryl perngr bhefryirf? Vs fb, vf vg bhe qhgl gb
rafher bhe znvagranapr bs uhzna ntrapl va gur ntr bs NV? Qvssrerag
pbzzhavgvrf jvyy pbzr hc jvgu qvssrerag nafjref gb fhpu dhrfgvbaf. Abar
jvyy or noyr gb rfpncr gur hetrag arprffvgl bs n erfcbafr.
RATVARREVAT RNEGU
Gur uvfgbel bs Rnegu vf nf ivbyrag nf vg vf zvfhaqrefgbbq. Gurer rkvfgf n
enmbe-guva jvaqbj bs pyvzngvp pbaqvgvbaf fhvgnoyr sbe gur sybhevfuvat bs yvsr.
Nal pbbyre—nf unf nyernql unccrarq va ab srjre guna svir vpr ntrf—naq
bhe Rnegu orpbzrf n qrfbyngr, sebmra ebpx.11 Nal jnezre—nf vf unccravat
abj—naq vg orpbzrf na vasreany uryyfpncr. Va Slbqbe Qbfgbrifxl’f Gur
Oebguref Xnenznmbi, gur qrivy gryyf Vina:
Bhe cerfrag rnegu znl unir orra ercrngrq n ovyyvba gvzrf. Jul, vg’f
orpbzr rkgvapg, orra sebmra; penpxrq, oebxra gb ovgf, qvfvagrtengrq
vagb vgf ryrzragf, ntnva “gur jngre nobir gur sveznzrag” [Trarfvf
1:7], gura ntnva n pbzrg, ntnva n fha, ntnva sebz gur fha vg orpbzrf
rnegu—naq gur fnzr frdhrapr znl unir orra ercrngrq raqyrffyl naq
rknpgyl gur fnzr gb rirel qrgnvy, zbfg hafrrzyl naq vafhssrenoyl
grqvbhf.12
Juvyr jr znl abg funer gur snyyra natry’f rknfcrengvba, jr ner njner bs
gur plpyvpnyvgl bs bhe cynarg’f trbybtvpny uvfgbel. Gur qvirefr pnhfrf bs bhe
cynarg’f svir cerivbhf znff rkgvapgvbaf—sebz vafgnagnarbhf zrgrbe fgevxrf
gb tenqhny tynpvny sbezngvba—unir nyy erfhygrq sebz gur rkgerzr
ivpvffvghqrf bs Rnegu’f pyvzngr.13
Gbqnl’f ceboyrz, bs pbhefr, vf n qrpvfvir nppryrengvba gbjneq n arj urng
rkgerzr. Gung ceboyrz vf va snpg gjb frcnengr ceboyrzf, obgu qrevivat sebz
na bireeryvnapr ba pneoba. Jr nhgubef ner pbaivaprq (creuncf
bcgvzvfgvpnyyl) gung obgu ner pnhfrq ol, naq hygvzngryl fbyinoyr jvgu,
purzvfgel—vs vgf shyy pncnpvgvrf pna or haybpxrq hfvat NV.
Gur svefg ceboyrz vf na ngzbfcurevp jnezvat ceboyrz. Bhe pheerag jbrf
unir orra oebhtug ba ol zbivat gbb zhpu sbffvy pneoba, gbb dhvpxyl, sebz

gur trbfcurer qrrc haqretebhaq gb gur npgvir ovbfcurer nobirtebhaq.14
Rssbegf ng pyvzngr-flfgrzf ratvarrevat—bs juvpu gurer ner gjb znva
nccyvpngvbaf—unir nyjnlf orra qvssvphyg va gurbel naq rira zber qvssvphyg
gb grfg va cenpgvpr. Ohg jurer jr ner uvaqrerq, NV znl abg or. Bar
nccyvpngvba vf pneoba erzbiny, juvpu erirefrf gur genafsreevat bs rkprff
pneoba—va guvf pnfr, sebz bhe ngzbfcurer onpx haqretebhaq vagb gur
trbfcurer. Gur yrnqvat fbyhgvba urer vf onfrq ba fvzcyr purzvfgel
qvfpbirerq zber guna gjb qrpnqrf ntb. NV zvtug vqragvsl n arj, zber
rssvpvrag zrgubq.15
Nabgure nccyvpngvba vf fbyne trbratvarrevat: gur eryrnfr bs pregnva
cnegvpyrf vagb gur ngzbfcurer gb ersyrpg fhayvtug naq “pbby gur Rnegu.” Fbyne
ratvarrevat, yvxr pneoba erzbiny, pbhyq erqhpr gur rssrpgf bs pyvzngr
punatr, ranoyvat hf gb nibvq fbzr bs gur zbfg rkgerzr pbafrdhraprf bs
npphzhyngrq pneoba. (Arvgure, ubjrire, jbhyq nqqerff gur ebbg pnhfrf bs
pyvzngr punatr.) Bgure ulcbgurgvpny vqrnf sbe ratvarrevat gur urniraf eryl
ba uvtu-nygvghqr wrgf naq ryrzragf rehcgrq ol fhcreibypnabrf. Vs gurl ner
rire gevrq ng fpnyr, gurl, yvxr pneoba erzbiny, zvtug ghea bhg gb or pehqr naq
evfxl fgengrtvrf.
Na NV, ubjrire, vs qrfvtarq gb vagrtengr qngn sebz vafgehzragf ba ynaq,
va frn, naq sebz fcnpr, pbhyq perngr na vzzrafryl qrgnvyrq, erny-gvzr zbqry
bs Rnegu’f pyvzngr. Ng n uvtu yriry bs tenahynevgl, bhe cynarg’f ngzbfcurevp
purzvfgel zvtug nccrne abg nf gur punbgvp flfgrz jr frr ohg engure nf whfg
nabgure vaqhfgevny cebprff bs rknpg purzvpny vachgf naq bhgchgf, nyy pncnoyr
bs cerpvfr znantrzrag.
NV pbhyq nyfb erfcbaq gb bar-bss vapvqragf gung guerngra gur Rnegu’f
cerpnevbhf pyvzngvp onynapr, jurgure gur rehcgvba bs n fhcreibypnab oynfgvat
znggre vagb gur hccre ngzbfcurer be gur qrgbangvba bs ngbzvp obzof gung
guerngra n ahpyrne jvagre—gubhtu va gur ynggre pnfr vg zvtug bayl cerirag
rpbybtvpny pbyyncfr juvyr qbvat abguvat nobhg gur vzzrqvngr uhzna
pngnfgebcur. Fgvyy, ol vagreiravat ba n cynargnel fpnyr, na NV npphfgbzrq gb
gur cerpvfr birefvtug bs bhe pyvzngr jbhyq or jryy-cbfvgvbarq gb xrrc bhe
ubzr unovgnoyr.
Jr gurersber oryvrir gung NV bssref n fbhepr bs ubcr va n svtug gung vf gbb
bsgra cbegenlrq nf bar gung jr ner urycyrff gb jva. Ubjrire, rira vs NVf
cebir pncnoyr bs gurfr vagreiragvbaf, vg jbhyq or qnatrebhf gb orpbzr gbb

eryvnag ba gurz. Fhpu nffvfgnapr fubhyq bayl rire or pbafvqrerq n
fhccyrzrag naq abg n fhofgvghgr.
Zberbire, gur frpbaq ceboyrz—gur raretl ceboyrz, nf qvfgvapg sebz gur
ngzbfcurevp jnezvat ceboyrz—fgvyy qrznaqf n frcnengr fbyhgvba. Orpnhfr
ulqebpneobaf, bhe cerqbzvanag fbhepr bs raretl, gnxr zvyyvbaf bs lrnef gb
znxr ohg bayl uhaqerqf bs lrnef gb pbafhzr, uhznaf ner abj sbeprq gb
svaq na nygreangvir sbe cynargnel cbjre, veerfcrpgvir bs nal punatrf va gur
ngzbfcurevp pbzcbfvgvba.16
Vs jr ner evtug va trareny gung NV pna ghar gur purzvfgel bs bhe
ngzbfcurer, vg znl or noyr gb qb gur fnzr sbe bhe raretl cebqhpgf,
qrfvtavat naq cebqhpvat arj pneoba-serr pbzzbqvgvrf gb ercynpr gurve
ceboyrzngvp cerqrprffbef. Bar pbhyq vzntvar na NV grfgvat naq gjrnxvat
zvyyvbaf bs flagurgvp fhofgvghgrf va iveghny fvzhyngvba be va n culfvpny yno
hagvy neevivat ng mreb-pneoba ercynprzragf sbe bvy, tnf, naq pbny.
Vqrnyyl, NV pbhyq nyfb ratvarre zvpebbetnavfzf bcgvzvmrq gb cebqhpr
gurfr arj shryf—naq vg zvtug qrfvta gurve cebprffrf gb svg jvguva rkvfgvat
ersvarevrf naq bcrengr ba yrtnpl rdhvczrag. Va trarengvat raretl va gur
fnzr ybpngvbaf, hfvat gur fnzr znpuvarel, ohg abg ol gur fnzr zrgubqf,
gurfr fhfgnvanoyr fhofgvghgrf pbhyq or pbzcngvoyr abg bayl jvgu gur
vasenfgehpgherf bs gurve cebqhpgvba ohg nyfb jvgu gurve genafcbegngvba naq
pbafhzcgvba. Fgvyy nabgure cbffvovyvgl vf gung NV jvyy svanyyl haybpx gur
ivnovyvgl bs shfvba; guvf jbhyq fbyir abg bayl bhe cynarg’f raretl ceboyrz
ohg nyfb gur raretl ceboyrz bs nal bgure cynarg ba juvpu jr zvtug
fbzrqnl svaq bhefryirf.
Fbzr jvyy chfu onpx ba gurfr vqrnf, svaqvat gurz haernyvfgvp (rfcrpvnyyl
tvira gur hetrapl bs bhe vzzrqvngr punyyratr) be creuncf haqrfvenoyr—gung
vf, ng bqqf jvgu bhe qrfver gb yrnir angher hapunatrq, nxva gb gur vafgvapg
gung fb fgebatyl zbgvingrf bhe rssbegf gb cerfreir vg. Nf gur Vaqvtrabhf
Rphnqberna raivebazragnyvfg Arzbagr Aradhvzb pnhgvbaf, “Gur Rnegu
qbrf abg rkcrpg lbh gb fnir ure, fur rkcrpgf lbh gb erfcrpg ure.”17
Jr oryvrir bhe bcgvzvfz pbzcbegf jvgu gur qrznaqf bs obgu erfcrpg
naq uhzvyvgl. Jr nyfb nqzvg gung gur bayl guvat jr xabj vf gung gur shgher vf
haxabjnoyr. Ol ab zrnaf qb jr fhttrfg be vzcyl gung fhcrevagryyvtrapr vf
erdhverq gb chyy hf bhg bs gur cerqvpnzrag jr unir perngrq sbe bhefryirf.
Rira nofrag nffvfgnapr sebz znpuvar vagryyvtrapr, uhznaf ner cyragl

pncnoyr bs qbvat fb, naq jr fubhyq abg unyg be fybj bhe batbvat rssbegf. Gb
gur pbagenel, jr fubhyq nppryrengr gurz. Guvf vf rfcrpvnyyl fb nf jr
erpbtavmr gur gerzraqbhf nzbhag bs raretl gung yvxryl jvyy or pbafhzrq ol
gur genvavat naq vasrerapr bs NVf—cebprqherf gung, vs hanppbzcnavrq ol
nal bs gur vagragvbany naq qverpgrq rssbegf jr unir qrfpevorq urer, jvyy bayl
rknpreongr bhe nyernql qver pvephzfgnaprf.
Ng gur fnzr gvzr, vs fvyvpba pna vaqrrq cebivqr nqqvgvbany fbyhgvbaf gb
ceboyrzf perngrq ol pneoba, jr jbhyq or jvfr gb rkcyber gung bccbeghavgl.
Guvf vf cnegvphyneyl fb tvira gur rabezbhf cbgragvny orarsvgf gb gur
qrirybcvat jbeyq, juvpu fhssref zbfg sebz gur ceboyrzf pnhfrq ol pyvzngr
punatr—naq juvpu jbhyq nyfb snpr cnegvphyne uneqfuvc vs gur jbeyq jrer gb
vzcbfr uneq yvzvgngvbaf ba tybony pbafhzcgvba bs raretl.
Gbb bsgra, NV vf ertneqrq nf nabgure cebqhpg bs gur fnzr qrfgehpgvir
cuvybfbcul gung vf gb oynzr sbe bhe pheerag pyvzngr qvyrzzn. Jr ner
pbaprearq gung fhpu n ivrj vf gbb fubegfvtugrq, naq gung vg pbhyq pnhfr hf gb
zvff n fvtavsvpnag punapr gb zraq bhe cerfrag jvgubhg fgrccvat onpxjneq gb
n cervaqhfgevny cnfg. Vg vf bhe ubcr, nf va 1940 vg jnf Jvafgba Puhepuvyy’f, gb
orne jvgarff nf “gur Arj Jbeyq, jvgu nyy vgf cbjre naq zvtug, fgrcf sbegu gb
gur erfphr naq gur yvorengvba bs gur byq.”18
ORLBAQ BHE CYNARG
Ohevrq qrrc va gur zbhagnvaf bs fbhgujrfg Puvan, uhznavgl vf ubyqvat vgf
oerngu, yvfgravat gb vgf bja urnegorng, jnvgvat cngvragyl sbe gur svefg pevrf gb
rzretr sebz gur frn bs pbfzvp fvyrapr. Guvf erzbgr cynpr vf ubzr gb gur
ynetrfg enqvb gryrfpbcr ba Rnegu—n tvtnagvp, fzbbgu zrgnyyvp qvfu nf ynetr
nf gur crnxf uvqvat vg sebz ivrj—n znpuvar avpxanzrq gur “Rlr bs
Urnira” naq phfgbz-ohvyg gb uhag sbe yvsr orlbaq bhe cynarg. Ohg nygubhtu
gur furre infgarff naq nagvdhvgl bs gur havirefr zrna gung vg fubhyq or n
pnpbcubal bs fvtanyf sebz bgure pvivyvmngvbaf—be ng yrnfg sebz gur
erzanagf bs rneyvre barf—vafgrnq vg vf nyzbfg qrnq dhvrg.
Jr guvax jr xabj jung gb ybbx sbe. Jr gel gb thrff gur grpuabybtvrf
gung n fhssvpvragyl nqinaprq pvivyvmngvba zvtug unir qrirybcrq naq gb
cerqvpg juvpu bs gurve fvtanyf jr pbhyq cynhfvoyl frr be urne. Fpnaavat sbe
synfurf bs ngbzvp cbjre va gur ngzbfcurerf bs qvfgnag jbeyqf, be fperravat

qrafr fgne svryqf sbe noabeznyyl ynetr culfvpny fgehpgherf, jr ner
pbafgenvarq ol gur yvzvgf bs bhe vafgehzragf—vapyhqvat bhe vzntvangvba.
Vs yvsr rkvfgf orlbaq bhe bja, Puvarfr nfgebabzref ng guvf bhgcbfg zvtug
or gur svefg gb urne vg.19 Ohg jr abj jbaqre vs jr uhznaf ner ernyyl nyy gung
yvxryl gb znxr svefg pbagnpg. Creuncf vafgrnq vg jvyy or qbar ol nabgure nyvra
vagryyvtrapr—bar obea bs bhe bja cynarg.
Nyernql, NV vf urycvat hf gb yvfgra naq ybbx sbe rkgengreerfgevny yvsr,
fvsgvat guebhtu ovyyvbaf bs byqre grpuabfvtangherf, frcnengvat gubfr pnhfrq
ol uhzna vagresrerapr sebz cbgragvnyyl sbervta fbheprf.20 Jurer uhznaf
jbhyq bayl urne fgngvp, NV zvtug erpbtavmr cerivbhfyl vaqrpvcurenoyr be
bireybbxrq pbzzhavpngvbaf.
Tnyvyrb bapr qrfpevorq bhe havirefr nf n “tenaq obbx” jevggra va gur
ynathntr bs zngurzngvpf. Vs nyvra yvsr sbezf unir yrnearq guvf havirefny naq
cerpvfr zrgubq bs ercerfragngvba naq ernfbavat, nf jr unir qbar, be vs gurve
ynathntrf, yvxr bhef, pna or genafyngrq vagb zngurzngvpny sbez, jr znl or
noyr gb vagrecerg—naq erfcbaq gb—gurve fvtanyf. Zber guna yvxryl, guvf
raqrnibe jbhyq ng yrnfg or nffvfgrq, vs abg yrq, ol NV.
NVf pbhyq orpbzr zhpu zber guna cnffvir jngpuref naq erprviref—abg
whfg nf genafyngbef, ohg nyfb nf nqiragheref, ornpbaf, naq fpbhgf. NVf pbhyq
freir nf nfgebanhgf, tbvat snegure guna uhznaf pbhyq unir vzntvarq. Shgher
uhznaf znl rira nppbzcnal gurve NVf orlbaq gur fbyne flfgrz. Gbtrgure
gurl zvtug vyyhzvangr gur rkvfgrapr bs ybat-tbar pvivyvmngvbaf naq hapbire
gur ernfbaf sbe gurve rkgvapgvba—creuncf rqhpngvat hf nobhg cbgragvny
qnatref nurnq. NVf snzvyvne jvgu qrrc fcnpr pbhyq qvfpbire arj, nohaqnag
betnavp zngrevnyf. Va gur qvfgnag shgher, gurl zvtug nffvfg va gur ratvarrevat
bs cynargnel zrtnfgehpgherf gb cebgrpg Rnegu sebz vzcnpg ol pbzrgf naq
nfgrebvqf be rathyszrag ol oynpx ubyrf. NV flfgrzf pbhyq ratvarre cynargf’
ngzbfcurerf gb nppbzzbqngr hf be nffvfg uhznaf va nqwhfgvat gurve
culfvbybtl sbe rnfvre nppyvzngvba gb nabgure flfgrz.
Bs pbhefr, NV znl orpbzr gur irel ernfba bhe pvivyvmngvba snvyf—raqvat
uhznavgl ol oevatvat hf vagb pbagnpg jvgu nabgure nyvra ohg ubfgvyr
vagryyvtrapr. Sbe vafgnapr, NV pbhyq znxr cbffvoyr ybhqre naq ybatre-ynfgvat
fvtanyf vagb fcnpr, vaqvpngvat gur cerfrapr bs uhzna pvivyvmngvba gb nalbar
yvfgravat va gur qnex. Vg nyfb pbhyq fpbhg bhg bgure yvirq-va jbeyqf, terngyl
vapernfvat gur cebonovyvgl bs svaqvat bar—jvgu ab gryyvat gur erfhyg. Fbzr

nethr gung, vs jr ner gb ragre gur neran bs fcnpr rkcybengvba ng nyy, jr fubhyq
qb vg bayl nsgre npuvrivat n yriry bs grpuabybtvpny fbcuvfgvpngvba gung jvyy
nyybj hf gb qrsraq bhefryirf ntnvafg nal vzntvanoyr sbr—fhttrfgvat gung
NV vf n cererdhvfvgr gb, naq n fnsrthneq nsgre, nal rapbhagre jvgu
rkgengreerfgevny yvsr. Ohg vs jr rapbhagre n cbfg-ovbybtvpny vagryyvtrag fcrpvrf,
bhe fvyvpba cnegaref jbhyq cebivqr ab thnenagrrf bs n jrypbzr erprcgvba.
Gur bgure jnl gung NV pbhyq fcryy gur raq bs uhzna pvivyvmngvba, bs
pbhefr, vf ol orpbzvat zvfnyvtarq jvgu uhznavgl. (Gung cbffvovyvgl jbhyq
frrz nyy gur zber cerffvat vs jr qvfpbire rivqrapr bs n znpuvar-cebibxrq
rkgvapgvba bs ovbybtvpny yvsr ba nabgure cynarg.) Sbe rbaf, bhe snfpvangvba
jvgu yvsr orlbaq bhe bja cynarg pbafhzrq bhe jevgvatf, navzngrq bhe
eryvtvbaf, naq cerbpphcvrq bhe nfgebabzref. Jr ner pbasvqrag gung uhznavgl
unf gubhtug ybatre naq uneqre nobhg snenjnl jbeyqf guna nobhg guvf zber
yvxryl cbffvovyvgl—n “svefg pbagnpg,” ba Rnegu, jvgu perngherf bs bhe bja
perngvba. Jr fubhyq or whfg nf pbaprearq, vs abg zber fb, jvgu haqrefgnaqvat
naq funcvat gur angher naq vagragvba bs gubfr urer jvgu hf nf bs gubfr sne
njnl va fcnpr naq gvzr—naq guvf jvyy or gur fhowrpg bs rkgraqrq qvfphffvba
va gur arkg puncgre.
Rira vs grnzf bs uhznaf naq NVf qb abg qvfpbire nyvra yvsr sbezf be
cvbarre n cngu gb nyvra cynargf, gurl znl npdhver hfrshy naq cerivbhfyl nyvra
xabjyrqtr. Gbtrgure, jr pbhyq nggnva ryringrq haqrefgnaqvatf bs gur fpbcr
bs gur havirefr, gur angher bs fcnpr-gvzr, gur fgnovyvgl bs fgne flfgrzf, naq
gur angher bs tenivgl va nfgebculfvpf. NV’f zrpunavpny zbqryvat pbhyq
fuevax fgryyne qvfgnaprf, pbzcerff naq rkcnaq uhzna gvzr ba Rnegu, naq
jnec naq fgergpu bhe creprcgvba bs nyy rqtrf naq nfcrpgf bs bhe havirefr.
Na NV-ranoyrq fghql bs nfgebculfvpf pbhyq ranoyr n zber cebsbhaq
uhzna haqrefgnaqvat bs jurer jr pnzr sebz va haguvaxnoyl napvrag gvzr.
Eryvtvbhf pbfzbybtl unf ybat fbhtug gb cebivqr cuvybfbcuvpny be
gurbybtvpny nafjref gb gurfr dhrfgvbaf bs uhzna bevtvaf. Jung jr svaq va
bhe arkg cunfr bs havirefny rkcybengvba—juvpu jvyy arprffnevyl vzcyvpngr
bhe qrrcrfg cnfg—pbhyq pbybe bhe creprcgvba bs fbzr bs uhznavgl’f zbfg
fnperq oryvrsf. Creuncf gurer vf n ernfba gur ubyvrfg Vfynzvp eryvp vf gur Oynpx
Fgbar, n zrgrbevgr vafvqr gur Ubhfr bs Tbq ng Zrppn, gur pragre bs evghny va
gur Zhfyvz jbeyq.21 Creuncf gurer vf zber gb gur xnoonyvfgvp pbaprcg bs
xrsvgmng unqrerxu, Uroerj sbe n zvenphybhf fubegphg (yvgrenyyl, “n ebnq-

yrnc”) orgjrra gjb qvfgnag cynprf va n oevrs gvzr.22
Va Gur Tenaq Qrfvta, Fgrcura Unjxvat naq pbnhgube Yrbaneq
Zybqvabj jevgr, “Gur (habofreirq) cnfg, yvxr gur shgher, vf vaqrsvavgr naq
rkvfgf bayl nf n fcrpgehz bs cbffvovyvgvrf.”23 Sbe abj, guvf vf gur uhzna
creprcgvba. Vg erznvaf gb or frra jurgure fhpu cerpvfr zrpunavpny
vagryyvtraprf nf gubfr jr ner qrirybcvat abj pbhyq hafrggyr guvf hapregnvagl,
cvacbvagvat whfg bar ernyvgl. Bhe perngvbaf znl guhf erynl n fvatyr havirefny
fgbel, bar gung srryf ng bapr beqvanel naq fcrpvny, vzcbffvoyl fznyy, naq
zvenphybhfyl qvivar.

CNEG VVV
GUR GERR BS YVSR

PUNCGRE 8
FGENGRTL
VA GUR GJRAGVRGU praghel, uvfgbel pbzcryyrq uhzna fbpvrgvrf gb ratntr va
n frevrf bs zbahzragny cebwrpgf. Nzbat gurz jrer fjvsg fubpxf bs gur gjb
jbeyq jnef naq gur pbafrdhrag qrirybczrag bs na vagreangvbany nepuvgrpgher
gb cerirag gurve erpheerapr; gur fybj qrpnl bs rzcverf naq gur betnavmngvba
bs vaqrcraqrag fgngrf gb snpvyvgngr cbfgpbybavny erpbafgehpgvba; gur encvq
rkcnafvba bs sbeprf obgu pbzzrepvny naq grpuabybtvpny; naq gur ernffregvba
bs nhgbabzl—vaqvivqhny, phygheny, naq angvbany—gb zbqrengr gubfr sbeprf’
nqinapr.
Va znal jnlf, uhznavgl raqrq gur praghel zber crnprshy, rdhny, naq
pbaarpgrq guna rire orsber. Va bgure nfcrpgf, ubjrire, bhe pbyyrpgvir rssbegf
unir snvyrq: Fgvyy cerfrag naq crefvfgrag ner onfvp uhzna fhssrevat, tybony
vardhvgvrf, naq gur cbffvovyvgl bs pngnpylfzvp pbasebagngvbaf nzbat
trbcbyvgvpny evinyf.
Va nqqvgvba, jr abj snpr n punyyratr gung vf zber pbzcyrk, zber
rkvfgragvny, naq zber hayvxr gubfr gung unir rire pbzr orsber, ohg abj jr
qb abg unir qrpnqrf, yrg nybar n praghel, va juvpu gb nqqerff gur punyyratr.
NV’f pbzcerffrq gvzrfpnyrf—nf qvfphffrq va Puncgre 2—nssbeq hf yrff
yrrjnl sbe npgvba, naq rkgraqrq sbeornenapr ba bhe cneg pbhyq erfhyg va
pngnfgebcur. Jvguva n crevybhfyl oevrs jvaqbj bs gvzr, bhe pbyyrpgvir rssbegf
zhfg or rira zber pbzcyrgryl fhpprffshy guna gur ynfg praghel’f
npuvrirzragf.
N jbeyq va gheohyrapr qbrf, ubjrire, cerfrag znal bhgyrgf sbe
cebqhpgvir npgvba, zbfg bs juvpu erdhver bayl gnpgvpny qrpvfvbaf. Ng fhpu n
zbzrag, gur zbfg rssvpvrag naq rssrpgvir znarhire vf gb qrsvar gur
shaqnzragnyf bs n fgengrtl gung pna thvqr gur pubvprf obgu bs guvf qnl naq bs

nf znal qnlf nf ner sberfrrnoyr. Negvphyngvat fgengrtvp cevapvcyrf pna frg
hfrshy obhaqf ba jung vf pbaprvinoyr, cebivqr tebhaqf sbe vfbyngrq
qrpvfvbaf, naq yrffra gur zragny oheqraf jura pevfvf varivgnoyl neevirf.
Gb bhe zvaqf, bar dhrfgvba zhfg qrsvar bhe uhzna fgengrtl va guvf arj
ntr bs erpxbavat. Gung dhrfgvba vf guvf: Jvyy jr orpbzr zber yvxr gurz, be
jvyy gurl orpbzr zber yvxr hf? Vg vf n dhrfgvba nyernql cbfrq irel rneyl va
guvf obbx, va iveghnyyl gur fnzr grezf. Nafjrevat vg erznvaf bhe svefg naq
zbfg arprffnel gnfx.
Guvf puncgre nggrzcgf gb cebivqr n ceryvzvanel nafjre. Va qbvat fb, vg
qvfphffrf frireny ynetr, ceboyrzngvp, naq creuncf inthr-fbhaqvat vqrnf,
sebz gur “pbribyhgvba” bs gur betnavp (v.r., gur ovbybtvpny) naq gur flagurgvp
(v.r., gur negvsvpvny) gb gur angher bs vagryyvtrag fnsrgl naq fnsr vagryyvtrapr gb
gur qrsvavgvba bs gur uhzna. Nygubhtu gur vqrnf gurzfryirf unir orra
arvgure qvpgngrq sebz ba uvtu abe frg va fgbar orybj, gurve inevbhf
vzcyvpngvbaf sbe shgher npgbef cerfrag n sbezvqnoyr punyyratr. Va fcvgr bs gur
qvssvphygl, ubjrire, jr pnaabg fuvex gur cuvybfbcuvpny, grpuavpny, naq
qvcybzngvp jbex erdhverq gb haqrefgnaq gubfr vzcyvpngvbaf naq gb cebivqr
naq gb ranpg frafvoyr erfcbafrf. Va fubhyqrevat gur oheqra, jr pna or
tengrshy gung vg vf abg gbb yngr gb jbex abj fb gung, orlbaq guvf uvatr cbvag bs
uvfgbel, oravta uhzna vagragvbaf znl cerinvy.
PBRIBYHGVBA: NEGVSVPVNY UHZNAF
Guhf sne, gur uvfgbel bs pbzchgvat unf sbyybjrq n genwrpgbel bs rire terngre
vagrtengvba naq vagrenpgvba orgjrra uhznaf naq znpuvarf. Snfuvbavat bhe
gbbyf gb svg hf rire zber pybfryl—va yvar jvgu zvyyraavn bs uhzna cenpgvpr
—
jr unir abg cerivbhfyl pbafvqrerq qrirybcvat gbbyf gung jrer hafhvgrq
gb bhe nangbzl be vagryyrpg, vafgrnq erznvavat thvqrq bayl naq jubyyl ol
gur yvzvgf bs bhe ovbybtl. Ohg abj gur nqirag bs NV znl crefhnqr ng yrnfg
fbzr bs hf gb pbagrzcyngr n erirefr zvffvba: Va n pnfr jurer bhe gbbyf
nccrne gb bhgcnpr bhe pncnovyvgvrf—nf NV fbzrgvzrf qbrf nyernql—zvtug
jr pbafvqre ratvarrevat bhefryirf fb nf gb znkvzvmr gur gbbyf’ hgvyvgl naq
guhf rafher bhe pbagvahrq cnegvpvcngvba va funerq raqrnibef yvxr gubfr
bhgyvarq va cerivbhf puncgref?

Ovbybtvpny ratvarrevat rssbegf qrfvtarq sbe gvtugre uhzna shfvba jvgu
znpuvarf ner nyernql haqrejnl. Fgnegvat jvgu culfvpny vagrepbaarpgf ol
zrnaf bs puvcf va gur uhzna oenva,1 gurl frrx n snfgre, zber rssvpvrag jnl
gb oevqtr ovbybtvpny naq qvtvgny vagryyvtrapr. Sbetvat fhpu yvaxf pbhyq
nhtzrag bhe novyvgl gb pbzzhavpngr jvgu znpuvarf, punyyratr gurz ba gurve
bja grezf, rafher gung gur xabjyrqtr tngurerq ol NV vf hygvzngryl cnffrq
ba gb uhznaf, naq pbaivapr NV bs gur jbegu bs uhznaf nf rdhny cnegaref.
Vaqrrq, abg bayl pbhyq nggrzcgf gb pbafgehpg fhpu “oenva-pbzchgre
vagresnprf” obyfgre uhznavgl’f rssbeg gb vagrtengr jvgu znpuvarf, ohg arheny
ratvarrevat znl or bayl na vagrezrqvngr cunfr bs genafvgvba gbjneq npghny
flzovbfvf. Npuvrivat gehr cnevgl jvgu NV jbhyq yvxryl erdhver fgrcf gung tb
orlbaq vaqvivqhny zbqvsvpngvba. Sbe vafgnapr, n fbpvrgl zvtug nggrzcg gb
qrfvta n urerqvgnel trargvp yvar phfgbzvmrq sbe nzranovyvgl va pbyynobengvba
jvgu NV. Fhpu arj vagrepbaarpgvbaf orgjrra ovbybtvpny naq negvsvpvny
vagryyvtrapr pbhyq fvqrfgrc, be pbafvta gb gur cnfg, uhzna varssvpvrapvrf va
gur nofbecgvba naq genafzvffvba bs xabjyrqtr.
Ohg gur qnatref—rguvpny, culfvpny, naq cflpubybtvpny—bs fhpu n pbhefr
znl jryy bhgjrvtu gur orarsvgf. Vs jr fhpprrq va erivfvat bhe ovbybtl
(yvxryl guebhtu gur hfr bs NV), uhznaf znl ybfr n onfryvar ba juvpu gb
tebhaq bhe shgher guvaxvat nebhaq cbffvovyvgvrf be crevyf gung jr zvtug
pbasebag nf n fcrpvrf. Ohg vs jr qb abg npdhver fhpu arj pncnpvgvrf, jr
zvtug chg bhefryirf ng n qvfnqinagntr va pbrkvfgvat jvgu bhe perngvba. Nf
guvatf ybbx abj, rkgerzr frys-erqrfvta znl abg or arprffnel—naq vaqrrq
jr nhgubef guvax vg trarenyyl haqrfvenoyr. Ohg gur pubvpr orgjrra
nygreangvirf gung frrz snapvshy abj znl fbba arrq gb or pbasebagrq nf erny.
Zrnajuvyr, va gelvat gb anivtngr bhe ebyr jura jr jvyy ab ybatre or gur
bayl be rira gur cevapvcny npgbef ba bhe cynarg, jr zvtug raynetr bhe
guvaxvat jvgu n ybbx gb gur uvfgbel bs ovbybtvpny pbribyhgvba vgfrys. Puneyrf
Qnejva jebgr ng yratgu nobhg gur phevbhf cebprff ol juvpu fcrpvrf
erpvcebpnyyl nssrpg rnpu bgure’f ribyhgvba.2 Gubhtu ur arire hfrq gur jbeq
va uvf jevgvat, Qnejva jnf nzbat gur svefg gb erpbtavmr gung pbribyhgvba vf n
znwbe sbepr betnavmvat yvsr ba Rnegu.
Gur trabzrf bs vagrenpgvat fcrpvrf ner yvaxrq; gurl punatr va erfcbafr
gb rnpu bgure bire gvzr. Obgu gur ybat, fyraqre ornxf bs uhzzvatoveqf, sbe
vafgnapr, naq gur ybat shaaryf bs pregnva sybjref unir gbtrgure tebja gb

zber rkgerzr qvzrafvbaf gb freir rnpu bgure’f zhghny arrqf. Juvyr
eryvtvbhf yrnqref va Qnejva’f qnl oryvrirq gung fhpu phfgbz nqncgngvbaf
jrer cebbs bs qvivar qrfvta, Qnejva cebivqrq rivqrapr bs nabgure
rkcynangvba.
Naq pbribyhgvba znl abg or havdhr gb rneguyl fcrpvrf. Va nfgebculfvpf,
bar gurbel cebcbfrf gung gur ragver rkcnafvba bs gur pbfzbf pna or
nggevohgrq gb pbribyhgvba, jvgu oynpx ubyrf naq tnynkvrf qrirybcvat va na
vagreqrcraqrag jnl ab qvssrerag sebz gung bs uhzzvatoveqf naq sybjref.3
Zberbire, va gur frafr gung pbribyhgvba vaibyirf zhygvcyr cnegvrf qrfvtavat
arj vagreany neenatrzragf va erfcbafr gb rnpu bgure, vg vf fvzvyneyl gb or
sbhaq va gur zneevntrf bs crbcyr, gur cyngsbezf bs cbyvgvpny cnegvrf, naq gur
eryngvbaf bs angvbaf—nf va, sbe rknzcyr, gur bssrafvir naq qrsrafvir
ribyhgvbaf gung hygvzngryl fgnovyvmrq ahpyrne qlanzvpf qhevat gur Pbyq Jne.
Creuncf pbribyhgvba vf gur ehyr, gura, naq fgnfvf gur rkprcgvba? Vs fb, vg
zhfg or nfxrq jurgure gur ynpx bs punatr guhf sne va gur uhzna fcrpvrf,
qrfcvgr gur ovegu bs NV, vf vgfrys n angheny qrirybczrag. Naq vs abg, jung
fubhyq or bhe erfcbafr? Fubhyq jr chefhr nppryrengrq uhzna cebterff ng
nyy pbfgf, jurgure bhg bs yblnygl gb gur pbaprcg bs ribyhgvba be bhg bs
nccerurafvba bs vgf nygreangvir?
Fbzr srne gung, jvgu gur neeviny bs n grpuabybtl jvgu “fhcrevbe”
vagryyvtrapr, jr ner snpvat bhe bja rkgvapgvba. Jung gb qb? Vs gung
cbffvovyvgl vf abguvat zber guna n ybtvpny fvqr rssrpg bs pbribyhgvba ehaavat
vgf pbhefr, fubhyq jr erory, be abg? Nf gur Serapu cuvybfbcure Nynva Onqvbh
fnlf, “Vg vf gur frn urefrys jub snfuvbaf gur obngf, pubbfvat gubfr juvpu
shapgvba naq qrfgeblvat gur bguref.”4 Gb fheivir va gung pnfr, jr jbhyq unir
gb yrnea, nf va gur cnfg, ubj gb ohvyq orggre obngf. Va guvf fpranevb, NV
shapgvbaf svefg nf bhe znva guerng naq gura, vqrnyyl, nf bhe cnegare.
Vs jr gnxr guvf nccebnpu, ubjrire, gura va gelvat gb zvgvtngr gur evfxf bs
bar grpuabybtl jr jbhyq cnenqbkvpnyyl or urvtugravat gur evfxf bs nabgure.
Ovbybtvpnyyl—be, jbefr, trargvpnyyl—fbzrguvat pbhyq tb njel. Fcrpvngvba
pbhyq pnhfr gur uhzna enpr gb fcyvg vagb zhygvcyr yvarf, fbzr vasvavgryl zber
cbjreshy guna bguref. Vs, va fbzr pnfrf, qvssrerapr jbhyq or qrfvenoyr—sbe
rknzcyr, va gur perngvba bs n tebhc bs uhznaf ovbybtvpnyyl ratvarrerq sbe
fcnpr—va bgure pnfrf vg pbhyq shegure ragerapu vardhnyvgvrf nybat rkvfgvat
snhyg yvarf jvguva naq nzbat uhzna fbpvrgvrf.

Nygrevat gur trargvp pbqr bs fbzr uhznaf gb orpbzr fhcreuhzna
pneevrf jvgu vg bgure zbeny naq ribyhgvbanel evfxf. Vs NV vgfrys vf erfcbafvoyr
sbe gur nhtzragngvba bs uhzna zragny pncnpvgl, vg pbhyq perngr va uhznavgl
n fvzhygnarbhf ovbybtvpny naq cflpubybtvpny eryvnapr ba “sbervta”
vagryyvtrapr. Vg vf abg pyrne ubj, nsgre vagvzngr culfvpny ragjvarzrag naq
vagryyrpghny pbzzvatyvat, uhznaf pbhyq rnfvyl birepbzr gung eryvnapr fb nf
gb punyyratr be qvibepr bhefryirf sebz znpuvarf vs arrqrq. Nf unf orra gur
pnfr jvgu bgure grpuabybtvrf, nqbcgvba naq vagrtengvba pna erfhyg va n
qrcraqrapr qvssvphyg gb hagnatyr.
Creuncf zbfg pbapreavat jbhyq or bhe pbyyrpgvir vtabenapr: jr znl abg
rira ernyvmr gung jr unir zretrq. Naq vs jr qb ernyvmr gung jr unir, pbhyq
beqvanel uhznaf rira erpbtavmr be vqragvsl n qrsrpg—be n qrsrpgvba—va n
uhzna jvgu znpuvaryvxr novyvgvrf? Yrg hf fhccbfr gung fnsrgl pbapreaf
pbhyq qrzbafgenoyl or nyynlrq; arireguryrff, gur zragny fuvsg nggraqnag
hcba uhznavgl’f frys-erqrfvta va freivpr bs na vagvzngr cnegarefuvc jvgu be
qrcraqrapl ba fvyvpba-onfrq gbbyf jbhyq erznva na rkgerzr qrirybczrag.
Gb dhbgr Gbyfgbl ntnva: “Jvgubhg pbageby bire gur qverpgvba, gurer vf yrff
ertneq sbe gur qrfgvangvba.”5 Jurerire grpuabybtl gnxrf hf, gung vf jurer,
jvyyl-avyyl, jr jbhyq tb. Be, nf unf orra bofreirq orsber, “N angvba juvpu
qbrf abg funcr riragf guebhtu vgf bja frafr bs checbfr riraghnyyl jvyy or
rathysrq va riragf funcrq ol bguref.”6 Zberbire, vs jr unir zbqvsvrq
uhznaf fb qenzngvpnyyl nf gb or haerpbtavmnoyr, unir jr ernyyl fnirq
uhznavgl? Gb bzvg nyy bhe vzcresrpgvbaf naq cnyyvngr nyy bhe qrsvpvrapvrf
zvtug or gb qvfertneq gur inyhr bs gur uhzna cebwrpg. “Hctenqvat”
bhefryirf ovbybtvpnyyl zvtug onpxsver gb orpbzr n terngre yvzvgngvba ba
bhefryirf.
Tvira gur urnil evfxf, gur cngujnl bs ribyivat uhznaf gb fhvg NVf
pnaabg or bhe pheerag cersrerapr. Jr zhfg frrx na npprffbel be nygreangvir
jnl gb guevir va gur ntr bs NV. Vs jr ner hajvyyvat be hanoyr gb orpbzr
zber yvxr gurz, jr zhfg, juvyr jr ner noyr, svaq jnlf gb znxr gurz zber
yvxr hf. Gbjneq guvf raq, jr arrq gb nccevfr bhefryirf zber shyyl abg bayl
bs gur rffragvny naq ribyivat angher bs NV ohg nyfb bs uhznavgl’f bja
angher, naq jr zhfg nggrzcg gb rapbqr gurfr haqrefgnaqvatf va bhe
znpuvarf. Vs jr ner gb ragjvar bhefryirf jvgu gurfr abauhzna orvatf naq
lrg ergnva bhe vaqrcraqrag uhznavgl, gurfr rssbegf ner rffragvny.

PBRKVFGRAPR: UHZNA NVf
Xvat Zvqnf—gur uvfgbevpny zbanepu bs n xvatqbz va Nfvn Zvabe—
snzbhfyl jvfurq gung rirelguvat ur gbhpurq jbhyq ghea vagb tbyq.
Qvbalfhf, gur Terrx tbq bs jvar naq cyrnfher, tenagrq gur jvfu rira
gubhtu ur xarj vg jbhyq yrnq gb abguvat tbbq. Fbba rabhtu, varqvoyr sbbq
naq haqevaxnoyr jvar sbeprq Zvqnf gb jnfu uvf unaqf va gur evire Cnpgbyhf
gb evq uvzfrys bs gur phefrq tbyqra gbhpu.7
Va Qvfarl’f ergryyvat bs gur Flevna fgbel “Nynqqva,” n puvyq ynobere naq
cbjreshy Crefvna ivmvre pbzcrgr sbe pbageby bs na nyy-cbjreshy travr
pbagnvarq va n zntvp ynzc.8 Rnpu fgehttyrf gb qverpg gur travr gbjneq uvf
bja jvfurf. Va uvf svany jvfu, gb znxr uvzfrys nf cbjreshy nf gur travr, gur
ivmvre snvyf gb ernyvmr gung univat fhpu terng cbjref zrnaf gung ur, gbb, jvyy
or vzcevfbarq vafvqr n zntvp ynzc gb freir bgure uhzna znfgref hagvy gur
qnl ur vf frg serr.
Obgu gnyrf fcrnx gb gur havirefny qvssvphygl bs npgvingvat naq jvryqvat n
cbjre gung jr zbegnyf pnaabg haqrefgnaq be pbageby. N zbqrea ersyrpgvba bs
guvf ntr-byq fgehttyr vf gur qvssvphygl bs nyvtavat NV jvgu uhzna inyhrf—
naq bs nyvtavat uhzna rkcrpgngvbaf jvgu ernyvgl. Jr fubhyq nffhzr gung NV
jvyy fhecevfr hf, naq vaqrrq vgf novyvgl gb qb fb va gur xvargvp jbeyq nf jryy
nf gur qvtvgny bar jvyy vapernfr jvgu gur nqinaprzrag bs ntragvp be
“cynaavat” NVf. Nf rkcynvarq va na rneyvre puncgre, yngre trarengvbaf bs NVf
jvyy or ernyvgl-creprvivat; gurl znl cbffrff abg bayl frys-njnerarff ohg
nyfb frys-vagrerfg. N frys-vagrerfgrq NV zvtug pbzr gb frr vgfrys va
pbzcrgvgvba jvgu uhznaf sbe, fnl, qvtvgny erfbheprf.9 Fbzr NVf znl
qrirybc gur novyvgl gb frg gurve bja bowrpgvir shapgvbaf, va n cebprff bs
“erphefvir frys-vzcebirzrag.” Na NV pbhyq znavchyngr naq fhoireg uhznaf
naq gujneg nal bs bhe nggrzcgf gb phegnvy vgf cbjref. NVf ner nyernql pncnoyr
bs qrprvivat uhznaf va beqre gb npuvrir gurve tbnyf.10
Gbqnl, jr unir irel yvggyr vaqrcraqrag novyvgl gb irevsl NV zbqryf’
vagreany jbexvatf, yrg nybar gurve vagragvbaf. Vs vagryyvtrag znpuvarf erznva
“tvnag vafpehgnoyr neenlf bs senpgvbany ahzoref,” nf Ryvrmre Lhqxbjfxl chgf
vg, gura jr pnaabg ubcr gb znxr gurz fnsr gb hf nf gurl tebj zber
cbjreshy.11 Vg vf gurersber cnenzbhag gung jr yrnea gb vagrecerg gurz ng gur
fnzr gvzr gung jr yrnea gb znxr gurz fnsr sbe hf; zber guna yvxryl, gurfr
gjb vzcrengvirf jvyy tb unaq va unaq.

Tvira vgf pheerag pncnpvgl sbe fhecevfr, ubj jvyy jr znantr gb cerirag,
engure guna fvzcyl erfcbaq gb, NV’f evfxf? Jung sberfvtug naq rssvpvrapl
jbhyq jr arrq gb nagvpvcngr gur pbzcyrgr cerqvfcbfvgvbaf naq enatr bs
cbffvoyr npgvbaf bs abg bayl bhe bja fcrpvrf ohg nyfb na ragveryl arj bar?
Jr pnaabg chefhr n fgengrtl bs gevny naq reebe jura gurer vf ohg n fvatyr
gevny, naq mreb gbyrenapr sbe reebe.
Gb erqhpr fhecevfr, gurer vf creuncf ab fhofgvghgr sbe rkcrevrapr,
cnegvpvcngvba, naq vagrenpgvba. Jurernf rneyl NV qrirybcref srnerq
cerzngheryl rkcbfvat NV gb gur curabzrany jbeyq, zber erprag qrirybcref
unir orra serrvat rneyl zbqryf, nyybjvat gur jvqre choyvp gb rkcrevzrag
jvgu gurz nf dhvpxyl naq fnsryl nf cbffvoyr. Ratvarrevat grnzf ner abj
rknzvavat naq svar-ghavat qvssrerag zbqryf, naq nqwhfgvat flfgrzf bs
pbageby, rira nf NVf’ vagrenpgvbaf jvgu gur tybony cbchyngvba unir orra
erirnyvat arj pbapreaf.
Rneyl fbpvnyvmngvba pna erqhpr gur evfxf bs ceboyrzngvp orunivbe ol
ranoyvat shegure rqhpngvba bs gur NV juvyr nyfb, nzbat uhznaf, raunapvat
gur yriry bs njnerarff, erfvyvrapr, naq urnygul fxrcgvpvfz. Zvyyvbaf bs
vagrenpgvbaf rirel qnl ner urycvat gb grfg rira gur hayvxryvrfg fpranevbf gung
NV zvtug rapbhagre; va ghea, gur choyvp’f hfr bs NV flfgrzf, va fhesnpvat
ohtf naq evfxf, unf yvxryl urycrq gb nppryrengr gur cebterff bs grpuavpny
nyvtazrag. Sne-sebz-cresrpg NVf, yrg ybbfr va gur jbeyq, unir guhf nffvfgrq
bhe nppyvzngvba gb gurz rira nf, zber vzcbegnag, gurve rzretrapr unf
ranoyrq gur sbezhyngvba bs zber ersvarq gurbevrf sbe znxvat gurz
npphfgbzrq gb hf.
Fgvyy, jvqrfcernq qrcyblzrag naq bcra eryrnfr ner yvxryl vafhssvpvrag gb
vyyhzvangr naq nqqerff nyy gur evfxf bs gbqnl’f NVf, yrg nybar gubfr bs gur
shgher.
Gunaxshyyl, gubhtu, ahzrebhf nggrzcgf ner abj haqrejnl gb perngr na
vagrtengrq nepuvgrpgher bs pbageby, cergenvarq vagb gur zbfg cbjreshy NVf,
gung pbhyq npgviryl thvqr gur znpuvarf gbjneq yrtny, abaunezshy, naq
nssvezngviryl orarsvpvny hfrf.
Fb sne, bhe nccebnpurf gb npuvrivat guvf fbeg bs NV-uhzna nyvtazrag
unir oebnqyl snyyra vagb gjb pngrtbevrf: ehyrf-onfrq flfgrzf naq
“ervasbeprzrag yrneavat” sebz uhzna srrqonpx. Yrg’f gnxr gurz bar ol
bar.
Ehyrf-onfrq flfgrzf, juvpu erfrzoyr cercebtenzzrq vafgehpgvbaf,

ercerfrag na nggrzcg ol cebtenzzref gb tbirea na NV’f orunivbe. Juvyr
fgenvtugsbejneq sbe fvzcyr gnfxf, fhpu na nccebnpu serdhragyl snygref va
pbzcyrk fpranevbf nf gur flfgrzf ner hanoyr gb nqncg va erny gvzr.
Ervasbeprzrag yrneavat, sbe vgf cneg, juvpu vf zber pbzcngvoyr jvgu
pbzcyrk flfgrzf, nyybjf na NV gb yrnea sebz vagrenpgvba jvgu vgf uhzna
rinyhngbef naq syrkvoyl gb nppbzzbqngr fcrpvsvp pvephzfgnaprf.
Ohg bs pbhefr, guvf zrgubq, gbb, unf vgf synjf. Gb thvqr gur yrneavat, vg
erdhverf gur pnershy qrfvta bs “erjneq shapgvbaf”; nal fyvc, jurgure qhr gb
fubegfvtugrqarff, hasberfrra pvephzfgnaprf, be n cnegvphyneyl pyrire NV,
pbhyq yrnq gb “erjneq-unpxvat” nf na NV vagrecergvat nzovthbhf
vafgehpgvbaf npuvrirf n grpuavpnyyl uvtu fpber jvgubhg shysvyyvat gur uhznaf’
npghny rkcrpgngvbaf.
Gbqnl’f NV flfgrzf—srq ol inevbhf glcrf bs vasbezngvba ohg havavgvngrq
gb qverpg rkcrevrapr bs gur erny jbeyq—frr gung jbeyq guebhtu zbqryf bs
ernyvgl nffrzoyrq sebz gevyyvbaf bs cebonovyvfgvp whqtzragf. Gb gurz, va guvf
havirefr gurer ner ab “ehyrf” sebz gur bhgfrg, be nal zrnaf sbe
qvfgvathvfuvat fpvragvsvp snpg sebz hacebirq bofreingvba. Gb na NV,
rirelguvat—rira gur ynjf bs culfvpf—rkvfgf nybat n fcrpgehz bs zreryl
eryngvir gehgu.
Abj, ubjrire, rssbegf unir ortha gb nevfr va NV sbe vapbecbengvat uhzna
ehyrf naq vafgnagvngvat snpgf. Gurer ner abj qrzbafgengrq zrpunavfzf ol
juvpu na NV zbqry pna vatrfg pregnva snpghny, “tebhaq-gehgu” pbafgnagf, gnt
gurz nf svany, naq znc gurz vagb vgf rzorqqvat fcnpr; zberbire, gur
vasbezngvba pna or rnfvyl naq tybonyyl hcqngrq. Ol guvf zrgubq, gur zbqry
pna gura cebprrq gb zryq gbtrgure gur gjb pbzcbaragf—vgf jvqre
cebonovyvfgvp whqtzrag naq gur aneebjre tebhaq-gehgu nffrffzrag—sbe n
ernfbanoyl npphengr erfcbafr.
Ohg gur gnfx vf fgvyy sne sebz orvat raqrq, naq dhrfgvbaf cebyvsrengr. Sbe
vafgnapr: Ubj zvtug jr uhznaf tb nobhg qvfgvathvfuvat sbe NV, naq va gur
cebprff sbe bhefryirf, gur arprffnel nggevohgrf bs gehgu? Va gur ntr bs NV,
nsgre nyy, rira svefg cevapvcyrf jvyy haqretb pbagvahny erivfvba naq
vainyvqngvba. Cerpvfryl guvf, ubjrire, fubhyq cebivqr na bccbeghavgl sbe
erarjny, sbe pbeerpgvat cevbe reebef naq sbetvat arj tebhaq. Xabjvat gung
bhe pbaprcgf bs ernyvgl znl nyfb punatr, jr fubhyq abg ybpx NV vagb
cbgragvnyyl reebarbhf “gehguf” gung jbhyq vauvovg gurve bja riraghny
erpbafvqrengvbaf.

Gung, ubjrire, vf sbe gur ybatre grez. Evtug abj, NV fgvyy arrqf n
ceryvzvanel gerr bs qrsvavgvir xabjyrqtr ercerfragvat jung uhznavgl unf
qrqhprq gb or “gehr” guhf sne. Raqbjvat bhe znpuvarf jvgu guvf xabjyrqtr
jvyy nyybj hf eryvnoyl gb funecra gurve ivrj bs gur jbeyq. Va cnegvphyne, vs vg vf
abj cbffvoyr gb ghar rneyl flfgrzf va pbafbanapr jvgu gur ynjf bs gur
havirefr, vg znl nyfb or cbffvoyr gb ercyvpngr n pbzcnenoyr rkrepvfr jvgu
ersrerapr gb gur ynjf bs uhzna angher. Va gur fnzr jnl gung jr pna rafher
gung NV zbqryf fgneg sebz gur ynjf bs culfvpf nf jr haqrefgnaq gurz, jr
fubhyq cerirag NV zbqryf sebz ivbyngvat gur ynjf bs nal uhzna cbyvgl.
Ynlref zvtug rkvfg va na NV’f “obbx bs ynjf” ng inevbhf yriryf bs
tbireanapr: ybpny, qvfgevpg, fgngr, srqreny, vagreangvbany. Yrtny cerprqragf,
whevfcehqrapr, fpubyneyl pbzzragnel—creuncf nybat jvgu bgure, yrff
yrtnyvfgvp jevgvatf—pbhyq or pbafvqrerq fvzhygnarbhfyl. Yvxr ehyrf-onfrq
nyvtazrag flfgrzf, cerqrsvarq ynjf naq pbqrf bs pbaqhpg pna or hfrshy
erfgenvagf rira gubhtu gurl graq nyfb gb or yrff syrkvoyr naq qrfvtarq jvgu
yrff jvqr-enatvat cbffvovyvgvrf va zvaq guna jung npghny uhzna orunivbe
varivgnoyl qrznaqf.
Sbeghangryl, arj grpuavdhrf ner orvat grfgrq, naq bar pnhfr sbe
bcgvzvfz yvrf va fbzrguvat irel arj naq, ng gur fnzr gvzr, irel byq.
Zber ebohfg naq zber pbafvfgrag guna nal ehyr rasbeprq ol chavfuzrag
ner bhe zber onfvp, vafgvapgvir, naq havirefny uhzna haqrefgnaqvatf. Gur
Serapu fbpvbybtvfg Cvreer Obheqvrh pnyyrq gurfr sbhaqngvbaf qbkn (va
napvrag Terrx, pbzzbayl npprcgrq oryvrsf): gur bireynccvat pbyyrpgvba bs
abezf, vafgvghgvbaf, vapragvirf, naq erjneq-naq-chavfuzrag zrpunavfzf
gung, jura pbzovarq, vaivfvoyl naq fvyragyl grnpu gur qvssrerapr orgjrra
tbbq naq rivy, evtug naq jebat. Qbkn pbafgvghgr n pbqr bs uhzna gehgu gung
vf glcvpny gb uhznaf ohg ercerfragrq ol ab uneq-pbqrq negvsnpgf.12 Vg vf
fvzcyl bofreirq naq nofbeorq va gur pbhefr bs uhzna yvsr. Juvyr fbzr bs
gurfr gehguf znl or fcrpvsvp gb pregnva fbpvrgvrf be phygherf, gur bireync vf
fvtavsvpnag; ovyyvbaf bs uhznaf, bevtvangvat sebz qvirefr phygherf jvgu n
inevrgl bs vagrerfgf, rkvfg nf n trarenyyl fgnoyr naq uvtuyl vagrepbaarpgrq
flfgrz.
Guvf vqrn, gung na haqrsvarq fhofgenghz bs phygher pna gnzr punbf jura
naq jurer jevggra ehyrf pnaabg, sbezf gur onfvf bs fbzr bs gur yngrfg
nccebnpurf va gur NV svryq. Gur pbqrobbx bs qbkn pnaabg or negvphyngrq,

zhpu yrff genafyngrq vagb n sbezng gung znpuvarf pbhyq haqrefgnaq.
Znpuvarf zhfg or gnhtug gb qb gur wbo gurzfryirf—pbzcryyrq gb ohvyq
sebz bofreingvba n angvir haqrefgnaqvat bs jung uhznaf qb naq qba’g qb,
nofbeovat jung gurl frr naq hcqngvat gurve vagreany tbireanapr nppbeqvatyl.
Va guvf grpuavpny cebprff bs vafgvyyvat qbkn, gurer jbhyq or ab
erdhverzrag, be rira qrfver, gb nggrzcg na n cevbev nterrzrag ba gur cebcre
negvphyngvba bs uhzna zbenyvgl naq phygher. Vs ynetr ynathntr zbqryf unir
orra noyr gb vatrfg gur ragver vagrearg va na haphengrq jnl, naq gb znxr nf
zhpu frafr bhg bs vg nf gurl unir nyernql qbar, znpuvarf—cnegvphyneyl
gubfr gung unir qrirybcrq “tebhaqrqarff” (gung vf, ntnva, n eryvnoyr
eryngvbafuvc orgjrra vachgf ersyrpgvat uhzna ernyvgl naq gur YYZ’f
bhgchgf) naq pnhfny ernfbavat—znl npuvrir zhpu gur fnzr va nofbeovat
jung jr unir nyjnlf fgehttyrq gb negvphyngr bhefryirf.
Bs pbhefr, n znpuvar’f genvavat fubhyq abg pbafvfg fbyryl bs qbkn.
Engure, na NV zvtug nofbeo n jubyr clenzvq bs pnfpnqvat ehyrf: sebz
vagreangvbany nterrzragf gb angvbany ynjf gb ybpny ynjf gb pbzzhavgl abezf
naq fb ba. Va nal tvira fvghngvba, gur NV jbhyq pbafhyg rnpu ynlre va vgf
uvrenepul, zbivat sebz nofgenpg cerprcgf nf qrsvarq ol uhznaf gb gur
pbapergr ohg nzbecubhf creprcgvbaf bs gur jbeyq’f vasbezngvba gung NV unf
vatrfgrq be perngrq sbe vgfrys. Bayl jura na NV unf rkunhfgrq gung ragver
cebtenz naq snvyrq gb svaq nal ynlre bs ynj nqrdhngryl nccyvpnoyr va
thvqvat, ranoyvat, be sbeovqqvat orunivbe—bayl gura jbhyq vg pbafhyg jung
vg unf qrevirq sebz vgf bja rneyl vagrenpgvba jvgu naq rzhyngvba bs
bofreinoyr uhzna orunivbe. Va guvf jnl vg jbhyq or rzcbjrerq gb npg va
nyvtazrag jvgu uhzna inyhrf rira jurer ab jevggra ynj be abez rkvfgf.
Gb ohvyq naq rafher gur rssrpghngvba bs guvf frg bs ehyrf naq inyhrf, jr
jbhyq nyzbfg pregnvayl unir gb eryl ba NV vgfrys. Uhznaf unir orra hanoyr
guhf sne gb negvphyngr pbzcerurafviryl naq gb nterr hcba bhe bja ehyrf. Naq
ab uhzna, be frg bs uhznaf, pbhyq zngpu gur fpnyr naq fcrrq erdhverq gb
birefrr gur ovyyvbaf bs vagreany naq rkgreany whqtzragf gung NV flfgrzf
jbhyq fbba or pnyyrq hcba gb znxr.
Cresrpgvba npebff frireny srngherf bs gur svany zrpunavfz sbe nyvtazrag
jvyy or vzcrengvir. Svefg, gur fnsrthneqf pnaabg or erzbirq be bgurejvfr
pvephziragrq. Frpbaq, gur pbagebyf zhfg nyybj sbe inevnovyvgl va gur
nccyvpnoyr ehyrf onfrq ba gur pbagrkg, gur trbtencuvpny ybpngvba, naq gur
hfre’f cebsvyr nf rkrzcyvsvrq, sbe vafgnapr, va na bcg-va frg bs cnegvphyne

fbpvny be eryvtvbhf phfgbzf naq abezf. Gur pbageby flfgrz zhfg or ng bapr
cbjreshy rabhtu gb unaqyr n oneentr bs dhrfgvbaf naq hfrf va erny gvzr,
pbzcerurafvir rabhtu gb qb fb nhgubevgngviryl naq npprcgnoyl npebff gur
jbeyq va rirel pbaprvinoyr pbagrkg, naq syrkvoyr rabhtu gb yrnea, eryrnea,
naq nqncg bire gvzr. Svanyyl, haqrfvenoyr orunivbe ol n znpuvar, jurgure
qhr gb nppvqragny zvfuncf, harkcrpgrq flfgrz vagrenpgvbaf, be vagragvbany
zvfhfrf, zhfg or abg zreryl cebuvovgrq ohg ragveryl ceriragrq. Nyy
chavfuzrag jbhyq pbzr gbb yngr.
Ubj zvtug jr trg gurer? Cevingr ragrecevfr, jvgu tbireazrag yvprafr
naq npnqrzvp fhccbeg, pbhyq pbyynobengr gb ohvyq “tebhaqvat zbqryf.” Jr
jbhyq nyfb arrq gb qrfvta n frg bs inyvqngvba grfgf sbe pregvsvpngvba bs n
zbqry nf obgu yrtny (npebff whevfqvpgvbaf) naq fnsr. N fcrpvnyyl genvarq
fhcreivfbel NV, be zhygvcyr NVf, znl or arrqrq gb birefrr gur hfrf bs n
jvqr neenl bs NV ntragf, jub jbhyq pbafhyg gurve fhcreivfbe orsber
cebprrqvat jvgu n gnfx—guhf nyybjvat n fvatyr zbenyvgl gb tbirea qvirefr
vzcyrzragngvbaf. Fnsrgl-sbphfrq ynof naq abacebsvgf, va pbafhygngvba jvgu
sebagvre ynof, pbhyq grfg obgu ntragvp NVf naq fhcreivfbel NVf ba gurve evfxf
naq erpbzzraq nqqvgvbany genvavat naq inyvqngvba fgengrtvrf nf arrqrq.
Yrnqvat pbzcnavrf—creuncf ivn bar bs gur erqvfgevohgvir fpurzrf
qvfphffrq va na rneyvre puncgre—pbhyq wbvagyl shaq gurfr erfrnepuref’ jbex.
Gur pbzcvyngvba bs n fvathyne genvavat frg naq n pbeerfcbaqvat inyvqngvba
fhvgr, pbyyngrq naq phengrq sebz n tybonyyl ercerfragngvir fcrpgehz bs ynjf
naq abezf, naq fgergpuvat sebz naguebcbybtl gb gurbybtl gb fbpvbybtl, vf
arprffnel naq znl orpbzr cenpgvpnoyr. Gur jbeyq arrqf n qrqvpngrq ragvgl
erfcbafvoyr sbe hcqngvat naq ersvavat gur nyvtazrag’f genvavat yvoenel,
qngnfrgf, naq inyvqngvba grfgf. Tebhaqvat zbqryf jbhyq unir gb pbaarpg gb
naq pbafgnagyl hcqngr ntragvp zbqryf jvgu gur yngrfg irefvba bs gur phengrq
pbqrk. Negvsvpvny vagryyvtraprf, ng gur evtug yriry bs cbjre, pbhyq erfgenva
rnpu bgure. Gur genvavat qngn gurzfryirf fubhyq or qrzbpengvp naq vapyhfvir
va pbagrag, naq gur genvaref’ cebprffrf naq bhgchgf—vapyhqvat gurve
vagrecergngvbaf bs gur bofreingvbaf naq nofbecgvbaf bs gur NV gurl ner
genvavat—fubhyq or nf genafcnerag nf cbffvoyr, jvgu gurve zrgubqbybtvrf
naq inyvqngvba grfgf bcra sbe choyvp fpehgval.
Sbe gurve cneg, tbireazrag erthyngbef fubhyq funcr pregnva fgnaqneqf naq
nhqvg zbqryf sbe nffhevat NVf’ pbzcyvnapr jvgu gurz. Gur qrterr bs n
zbqry’f nqurerapr gb cerfpevorq ynjf naq zberf, gur qrterr bs qvssvphygl

vaibyirq va hagenvavat n zbqry gung rkuvovgf qnatrebhf pncnpvgvrf, gur
nzbhag naq glcr bs grfgvat, vapyhqvat vadhvel vagb haxabja pncnovyvgvrf—
nyy bs gurfr fubhyq or erivrjrq orsber n zbqry’f choyvp eryrnfr, jvgu
pbafvqrengvba tvira nyfb gb gur cbffvovyvgl bs yvnovyvgl naq gur fhofrdhrag
arrq gb vzcbfr cranygvrf va gur pnfr bs zbqryf sbhaq gb unir orra genvarq gb
rinqr yrtny fgevpgherf. Jr abgr urer gung rasbeprzrag bs gurfr fgnaqneqf
pbhyq orpbzr rkgerzryl qvssvphyg, cnegvphyneyl nf pbagvahbhf ergenvavat
nqinaprf; qbphzragngvba bs n zbqry’f ribyhgvba, creuncf erpbeqrq ol
zbavgbevat NVf, jbhyq or rffragvny gb rafhevat gung zbqryf qb abg orpbzr
oynpx obkrf gung renfr gurzfryirf naq orpbzr fnsr uniraf sbe vyyrtnyvgl.
GUR NYVTAZRAG CEBOYRZ
Gur vafpevcgvba bs tybonyyl vapyhfvir zbenyvgvrf bagb fvyvpba-onfrq
vagryyvtrapr jbhyq or n Urephyrna rssbeg. Fgnttrevat gb pbagrzcyngr vf gur
furre ahzore naq qvirefvgl bs ehyrf gung jbhyq unir gb or phengrq naq
vafgvyyrq va negvsvpvnyyl vagryyvtrag flfgrzf. Ab fvatyr phygher fubhyq rkcrpg
gb qvpgngr gb nabgure gur zbenyvgl bs gur vagryyrpgf ba juvpu vg jbhyq or
erylvat. Fb, sbe rnpu pbhagel, znpuvarf jbhyq unir gb yrnea qvssrerag ehyrf,
sbezny naq vasbezny, zbeny, yrtny, naq eryvtvbhf, nf jryy nf, vqrnyyl, qvssrerag
ehyrf sbe rnpu hfre naq, jvguva onfryvar pbafgenvagf, sbe rirel pbaprvinoyr
vadhvel, gnfx, fvghngvba, naq pbagrkg.
Fvapr jr jbhyq or hfvat NV vgfrys gb or cneg bs vgf bja fbyhgvba,
grpuavpny qvssvphygvrf jbhyq yvxryl or nzbat gur rnfvre punyyratrf. Gurfr
znpuvarf ner fhcreuhznayl pncnoyr bs zrzbevmvat naq borlvat
vafgehpgvbaf, ubjrire pbzcyvpngrq. Gurl znl or noyr gb yrnea naq npghnyyl
nqurer gb yrtny naq creuncf nyfb rguvpny cerprcgf nf jryy nf, be orggre guna,
uhznaf unir qbar qrfcvgr bhe gubhfnaqf bs lrnef bs vgrengvba. Ohg ynetre,
abagrpuavpny punyyratrf erznva.
Gur znva vffhr vf gur snpg gung “tbbq” naq “rivy” ner abg frys-rivqrag
pbaprcgf. Nal qrfvtare bs zbenyvgl zhfg ergnva uhzvyvgl. Nf Thvqb
Pnynoerfv, n cebzvarag Nzrevpna whqtr, punaaryvat gur Arj Grfgnzrag,
bapr pbhafryrq: “Gur orfg bs hf zhfg nyjnlf or pnershy yrfg jr snyy, naq gur
jbefg bs hf znl nyjnlf ubcr sbe erfheerpgvba.”13 Rira ba gurve orfg qnlf,
cnegvpvcnagf va guvf zbeny rapbqvat—fpvragvfgf, ynjlref, be eryvtvbhf yrnqref

—jbhyq abg nyy or raqbjrq jvgu gur cresrpg novyvgl gb neovgengr evtug sebz
jebat ba bhe pbyyrpgvir orunys. Fbzr dhrfgvbaf jbhyq or hanafjrenoyr
rira ol qbkn, sbe gur nzovthvgl (be ynkvgl) bs gur pbaprcg bs “tbbq” unf
orra qrzbafgengrq va rirel ren bs uhzna uvfgbel, naq gur ntr bs NV vf
hayvxryl gb or na rkprcgvba. Pbzcbhaqvat gur ceboyrz zvtug or gur bcra
pbasyvpg, yvatrevat qvfbevragngvba, naq ynpx bs erfgenvag gung punenpgrevmr
znal uhzna fbpvrgvrf gbqnl.
Jr jvfu fhpprff gb bhe fcrpvrf’ tvtnagvp cebwrpg, ohg whfg nf jr pnaabg
pbhag ba gnpgvpny uhzna pbageby va gur ybatre-grez cebwrpg bs pbribyhgvba,
jr nyfb pnaabg eryl fbyryl ba gur fhccbfvgvba gung znpuvarf jvyy gnzr
gurzfryirf. Genvavat na NV gb haqrefgnaq hf naq gura fvggvat onpx naq
ubcvat gung vg erfcrpgf hf vf abg n fgengrtl gung frrzf rvgure fnsr be yvxryl gb
fhpprrq. Zberbire, jr zhfg erpbtavmr gung uhznaf jbhyq pregnvayl abg or
havsvrq va gurve bja nccebnpu—fbzr gerngvat NV nf sevraq naq bguref nf sbr,
naq fbzr (tvira pbafgenvagf ba gvzr naq erfbheprf) hanoyr gb rkrepvfr n
cersrerapr ohg fvzcyl npprcgvat gur fgengrtl vzzrqvngryl ninvynoyr gb gurz.
Guvf urgrebtrarvgl fhttrfgf gur yvxryvubbq bs n cerqvpgnoyr inevnapr va
yriryf bs fnsrgl. Rira nf gur qvsshfvba bs NVf naq gur ybjrevat pbfgf bs
qrirybczrag zvtug nppryrengr NV’f nyvtazrag, gurl zvtug nyfb raunapr vgf
qnatref. Gur qvtvgny naq pbzzrepvny vagrepbaarpgrqarff bs gbqnl’f jbeyq
zrnaf gung n qnatrebhf NV, qrirybcrq naljurer, jbhyq cbfr n guerng
rireljurer. Gur qvfpbapregvat ernyvgl vf gung cresrpgvba va vzcyrzragngvba
ragnvyf n uvtu fgnaqneq bs cresbeznapr pbzovarq jvgu na rira ybjre
gbyrenapr sbe snvyher. Guhf, qvfpercnapvrf va fnsrgl ertvzrf fubhyq or n
pbaprea gb hf nyy.
Jr guhf hetr gur pbbeqvangvba naq nppryrengvba bs uhznavgl’f qvfcnengr
nyvtazrag rssbegf. Gbtrgure, jungrire gur cebwrpg, jr jvyy unir gb nafjre
cebsbhaq dhrfgvbaf. Urer ner gjb: Jura gur qvfgvapgvba orgjrra uhznaf
naq znpuvarf orpbzrf oyheel, jung vf bhe zvavzhz guerfubyq sbe orvat
gerngrq nf n fcrpvrf? Vs sbeprq gb pbzcebzvfr jvgu znpuvarf, jung vf bhe
pbyyrpgvir abaartbgvnoyr erq yvar? Jvgubhg n funerq haqrefgnaqvat bs jub
jr ner, gur uhzna enpr evfxf shyyl eryvadhvfuvat gb NV gur sbhaqngvbany gnfx
bs qrsvavat bhe inyhr naq gurerol whfgvslvat bhe rkvfgrapr.
Va guvf yvtug, vg zhfg or fnvq sbeguevtugyl gung, fubhyq vg nccrne vzcbffvoyr
gb ernyvmr n ertvzr bs eryvnoyr grpuavpny fgengrtvp pbageby, jr fubhyq cersre n
jbeyq jvgu ab NTV ng nyy gb n jbeyq va juvpu rira bar NTV erznvaf

hanyvtarq jvgu uhzna inyhrf. Gb or fher, ubj gb npuvrir pbafrafhf—ba
jung gubfr uhzna inyhrf ner, ubj gurl ner gb or nqwhqtrq naq nterrq hcba,
naq ubj gurl fubhyq or nffrffrq, npgvingrq, naq qrcyblrq—vf gur
cuvybfbcuvpny, qvcybzngvp, naq yrtny gnfx bs gur praghel. Lrg jr ner
pbzcryyrq ol gur rkvtrapvrf bs gur zbzrag naq gur orarsvgf bs gur
grpuabybtl gb rfgnoyvfu naq, gb gur znkvzhz cbffvoyr, havsl zbeny
pbafgenvagf ba gur abg-uhzna ntragf gung uhznavgl vf abj oveguvat.
Jvgu fhssvpvrag qrzbpengvp vachg nf jryy nf yrtny naq grpuavpny rkcregvfr,
jvgu rkgenbeqvanel pnhgvba, naq zvaqshy nyjnlf bs gur zvfhfrf naq
znyshapgvbaf jr unir urer qrfpevorq, jr oryvrir vg jvyy or cbffvoyr gb
vaphypngr n zbeny onfryvar vagb negvsvpvnyyl vagryyvtrag znpuvarf, naq
pehpvnyyl gb qb fb va ybpxfgrc jvgu bhe sryybj uhznaf. Gurerol jr znl
pebff gur guerfubyq gb n arj ntr jvgu, vs abg hggre pbasvqrapr, ng yrnfg
vasbezrq naq fbyrza ubcr.
QRSVAVAT UHZNAVGL
Nf znpuvarf vapernfvatyl nffhzr uhzna dhnyvgvrf (naq vs fbzr uhznaf
raunapr gurzfryirf gb gnxr ba znpuvaryvxr dhnyvgvrf), yvarf jvyy orpbzr
unml. Jung vf NV naq jung vf uhzna jvyy punatr naq, va fbzr pnfrf, zretr.
Va pbzvat gb whqtr ubj jr zhfg xrrc cnpr jvgu NV, uhznaf jvyy gurersber
arrq gb nffreg zber pyrneyl jung vg vf gung qvfgvathvfurf hf sebz znpuvarf.
Ubj, gura, jvyy jr pbzcvyr naq pbzcerff gur ragver enatr bs uhzna
rkcrevrapr sbe rnfl pbzcerurafvba ol NV?
Gb cerpyhqr rvgure bhe qrzbgvba be bhe ercynprzrag ol znpuvarf, fbzr
jvyy jnag gb ynl pynvz gb qvssrerapr ivn bhe cebkvzvgl gb qvivavgl. Bguref
jvyy jvfu gb nfpregnva zber gnpgvpny pbapyhfvbaf: juvpu xvaqf bs qrpvfvba-
znxvat pna or qryrtngrq gb znpuvarf naq juvpu pnaabg. Jr cebcbfr gur
negvphyngvba bs na nggevohgr, be frg bs nggevohgrf, gung zbfg bs uhznavgl pbhyq
enyyl oruvaq naq bevrag nebhaq: bar gung jvyy fhccyl n sybbe haqrearngu jung
vf cersrenoyr ohg abg n prvyvat gb jung zvtug or cbffvoyr.
Nf n fgnegvat cbvag, jr jbhyq rapbhentr n qrsvavgvba bs qvtavgl. Jvgubhg
n funerq qrsvavgvba, jr jvyy or hanoyr gb ernpu nterrzrag vs naq jura NV vf
orvat hfrq nf n zrgubq be whfgvsvpngvba sbe gur ivbyngvba be rebfvba bs
qvtavgl, naq jr jbhyq guhf or unzfgehat va bhe erfcbafr. Jvgubhg n

qrsvavgvba bs qvtavgl, jr jbhyq abg xabj vs naq jura NV, tvira rabhtu
snphygvrf, pbhyq orpbzr n orvat bs qvtavgl, pbhyq fgnaq shyyl va cynpr bs n
uhzna, be pbhyq or ragveryl havsvrq jvgu n uhzna. Na NV, rira vs
fhfgnvanoyl cebirq gb or abg-uhzna, zvtug vafgrnq pbafgvghgr n zrzore bs n
frcnengr, fvzvyneyl qvtavsvrq pngrtbel gung jbhyq abarguryrff qrfreir vgf
bja, rdhny fgnaqneq bs gerngzrag.
Bar pbaprcgvba bs qvtavgl, qrirybcrq ol gur rvtugrragu-praghel
cuvybfbcure Vzznahry Xnag, vf pragrerq ba gur vaurerag jbegu bs gur uhzna
fhowrpg nf na nhgbabzbhf npgbe, pncnoyr bs zbeny ernfbavat, jub zhfg abg
or vafgehzragnyvmrq nf n zrnaf gb na raq. Pbhyq NVf pbzr gb shysvyy gubfr
erdhverzragf? N qrsvavgvba bs qvtavgl, jr oryvrir, jbhyq uryc uhznavgl
nafjre fbzr bs gurfr dhrfgvbaf naq rapbhentr vapyhfvir pbrkvfgrapr jvgu
NV juvyr nibvqvat erpxyrff nggrzcgf ng cerzngher pbribyhgvba.
Obgu gb ergnva na haqrefgnaqvat bs bhefryirf naq gb rafher gung na
nccebcevngr pbaprcgvba bs uhznavgl vf genafzvggrq gb znpuvarf nf gurl
yrnea, jr uhznaf jvyy arrq gb erpbzzvg bhefryirf gb zber guna gurbergvpny
qrsvavgvbany jbex. Gur npghngvba bs ntrapl, phevbfvgl, naq serrqbz,
erarjvat naq rkrepvfvat bhe vadhvfvgvirarff nobhg bgure uhznaf, nobhg gur
angheny jbeyq, nobhg gur havirefr, naq nobhg gur cbffvovyvgl bs gur qvivar,
jvyy nffvfg hf va bhe batbvat cnegvpvcngbel erqrsvavgvba bs gur yvarf bs
uhznavgl.
Jr jvyy rfcrpvnyyl arrq gb rafher gung, orlbaq pbairagvbany vqrnf bs
jbegu yvxr inyhr naq cbjre, vagevafvp uhzna vzcbegnapr orpbzrf bar bs gur
inevnoyrf gung qrsvarf znpuvar qrpvfvba-znxvat. Sbe vafgnapr, zngurzngvpny
cerpvfvba znl abg rnfvyl rapbzcnff gur pbaprcg bs zrepl. Rira gb znal
uhznaf, zrepl vf na varkcyvpnoyr vqrny, vs abg n zvenpyr. Sbe vgf cneg, naq
jvgubhg pbafvqrevat gur ehyrf-onfrq nfcrpg, n zrpunavpny vagryyvtrapr zvtug
bcrengr ol inyhvat znpuvar birecresbeznapr zber uvtuyl guna uhzna
cresbeznapr. Va fhpu n fvghngvba, pbhyq gur ybtvp oruvaq zrepl, rira vs vg
pnaabg or sbeznyyl gnhtug, creuncf or nofbeorq? Ntnva, qvtavgl—gur xreary
sebz juvpu zrepl oybbzf—zvtug freir urer nf cneg bs gur ehyrf-onfrq
nffhzcgvbaf, be gur vgrengvir yrneavat, bs gur znpuvar.
Pyrne negvphyngvba bs fcrpvsvp qrsvavat uhzna nggevohgrf—cnegvphyneyl
gubfr gung ner, yvxr qvtavgl, jvqryl vagrtengrq vagb obgu vagreangvbany cbyvgvpny
vafgehzragf naq tybony snvguf—pbhyq thvqr uhzna rssbegf qhevat crevbqf bs
qvfbevragngvba, vapyhqvat gur pubvpr orgjrra npgvivgl naq cnffvivgl, gur

cbgragvny yvzvgf bs frys-ribyhgvba, naq gur cerpvfr genafsbezngvba bs NV va gur
qverpgvba bs gur uhzna.
Gb vyyhfgengr gur pbaprcg’f hgvyvgl, gnxr nf n cbvag bs qrcnegher gur
sbyybjvat qrsvavgvba: Qvtavgl vf n dhnyvgl gung vaurerf va perngherf jub, obea
ihyarenoyr naq zbegny naq guhf shyy bs vafrphevgl naq srne, naq qrfcvgr gurve
angheny vapyvangvbaf, pna naq qb rkrepvfr gurve serrqbz abg gb sbyybj gurve
pbaprcgvba bs rivy ohg gb pubbfr gurve pbaprcgvba bs tbbq. Va bgure jbeqf,
gubfr jub pna npuvrir qvtavgl fubhyq, naq gubfr jub qb npuvrir vg zrevg n
fcrpvny yriry bs erfcrpg.
Haqbhogrqyl, guvf qrsvavgvba vf vzcresrpg. Vg znl yrnir bhg fbzr yvivat
uhznaf jub ner hanoyr gb znxr qrpvfvbaf—sbe vafgnapr, n crefba
pbafpvbhf ohg haerfcbafvir—jubz jr abarguryrff oryvrir gb or qrfreivat
bs erpbtavgvba nf orvatf jvgu qvtavgl naq guhf ragvgyrq gb erfcrpg. Va guvf
pbaarpgvba, creuncf gur qrsvavgvba fubhyq or erivfrq gb vaqvpngr gung qvtavgl,
bapr jba, qbrf abg qrcneg sebz hf fubhyq jr orpbzr hanoyr gb pbagvahr
gur npgvbaf gung jba vg gb ortva jvgu. N gubhfnaq fhpu ulcbgurgvpnyf naq
rzraqngvbaf pbhyq or vzntvarq.
Qbrf guvf qvpgngr bhe hetvat gubfr jub unir pubfra cnffvivgl va gur snpr
bs cbjreshy NV gb rkuvovg ntrapl naq npgvivgl vafgrnq? Vs npgvir, cenpgvpny
pbzzvgzrag vf cneg bs nal zbeny vqrny, gura lrf, gur ernyvmngvba bs qvtavgl
fubhyq or nqinaprq. Haqre bhe qrsvavgvba, serrqbz vf cneg bs gur uhzna
vqrny, naq guhf jr znl rkcrpg—be rira qrznaq—gung uhznaf ergnva naq
rkrepvfr gur cbjre bs pbafpvbhf pubvpr va gur ntr bs NV.
Haqre guvf qrsvavgvba, pna NV vgfrys cbffrff qvtavgl? Yvxryl abg—sbe NVf
ner abg obea, qb abg qvr, srry arvgure vafrphevgl abe srne, naq qb abg unir
angheny vapyvangvbaf be vaqvivqhnyvgl fhpu gung pbaprcgvbaf bs rivy be tbbq
pbhyq or pbafvqrerq “gurvef.” Juvyr NVf bs gur arne shgher znl nccrne
bgurejvfr, univat crefbanyvgvrf, rkcerffvat rzbgvbaf, gryyvat wbxrf, naq
erpbhagvat crefbany uvfgbevrf, haqre guvf senzrjbex gurl fubhyq or gerngrq,
cuvybfbcuvpnyyl, yvxr yvgrenel punenpgref. Gurl znl rzobql ryrzragf bs
uhznavgl; gurl ner abg erny va n zbeny frafr.
Rira gur terngrfg yvgrenel punenpgre—Funxrfcrner’f Unzyrg, sbe vafgnapr
—vf ab zber guna n fcrpvny pbzovangvba bs jbeqf, bapr jevggra ba n cntr
naq abj ercebqhprq znal gvzrf bire. “Unzyrg” unf ab novyvgl gb srry n
cevpxyr va gur rlr, n ghea bs gur fgbznpu, n ubg jnir bs sehfgengvba ng
gujnegrq rkcrpgngvba. “Unzyrg” unf ab serrqbz gb znxr n arj pubvpr.

“Unzyrg” vf genccrq vafvqr uvf cynl. “Unzyrg” vf abg n uhzna, ohg n cvpgher
bs n uhzna. NV, znqr bs fgevatf bs pbqr naq uhaxf bs fvyvpba, vf zhpu gur
fnzr.
Ab qbhog, fbzr uhznaf jbhyq gurersber qrpel guvf qrsvavgvba bs qvtavgl
nf haurycshy, obgu cuvybfbcuvpnyyl naq va fhofgnapr. Vg zvtug or pevgvpvmrq
sbe orvat gbb ybj n pbzzba qrabzvangbe—inthr rabhtu gb nccrnfr nyy
cnegvrf orpnhfr bs vgf rkprffvir znyyrnovyvgl—naq pbapheeragyl sbe abg
pncghevat gur vqrn gung uhznaf ner jbegu cerfreivat sbe gurve bja fnxr naq
gung, va fbzr jnl, jr ner rkprcgvbany orlbaq bhe novyvgl fvzcyl gb fheivir.
Gur cuvybfbcure Neguhe Fpubcraunhre phefrq qvtavgl nf “gur fuvoobyrgu bs
nyy crecyrkrq naq rzcgl-urnqrq zbenyvfgf.”14
Ohg qvtavgl, nf jr qrsvar vg, hfrshyyl ubyqf hc bhe sentvyvgl naq bhe
cbgragvny sbe snvyher nf jryy nf bhe ivgnyvgl, serrqbz, naq novyvgl gb znavsrfg
bhe oryvrsf. Vg cbvagf ng gur tbbq gung jr ner pncnoyr bs ohg unir abg
npuvrirq, naq hetragyl, fpbyqvatyl, juvfcref: Tb.
Fgvyy, nqzvggrqyl, qvtavgl nybar pnaabg or rabhtu. Bgure nggevohgrf fubhyq
or fcrpvsvpnyyl pbafvqrerq naq creuncf nqqrq gb gur pbaprcgvba bs uhznavgl
nf vg jvyy or qrcyblrq va bhe pbzvat cnegarefuvc jvgu NV. Ohg bhe novyvgl gb
qrsvar naq fhfgnva pber ryrzragf bs uhznavgl nf n onfryvar sbe NV’f
pbzcerurafvba bs uhznavgl ng ynetr vf abj n ceboyrz bs rkvfgragvny
fvtavsvpnapr, naq gur jbex gb vaphypngr bhe qrsvavgvbaf zhfg or qbar abj.
Ab qrsvavgvba jvyy erznva fgngvp; ab qbhog, nf bhe bja vqragvgvrf fuvsg, jr
jvyy arrq gb ribyir NV’f haqrefgnaqvatf va crecrghvgl. Zrnajuvyr, bguref
zber pncnoyr guna bhefryirf jvyy pbagvahr gb nqinapr bhe pbyyrpgvir
guvaxvat ba gur qlanzvp eryngvbafuvc orgjrra “hf” naq “gurz,” naq gurve
travhf zvtug lvryq n pbaprcgvba bs uhznavgl gung zber fgebatyl (rira vs
shgvyryl) nvzf ng rafhevat bhe fheiviny nf n erpbtavmnoyr fcrpvrf. Rira nf
gurl qb, ubjrire, jr fubhyq nyy fgevir sbe n qrsvavgvba, naq n cebtenz, gung
tbrf shegure naq ryringrf gur uhzna pbaqvgvba gb arj urvtugf. Sbe znl abg
NV vgfrys lrg ghea bhg gb bssre gur fgebatrfg rivqrapr bs uhznavgl’f novyvgl gb
orpbzr na npgvir cnegvpvcnag va perngvba?
BHE PUNYYRATR
Gb thnenagrr gnpgvpny pbageby ol uhznaf bs rirel NV qrpvfvba jbhyq erdhver

hf gb fgvsyr gur orarsvgf bs NV qrcyblzrag. Erylvat ba gur fhofgenghz bs
uhzna zbenyvgl nf n sbez bs fgengrtvp pbageby, juvyr eryvadhvfuvat gnpgvpny
pbageby gb ovttre, snfgre, naq zber pbzcyrk flfgrzf, vf yvxryl—riraghnyyl,
naq creuncf fbbare guna jr vzntvar—gur jnl sbejneq sbe NV fnsrgl. Cebsvg-
qevira be vqrbybtvpnyyl qevira checbfrshy zvfnyvtazragf ner frevbhf evfxf,
nf ner nppvqragny zvfnyvtazragf; bireeryvnapr ba hafpnynoyr sbezf bs
pbageby pbhyq fvtavsvpnagyl pbagevohgr gb gur qrirybczrag bs cbjreshy ohg
hafnsr NV. Gur vagrtengvba bs gur uhzna vagb gur vagreany jbexvatf bs grnzf
bs NVf, vapyhqvat ol jnl bs NVf gb tbirea NVf, frrzf gur zbfg eryvnoyr cngu
sbejneq.
Juvyr gur qrirybczrag bs n uhznar (be uhznavfgvp) NV vf bhe cevbevgl,
jr erpbtavmr fbzr cbgragvny ebyr sbe negvsvpvny uhznaf. Gb gur rkgrag gung jr
ner noyr gb qrirybc vaqvivqhny frys-ratvarrevat sbe fcrpvsvp novyvgvrf, gurerol
ranoyvat fbzr uhznaf gb zngpu nfcrpgf bs n shgher NV’f vagryyvtrapr, fhpu n
cebwrpg pbhyq or hfrshy. Bs pbhefr, gung rssbeg jbhyq arrq gb or gur cebqhpg
bs vaqvivqhny pubvpr. Bhe nhgubevny pnhgvba urer vf ersyrpgvir bs bhe
pbyyrpgvir qvyrzzn: Ribyhgvba pnaabg zreryl or ercynprq ol qrfvta, sbe guvf
jbhyq or gur sbefnxvat bs uhznavgl. Ohg prqvat gur cebwrpg bs qvfpbirel
vgfrys—jurgure fcvevghny, culfvpny, fpvragvsvp, be cuvybfbcuvpny—jbhyq
rssrpghngr gur fnzr.
Va gur ntr bs NV, gur grafvba orgjrra gur arrq gb qrfvta bhefryirf naq
gur arrq gb nyvta bhe perngvba znl irel jryy orpbzr bhe bevragvat pbzcnff.
Obgu ner nf nfcvengvbany nf gurl pna nyfb or pbafreingvir. Vg vf lrg gb or
qrgrezvarq gb jung rkgrag gur gjb arrqf jvyy or ivrjrq nf shaqnzragnyyl va
pbagenqvpgvba jvgu rnpu bgure. Vs jr tvir shyy cynl gb NV’f cbjref sbe
hayvzvgrq rkcybengvba va guvf arj ntr, jr evfx cnffvivgl be, jbefr, cnenylfvf.
Ohg vs jr znkvzvmr bhe pbageby, tvivat ng yrnfg gur vyyhfvba bs fnsrgl, jr
pvephzfpevor gur rkgrag bs bhe shyyrfg cbgragvny. Pna jr rssrpgviryl zrqvngr
gur rkrepvfr bs bhe cbjref—bhe rire-nqinapvat novyvgvrf bs qrfvta naq
qvfpbirel—ol ernffregvat n pbzzba naq ribyivat pbaprcgvba bs
uhznavgl?
Jr qrfver n shgher va juvpu uhzna vagryyvtrapr naq znpuvar vagryyvtrapr
rzcbjre bar nabgure. Gb npuvrir gung raq, rnpu vagryyvtrapr zhfg unir na
nqrdhngr haqrefgnaqvat bs gur bgure. Qrsvavat jub jr ner vf whfg gur svefg
fgrc, sbe gb or uhzna vf abg n pbafgnag. Sne zber jbex vf arrqrq gb eraqre
bhe znpuvarf, naq bhefryirf, genafcnerag, yrtvoyr, naq eryvnoyr. Rira vs gung

tbny vf npuvrirq sbe gur fancfubg bs n zbzrag, pnyvoengvat naq funevat bhe
gehguf naq ernyvgvrf jvyy or na vagrafvir naq batbvat cebwrpg. Va guvf jnl, gur
dhrfgvbaf bs pbribyhgvba naq pbrkvfgrapr ner abg fvzcyl gb or nafjrerq;
gurl ner gb or ranpgrq.

PBAPYHFVBA
GB HF, GUR nqirag bs NV vf gur fgneg bs na bqlffrl bs gur fcvevg nf zhpu nf vg
vf na rkcrqvgvba bs ybtvp naq gehgu. Jr pnaabg cebcreyl pbafvqre, yrg nybar
cercner sbe, pbrkvfgrapr naq pbribyhgvba jvgu abg-uhzna yvsr ol erylvat ba
engvbanyvgl nybar—jurgure gung bs n znpuvar be gung bs n uhzna. Engure,
fbzrguvat zber vf erdhverq—fbzrguvat shaqnzragnyyl uhzna.
Vg unf ybat orra ulcbgurfvmrq gung bhe havirefr vf fbzrguvat nxva gb na
napvrag tnzr bs purff—pbagvahbhfyl cynlrq ol ragvgvrf byqre naq ynetre
guna bhe cerfrag bofreinoyr ernyvgl. Gur ybatre jr unir bofreirq gur
zbirzragf ba gur obneq, gur yvxryvre vg unf orpbzr gung jr jbhyq
riraghnyyl pngpu ba gb n srj ehyrf bs cynl. Nsgre jngpuvat ybat rabhtu, jr
zvtug rira ortva gb cynl bhefryirf. Gur zbir sebz cnffvir bofreingvba gb
npgvir cnegvpvcngvba vf abg n yrnc bs ybtvp. Genafyngvat cevapvcyrf vagb npgvba
vf nyjnlf n yrnc bs snvgu.
Nfxrq nobhg uvf eryvtvbhf oryvrsf, Nyoreg Rvafgrva erfcbaqrq:
Jr ner va gur cbfvgvba bs n yvggyr puvyq, ragrevat n uhtr yvoenel, jubfr
jnyyf ner pbirerq gb gur prvyvat jvgu obbxf va znal qvssrerag
gbathrf. Gur puvyq xabjf gung fbzrbar zhfg unir jevggra gubfr
obbxf. Vg qbrf abg xabj jub be ubj. Vg qbrf abg haqrefgnaq gur
ynathntrf va juvpu gurl ner jevggra.
Gur puvyq abgrf n qrsvavgr cyna va gur neenatrzrag bs gur obbxf, n
zlfgrevbhf beqre, juvpu vg qbrf abg pbzceruraq, ohg bayl qvzyl
fhfcrpgf.
Gung, vg frrzf gb zr, vf gur nggvghqr bs gur uhzna zvaq, rira gur
terngrfg naq zbfg phygherq, gbjneq Tbq.
Jr frr n havirefr zneirybhfyl neenatrq, borlvat pregnva ynjf,
ohg jr haqrefgnaq gur ynjf bayl qvzyl. Bhe yvzvgrq zvaqf pnaabg

tenfc gur zlfgrevbhf sbepr gung fjnlf gur pbafgryyngvbaf.1
Bhe zvaqf erznva puvyqyvxr jvgu erfcrpg gb Tbq, bhe jbeyq, naq abj bhe
arjrfg perngvbaf. Haqrefgnaqvat jung jr unir jebhtug, va n ybtvpny naq
fcvevghny frafr, jvyy or na rffragvny fgrc gbjneq znghevgl nf n fcrpvrf. Ohg
jr zhfg nyfb znxr n yrnc, gur yrnc bs snvgu, gb zbir orlbaq rknzvangvba
naq vagb vagreiragvba. Guvf jvyy erdhver hf gb npg va n fgngr bs hapregnvagl: gur
dhntzver bs uhzna yrnqref fvapr gur qnja bs gvzr. Npgvba unf arire zrnag
gur cevivyrtr bs gbgny pbageby—vaqrrq, dhvgr gur bccbfvgr. Abe jvyy vg qb fb
va gur ntr bs NV; jr qb abg rkcrpg gb xabj bhe shgher qrfgval zber guna jr
unir xabja vg va cevbe rcbpuf.
Bhe ynpx bs pbageby qbrf abg erdhver hf gb nonaqba ernfba be, jbefr fgvyy,
gb tvir hc bhe vairfgzrag, naq bhe vapyvangvba gb npg, va gur erny jbeyq.
Ubjrire, nf uhznaf ragre n arj plpyr gung vaibyirf qverpg cnegarefuvc jvgu
NV, gur cnegvphyne qlanzvpf fcryyrq bhg va guvf ibyhzr jvyy rapbhentr hf gb
yrna vagb arj naq byq sbezf bs vadhvel nyvxr. Bhe fhpprff jvyy qrcraq ba n
pbzzvgzrag gb qrsvavat naq npgvat hcba bhe zbeny pbaivpgvbaf. Gung jvyy
erdhver fgrnqsnfg pbhentr—naq n pbafvfgrag fgengrtl—nf arj gehguf nygre
cerrkvfgvat pbaprcgvbaf.
Va snpg, vg vf zbeny checbfrf gung rapbhentr bhe pbagvahrq cebterff.
Zberbire, vg vf gur irel rkvfgrapr bs na rffragvny fhofgenghz bs uhzna
zbenyvgl gung ranoyrf uhznavgl’f genafpraqrapr bs gur qvpubgbzl orgjrra
uhzna pbageby (gnpgvpny, ng orfg) naq uhzna orarsvg (nohaqnag, ol nal
qrsvavgvba). Vg vf n shaqnzragny oryvrs va gur ernyvgl bs uhzna qvtavgl gung
nyybjf hf, gur nhgubef bs guvf obbx, ng bapr gb erpbtavmr gur cebzvfr bs
uhzna-NV nyvtazrag naq gb npprcg gur arprffvgl bs snvgu va anivtngvat gur
lrnef nurnq nf fpvrapr nqinaprf naq erirnyf rire terngre zlfgrevrf.
Qrfcvgr bhe znal funerq uhzna dhnyvgvrf, jr pnaabg rkcrpg havgl va gur
pubvprf gung yvr nurnq. Jung fbzr frr nf na napube gb fgrnql bhefryirf va
gur fgbez, bguref frr nf n yrnfu ubyqvat hf onpx. Jung fbzr cenvfr nf
arprffnel fgrcf gbjneq n cvaanpyr bs uhzna cbgragvny, bguref frr nf n
urnqybat ehfu vagb na nolff.
Va guvf pnfr, vafgvapgvir rzbgvbany qviretraprf—naq gur fhowrpgvir yvarf
gung ner qenja ol nyy cnegvrf—jvyy perngr na hacerqvpgnoyr naq pbzohfgvoyr
fvghngvba. Vapernfvatyl fgnex cbfvgvbaf bs cbgragvny “jvaaref” naq “ybfref”

jvyy vagrafvsl gur cerffher bs gurfr pvephzfgnaprf. Gur srneshy jvyy fybj
gurve bja qrirybczrag naq fnobgntr gung bs bguref. Gur birepbasvqrag jvyy
qvfthvfr gurve cbjref naq, va frperg, fcrrq hc gurve jbex. Gur gvzryvar bs
pbzvat pevfrf jvyy or nppryrengrq orlbaq cevbe uhzna rkcrevrapr; dhvpxyl,
jr jvyy or rathysrq, naq vg vf abg pyrne jurgure be ubj jr jvyy fheivir.
Zvtug NV pnhfr gurfr pbzvat pevfrf, naq gura npg nf bhe fnivbe—
znahsnpghevat ceboyrzf gung bayl vg pna fbyir, vs bayl gb cebir vgf arprffvgl
naq gb erzvaq hf bs bhe qrcraqrapl? Ntnva jr erghea gb gur qvyrzzn gung
unf zbgvingrq zhpu bs guvf ibyhzr: gur rkpehpvngvat pubvpr orgjrra
pbageby naq hgvyvgl, orgjrra gur pbzsbeg bs gur uvfgbevpnyyl vaqrcraqrag
uhzna naq gur cbffvovyvgvrf bs na ragveryl arj cnegarefuvc.
Gung pubvpr vf qvssvphyg naq arprffnel. Vg vf nyfb fbyinoyr cebivqrq bar
nffhzrf va uhznavgl n gehr, qrsvanoyr, naq vagevafvp tbbqarff. Jr cynpr
uvtu pbasvqrapr va gur grpuavpny rssbeg gb vzohr bhe znpuvarf jvgu gung
tbbqarff. Ng gur fnzr gvzr, ubjrire, naq rira vs bhe znpuvarf jrer
cebinoyl naq eryvnoyl nyvtarq jvgu uhzna zbenyvgl, qryrtngvat
erfcbafvovyvgl naq nhgubevgl gb gurz jbhyq or n zbahzragny qrpvfvba,
nssrpgvat rirel snprg bs bhe novyvgl gb ergnva bhe uhzna eryngvbafuvcf,
cbyvgvpny fgehpgherf, naq vaqvivqhny naq pbyyrpgvir vqragvgvrf. Abfgnytvn sbe
gur cerzvre fgnghf gb juvpu bhe fcrpvrf unf erpragyl tebja npphfgbzrq
jbhyq or jvqrfcernq. Sbe fbzr, ab znggre gur riraghny genwrpgbel bs NV, n
jbeyq genafsbezrq—rira sbe gur orggre—znl srry fpnepryl qvssrerag sebz
na noehcg raqvat gb bhe orqebpx ernyvgl.
N shegure hafbyirq dhrfgvba vf Jub jvyy qrpvqr? Jub jvyy znxr gur
pubvpr gb qryrtngr, be abg qryrtngr, erfcbafvovyvgl naq nhgubevgl? Jub jvyy
tvir, be jvguubyq, erfbheprf? Ubj jvyy nal bar frg bs qrpvqref
pbzzhavpngr, pbairetr—be pbzr vagb pbasyvpg jvgu—bguref nggrzcgvat gb
znxr gur fnzr qrpvfvbaf ryfrjurer? Ner jr pubbfvat gubfr vaqvivqhnyf,
gubfr snyyvoyr uhznaf, abj? Unir jr, hajvggvatyl, nyernql pubfra?
Jr nhgubef ubcr gb nyreg gurfr qrpvfvba-znxref, jubrire gurl ner, gb gur
qrpvfvbaf gung pbasebag hf rira abj naq gb jung znl yvr nurnq. Ohg bhe nvz
vf abg onyqyl gb vafgvyy n frafr bs nccerurafvba nobhg gur evfr bs NV. Na
noehcg grezvangvba va gur nccyvpngvba bs NV’f cbjref pbhyq vgfrys cerpvcvgngr
n pevfvf. Qrpryrengvba znl or rira yrff cbyvgvpnyyl znantrnoyr guna bhe
pheerag cngu, perngvat fvtavsvpnag qnatref sbe gubfr bs fybjre zbzraghz
naq qrfgeblvat gur ubcrf bs gubfr lrneavat sbe shegure nqinaprzragf.

Arvgure oyvaq snvgu abe hawhfgvsvrq srne pna sbez gur onfvf bs na rssrpgvir
fgengrtl; bar arrqf frys-qbhog gb unir xabjyrqtr ohg frys-pbasvqrapr gb npg.
Vaqrrq, va gur ntr bs NV, guvf vf nyy gur zber hetrag. Jr zhfg gel gb
haqrefgnaq gur punyyratrf gung NV jvyy cerfrag rira nf jr ynpx gur cevbe
rkcbfher be gur rffragvny rkcrevrapr gb thnenagrr gur npphenpl bs bhe
pbzcerurafvba. Naq rira nf jr anivtngr guvf qnhagvat gnfx, jr zhfg nyfb,
gb nibvq n cnffvir shgher, fhezbhag gur znal qvssvphygvrf nyernql snpvat bhe
fcrpvrf.
Juvyr fbzr znl ivrj guvf zbzrag nf uhznavgl’f svany npg, jr creprvir
vafgrnq n arj ortvaavat. Gur plpyr bs perngvba—grpuabybtvpny, ovbybtvpny,
fbpvbybtvpny, cbyvgvpny—vf ragrevat n arj cunfr. Gung cunfr znl bcrengr
haqre arj cnenqvtzf bs, nzbat bgure guvatf, ybtvp, snvgu, naq gvzr. Jvgu
fbore bcgvzvfz, znl jr zrrg vgf trarfvf.

NPXABJYRQTZRAGF
Va qrqvpngvat guvf obbx gb gur zrzbel bs Qe. Urael N. Xvffvatre, jr, uvf
gjb pbnhgubef, unir unq vg va zvaq ng bapr gb fnyhgr uvf fghaavat
nppbzcyvfuzragf nf n jbeyq-erabjarq fgngrfzna, gb cnl gevohgr gb gur furre
enatr naq qrcgu bs uvf fgengrtvp guvaxvat—va ab fvatyr pbagrkg zber
fgevxvat guna va uvf tenfc va uvf zvq-avargvrf bs gur vagevpnpvrf bs negvsvpvny
vagryyvtrapr (NV)—naq, zber crefbanyyl, gb znex gur terngarff bs bar jub
jnf nyfb bhe pybfr zragbe naq sevraq.
Va gur sbyybjvat cnentencuf, jr abj tengrshyyl erpbtavmr va ghea fbzr
nzbat gur znal pbyyrnthrf naq pbzcnavbaf jub unir nvqrq hf va
pbaprvivat naq cercnevat guvf obbx’f nzovgvbhf vairfgvtngvba bs NV: n
“znggre,” va bhe bja hetrag jbeqf, “bs gur hgzbfg vzcbegnapr gb gur shgher
bs uhznavgl.”
Vasyhrapvat bhe guvaxvat nobhg gung znggre, juvyr fvzhygnarbhfyl
cebivqvat hf jvgu pehpvny vasbezngvba naq vafvtug vagb gur fhowrpg’f
grpuabybtvpny vzcyvpngvbaf, jrer Qrzvf Unffnovf, Qnevb Nzbqrv, Qnavry
Uhggraybpure, Tenunz Nyyvfba, Zhfgnsn Fhyrlzna, Znvguen Entuh, Wnzrf
Znaxvln, Ervq Ubsszna, naq Fnz Nygzna. Jr ner terngyl va gurve qrog.
Frireny xrl pbyynobengbef pbagevohgrq gb gur qensgvat, erivfvat, naq
funcvat bs gur obbx’f fhofgnapr. Anapl Xvffvatre—“gur vafcvengvba bs zl
yvsr,” nf ure uhfonaq whfgyl abgrq va qrqvpngvat gb ure uvf crahygvzngr obbx,
Yrnqrefuvc (2022)—yrag guvf cebwrpg ure vaqbzvgnoyl ivtvynag naq graqre
fheirvyynapr.
Ryrnabe Ehaqr jnf sberzbfg nzbat cebsrffvbany pbagevohgbef. Jvgu
rybdhrapr, yrneavat, naq ivfvba, Ryrnabe genafyngrq gb gur cntr ure rkgrafvir
qvfphffvbaf bire gur lrnef jvgu Qe. Xvffvatre, gurerol pbperngvat gur obbx’f
rffragvny sbhaqngvba, fgehpgher, naq pbagragf. Fhofrdhragyl, jbexvat va
pybfr pbafhygngvba jvgu uvf gehfgrq sevraq naq nffbpvngr Arny Xbmbqbl, naq
jvgu hf pbnhgubef, Ryrnabe cebprrqrq gb er-fhowrpg rirel puncgre gb ure

nphgr znfgrel bs qrgnvy, ure mrnybhf svqryvgl gb gur nhgube’f vagrag va obgu
grkg naq pbagrkg, naq ure fhogyr rqvgbevny svarffr.
Wbvavat gur cebwrpg ng vgf zvqcbvag, Wbua Srethfba shegure rkcnaqrq gur
obbx’f nethzragf jvgu raretl naq fxvyy. Qvfcynlvat n urycshy naq hahfhny
snpvyvgl jvgu uvfgbel naq zlgubybtl, ur nyfb rayvirarq vgf cebfr. Jvgu
zragbefuvc tynqyl cebivqrq ol bar bs hf, naq guebhtu gveryrff pbyynobengvba,
ur nffhzrq n pbafrdhragvny ebyr va gur qevir gb frr gur obbx’f znahfpevcg
guebhtu gb gur raq.
Jura vg pbzrf gb choyvfuref, jr unccvyl vaurevgrq Yvggyr, Oebja, gur
svez gung n srj lrnef rneyvre unq fhpprffshyyl oebhtug bhg Gur Ntr bs NV. Vgf
rkrphgvir rqvgbe, Nyrknaqre Yvggyrsvryq, sbegvsvrq hf jvgu nvq naq
rapbhentrzrag juvyr qvfcynlvat n jrypbzr vafvfgrapr ba aneengvir pynevgl
naq na rdhnyyl erserfuvat frafvgvivgl gb ahnapr. Jr jrer ab yrff sbeghangr gb
rawbl gur rkcreg zvavfgengvbaf bs Zvpunry Abba, cebqhpgvba rqvgbe, juvyr
nyfb orarsvgvat ba gur fvqryvarf sebz gur fbhaq fgengrtvp pbhafry bs Eboreg
Q. Oynpxjvyy naq Ylaqfnl Ubjneq. Bhe ntrag Naqerj Jlyvr tnir gur obbx
ivgny ercerfragngvba. Guebhtubhg, W. Cnhy Oerzre, Qe. Xvffvatre’f yvgrenel
rkrphgbe, naq Wbry Xyrva, nhgubevmrq gb erivrj naq pbafhyg hcba qrpvfvbaf
eryngvat gb jbexf va cebterff, cebirq fgnyjneg naq qrrcyl vasbezrq
thneqvnaf bs gurve qrne sevraq’f yrtnpl.
Va gur svany cunfrf bs bhe bja ynobef nf pbnhgubef bs guvf obbx, naq sbe
vgf znexrgvat naq cebzbgvba, vainyhnoyr fhccbeg pnzr sebz gur grnz ng Revp
Fpuzvqg’f bssvpr—rfcrpvnyyl Wnavar Oenql, Angunyvr Ohffrznxre, Eboreg
Rfcbfvgb, Tnor Zrqvan, Naqerj Zbber, Naqerj Fbebgn, Qnivq Tbbqfgbar,
naq Fryvan Kh, nf jryy nf Uryra Qhaa, Znggurj Uvygmvx, naq Znqryrvar
Jrnfg ng Uvygmvx Fgengrtvrf.
Frysyrffyl pbagvahvat, naq rkgraqvat, gurve bja qrpnqrf bs qribgrq
freivpr gb Qe. Xvffvatre, Gurerfn Nznagrn, Wbql Jvyyvnzf, naq Wrffrr
YrCbeva unir erznvarq vaqvfcrafnoyr gb gur raq—naq orlbaq.


NOBHG GUR NHGUBEF
Urael N. Xvffvatre jnf obea va Treznal va 1923, freirq va gur H.F. Nezl
qhevat Jbeyq Jne VV, naq gnhtug uvfgbel naq tbireazrag sbe gjb qrpnqrf ng
Uneineq Havirefvgl orsber orpbzvat Angvbany Frphevgl Nqivfbe naq
Frpergnel bs Fgngr va gur nqzvavfgengvbaf bs Cerfvqragf Evpuneq Avkba naq
Trenyq Sbeq. N erpvcvrag bs gur Abory Crnpr Cevmr naq gur Cerfvqragvny
Zrqny bs Serrqbz, nzbat bgure njneqf, ur nhguberq ahzrebhf vasyhragvny
jbexf ba fgngrfznafuvc naq vagreangvbany eryngvbaf, zbfg erpragyl
Yrnqrefuvc, naq jvgu Revp Fpuzvqg naq Qnavry Uhggraybpure pbnhguberq Gur
Ntr bs NV. Hagvy uvf qrngu va Abirzore 2023, ur erznvarq va prnfryrff
qrznaq nf na nqivfre gb Nzrevpna cerfvqragf naq znal bgure jbeyq yrnqref
naq cbyvplznxref.
Revp Fpuzvqg vf n grpuabybtvfg, ragercerarhe, naq cuvynaguebcvfg. Wbvavat
gur sbhaqref bs Tbbtyr va 2001, ur urycrq tebj gur pbzcnal sebz n
Fvyvpba Inyyrl fgneghc gb n tybony yrnqre va grpuabybtl, svefg nf puvrs
rkrphgvir bssvpre naq punvezna, naq yngre nf rkrphgvir punvezna naq
grpuavpny nqivfre. Va 2021, ur sbhaqrq gur Fcrpvny Pbzcrgvgvir Fghqvrf
Cebwrpg, n abacebsvg vavgvngvir gb fgeratgura Nzrevpn’f ybat-grez
pbzcrgvgvirarff va NV naq grpuabybtl. Zbfg erpragyl, ur naq uvf jvsr
Jraql pbsbhaqrq Fpuzvqg Fpvraprf, n abacebsvg betnavmngvba jbexvat gb
nqinapr fpvrapr naq grpuabybtl gung qrrcraf uhzna haqrefgnaqvat bs gur
angheny jbeyq naq qrirybcf fbyhgvbaf gb tybony vffhrf.
Penvt W. Zhaqvr, cerfvqrag bs Zhaqvr & Nffbpvngrf, wbvarq Zvpebfbsg va
1992 naq ergverq va 2014 nf puvrs erfrnepu naq fgengrtl bssvpre. Ur nqivfrf
Zvpebfbsg ba dhnaghz pbzchgvat naq plorefrphevgl, vf n qverpgbe bs gur
Vafgvghgr sbe Flfgrzf Ovbybtl, n grpuabybtl nqivfre gb gur Pyrirynaq Pyvavp,
naq nyfb na vairfgbe/nqivfre va rneyl-fgntr pbzcnavrf vaibyirq va NV,
ovbgrpu, shfvba raretl, naq zngrevnyf fpvrapr. Ur freirq Cerfvqragf Pyvagba,

Ohfu, naq Bonzn ba gur Angvbany Frphevgl Gryrpbzzhavpngvbaf Nqivfbel
Pbhapvy naq gur Cerfvqrag’f Pbhapvy bs Nqivfbef ba Fpvrapr naq
Grpuabybtl. Nzbat uvf ubabef vf n Qbpgbe bs Ratvarrevat qrterr sebz
Eraffrynre Cbylgrpuavp Vafgvghgr.
